
It was but a question of leaving their own con- 
tracted "grounds," of crossing the Avenue and 
proceeding then to fylr. Betterman's gate, which 
even with the deliberate step of a truly massive 
young person she could reach in three or four 
minutes. So, making no other preparation than 
to open a vast pale-green parasol, a portable pa- 
vilion from which there fluttered fringes, frills and 
ribbons that made it resemble the roof of some 
Burmese palanquin or perhaps even pagoda, she 
took her way while these accessories fluttered in 
the August air, the morning freshness, and the 
soft sea-light. Her other draperies, white and 
voluminous, yielded to the mild breeze in the 
manner of those of a ship held back from speed 
yet with its canvas expanded; they conformed 
to their usual law of suggestion that the large 
loose ponderous girl, mistress as she might have 
been of the most expensive modern aids to the 
constitution of a "figure," lived, as they said 
about her, in wrappers and tea-gowns; so that, 
save for her enjoying obviously the rudest health, 

I 



 

she might have been a convalescent creeping forth 
from the consciousness of stal? bedclothes. She 
turned in at the short drive, making the firm 
neat gravel creak under her tread, and at the end 
of fifty yards paused before the florid villa, a 
structure smothered in senseless architectural 
ornament, as if to put her question to its big fair 
foolish face. How Mr. Betterman might be this 
morning, and what sort of a night he might have 
had, was what she wanted to learn — an anxi- 
ety very real with her and .which, should she be 
challenged, would nominally and decently have 
brought her; but her finer interest was in the 
possibility that Graham Fielder might have come. 
The clean blank windows, however, merely 
gave her the impression of so many showy pic- 
ture-frames awaiting their subjects; even those 
of them open to the charming Newport day 
seemed to tell her at the most that nothing had 
happened since the evening before and that the 
situation was still untouched by the change she 
dreamt of. A person essentially unobservant of 
forms, which her amplitude somehow never found 
of the right measure, so that she felt the misfit 
in many cases ridiculous, she now passed round 
the house instead of applying at the rather grandly 
gaping portal — which might in all conscience 
have accommodated her— and, crossing a stretch 
of lawn to the quarter of the place turned to the 
sea, rested here again some minutes. She sought 

2 



 

indeed after a moment the support of an elab- 
orately rustic bench that ministered to ease and 
contemplation, whence she would rake much of 
the rest of the small sloping domain; the fair 
prospect, the great sea spaces, the line of low re- 
ceding coast that bristled, either way she looked, 
with still more costly "places," and in particular 
the proprietor's wide and bedimmed verandah, 
this at present commonly occupied by her "prowl- 
ing" father, as she now always thought of him, 
though if charged she would doubtless have ad- 
mitted with the candour she was never able to 
fail of that she herself prowled during these days 
of tension quite as much as he. 

He would already have come over, she was well 
aware — come over on grounds of his own, which 
were quite different from hers; yet she was scarce 
the less struck, off at her point of vantage, with 
the way he now sat unconscious of her, at the 
outer edge and where the light pointed his pres- 
ence, in a low basket-chair which covered him in 
save for little more than his small sharp shrunken 
profile, detached against the bright further dis- 
tance, and his small protrusive foot, crossed over 
a knee and agitated by incessant nervous motion 
whenever he was thus locked in thought. Sel- 
dom had he more produced for her the appear- 
ance from which she had during the last three 
years never known him to vary and which would 
have told his story, all his story, every inch of it 

3 



 

and with the last intensity, she felt, to a specta- 
tor capable of being struck with him as one might 
after all happen to be struck. What she her- 
self recognised at any rate, and really at this 
particular moment as she had never done, was 
how his having retired from active business, as 
they said, given up everything and entered upon 
the first leisure of his life, had in the oddest way 
the effect but of emphasising his absorption, 
denying his detachment and presenting him as 
steeped up to the chin. Most of all on such oc- 
casions did what his life had meant come home 
to her, and then most, frankly, did that meaning 
seem small; it was exactly as the contracted size 
of his little huddled figure in the basket-chair. 

He was a person without an alternative, and if 
any had ever been open to him, at an odd hour or 
two, somewhere in his inner dimness, he had long 
since closed the gate against it and now revolved 
in the hard-rimmed circle from which he had not 
a single issue. You couldn't retire without some- 
thing or somewhere to retire to, you must have 
planted a single tree at least for shade or be able 
to turn a key in some yielding door; but to say 
that her extraordinary parent was surrounded by 
the desert was almost to flatter the void into 
which he invited one to step. He conformed in 
short to his njgGj^jy of absolute interest — inter- 
est, that is, in hisjcjWn private facts, which were 
facts of numerical calculation altogether: how 

4 



 

could it not be so when he had dispossessed him- 
self, if there had even been the slightest selection 
in the matter, of every faculty except the calcu- 
lating? If he hadn't thought in figures how- 
could he possibly have thought at all — and oh 
the intensity with which he was thinking at that 
hour ! It was as if she literally watched him just 
then and there dry up in yet another degree to 
everything but his genius. His genius might at 
the same time have gathered in to a point of 
about the size of the end of a pin. Such at least 
was the image of these things, or a part of it, 
determined for her under the impression of the 
moment. 

He had come over with the same promptitude 
every morning of the last fortnight and had 
stayed on nearly till luncheon, sitting about in 
different places as if they were equally his own, 
smoking, always smoking, the big portentously 
"special" cigars that were now the worst thing 
for him and lost in the thoughts she had in gen- 
eral long since ceased to wonder about, taking 
them now for granted with an indifference from 
which the apprehension we have noted was but 
the briefest of lapses. He had over and above 
that particular matter of her passing perception, 
he had as they all had, goodness knew, and as 
she herself must have done not least, the air of 
waiting for something he didn't speak of arid in 
fact couldn't gracefully mention; with which 

s 



 

moreover the adopted practice, and the irre- 
pressible need of it, that she had been having 
under her eye, brought out for her afresh, little 
as she invited or desired any renewal of their 
salience, the several most pointed parental signs 
— harmless oddities as she tried to content her- 
self with calling them, but sharp little symbols 
of stubborn little facts as she would have felt 
them hadn't she forbidden herself to feel. She 
had forbidden herself to feel, but was none the 
less as undefended against one of the ugly truths 
that hovered there before her in the charming 
silver light as against another. That the terri- 
ble little man she watched at his meditations 
wanted nothing in the world so much in these 
hours as to know what was "going to be left" 
by the old associate of his operations and sharer 
of his spoils — this, as Mr. Gaw's sole interest in 
the protracted crisis, matched quite her certainty 
of his sense that, however their doomed friend 
should pan out, two-thirds of the show would 
represent the unholy profits of the great wrong 
he himself had originally suffered. 

This she knew was what it meant — that her 
father should perch there like a ruffled hawk, 
motionless but for his single tremor, with his 
beak, which had pecked so many hearts out, visi- 
bly sharper than ever, yet only his talons nervous; 
not that he at last cared a straw, really, but that 
he was incapable of thought save in sublimities of 

6 



 

arithmetic, and that the question of what old 
Frank would have done with the fruits of his 
swindle, on the occasion of the rupture that had 
kept them apart in hate and vituperation for so 
many years, was one of the things that could 
hold him brooding, day by day and week by 
week, after the fashion of a philosopher tangled 
in some maze of metaphysics. As the end, for 
the other participant in that history, appeared 
to draw near, she had with the firmest, wisest 
hand she could lay on it patched up the horrid 
difference; had artfully induced her father to 
take a house at Newport for the summer, and 
then, pleading, insisting, that they should in 
common decency, or, otherwise expressed, in view 
of the sick man's sore stricken state, meet again, 
had won the latter round, unable as he was even 
then to do more than shufHe downstairs and take 
an occasional drive, to some belief in the sincerity 
of her intervention. She had got at him — under 
stress of an idea with which her ostensible motive 
had nothing to do; she had obtained entrance, 
demanding as all from herself that he should see 
her, and had little by little, to the further illumi- 
nation of her plan, felt that she made him wonder 
at her perhaps more than he had ever wondered 
at anything; so that after this everything else 
was a part of that impression. 

Strange to say, she had presently found herself 
quite independently interested; more interested 

7 



 

than by any transaction, any chapter of inter- 
course, in her whole specifically filial history. 
Not that it mattered indeed if, in all probability 
— and positively so far back as during the time of 
active hostilities — this friend and enemy of other 
days had been predominantly in the right: the 
case, at the best and for either party, showed so 
scantly for edifying that where was the light in 
which her success could have figured as a moral or 
a sentimental triumph ? There had been no real 
beauty for her, at its apparent highest pitch, in 
that walk of the now more complacently valid of 
the two men across the Avenue, a walk taken as 
she and her companion had continued regularly 
to take it since, that he might hold out his so 
long clenched hand, under her earnest admoni- 
tion, to the antagonist cut into aftfesh this year by 
sharper knives than any even in Gaw's armoury. 
They had consented alike to what she wished, and 
without knowing why she most wished it: old 
Frank, oddly enough, because he liked her, as she 
felt, for herself, once she gave him the chance and 
took all the trouble; and her father because — well, 
that was an old story. For a long time now, 
three or four years at least, she had had, as she 
would have said, no difficulty with him; and she 
knew just when, she knew almost just how, the 
change had begun to show. 

Signal and supreme proof had come to him one 
day that save for his big plain quiet daughter 

8 



 

(quiet, that is, unless when she knocked over a 
light gilt chair or swept off a rash table-ornament 
in brushing expansively by,) he was absolutely 
alone on the human field, utterly unattended by 
any betrayal whatever that a fellow-creature could 
like him or, when the inevitable day should come, 
could distinterestedly miss him. She knew how 
of old her inexplicable, her almost ridiculous type . 
had disconcerted and disappointed him; but with 
this, at a given moment, it had come to him 
that she represented quantity and mass, that 
there was a great deal of her, so that she would 
have pressed down even a balance appointed to 
weigh bullion; and as there was nothing he was 
fonder of than such attestations of value he had 
really ended by drawing closer to her, as who 
should say, and by finding countenance in the 
breadth of personal and social shadow that she 
projected. This was the sole similitude about 
him of a living alternative, and it served only 
as she herself provided it. He had actually 
turned into a personal relation with her as fie 
might have turned, out of the glare and the noise 
and the harsh recognitions of the market, into 
some large cool dusky temple; a place where 
idols other than those of his worship vaguely 
loomed and gleamed, so that the effect at moments 
might be rather awful, but where at least he could 
sit very still, could breathe very softly, could look 
about obliquely and discreetly, could in fact wan- 

9 



 

der a little on tiptoe and treat the place, with a 
mixture of pride and fear, almost as his own. 

He had brooded and brooded, even as he was 
brooding now; and that habit she at least had 
in common with him, though their subjects of 
thought were so different. Thus it was exactly 
that she began to make out at the time his actual 
need to wonder at her, the only fact outside his 
proper range that had ever cost him a speculative 
impulse, still more a speculative failure; even 
as she was to make it out later on in the case of 
their Newport neighbour, and to recognise above 
all that though a certain savour of accepted dis- 
comfort had, in the connection, to pervade her 
father's consciousness, no taste of resentment was 
needed, as in the present case, to sweeten it. 
Nothing had more interested our intelligent 
young woman than to note in each of these over- 
strained, yet at the same time safely resting ac- 
cumulators — and to note it as a thing unprece- 
dented up to this latest season — an unexpressed, 
even though to some extent invoked, relief under 
the sense, the confirmed suspicion, of certain 
anomalies of ignorance and indifference as to 
what they themselves stood for, anomalies they 
could scarcely have begun, on the first glimmer, 
by so much as taking for realities. It had be- 
come verily, on the part of the poor bandaged 
and bolstered and heavily-breathing object of her 
present solicitude, as she had found it on that 

io 



 

of his still comparatively agile and intensely 
acute critic, the queer mark of an inward relief to 
meet, so far as they had arts or terms for it, any 
intimation of what she might have to tell them. 
From her they would take things they never could 
have taken, and never had, from anyone else. 
There were some such intimations that her father, 
of old, had only either dodged with discernible art 
or directly set his little white face against; he 
hadn't wanted them, and had in fact been afraid 
of them — so that after all perhaps his caring so 
little what went on in any world not subject to 
his direct intelligence might have had the quali- 
fication that he guessed she could imagine, and 
that to see her, or at least to feel her, imagine was 
like the sense of an odd draught about him when 
doors and windows were closed. 

Up in the sick man's room the case was quite 
other; she had been admitted there but three 
times, very briefly, and a week had elapsed since 
the last, yet she had created in him a positive 
want to communicate, or at any rate to receive 
communication. She shouldn't see him again — 
the pair of doctors and the trio of nurses had been 
at one about that; but he had caused her to be 
told that he liked to know of her coming and 
hoped she would make herself quite at home. 
This she took for an intended sign, a hint that 
what she had in spite of difficulties managed to 
say now kept him company in the great bedimmed 

II 



 

and disinfected room from which other society 
was banished. Her father in fine he ignored after 
that not particularly beautiful moment of bare 
recognition brought about by her at the bedside; 
her father was the last thing in the world that ac- 
tually concerned him. But his not ignoring her- 
self could but have a positive meaning; which 
was that she had made the impression she sought. 
Only would Graham Fielder arrive in time ? She 
was not in a position to ask for news of him, but 
was sure each morning that if there had been any 
gage of this Miss Mumby, the most sympathetic 
of the nurses and with whom she had established 
a working intelligence, would be sufficiently in- 
terested to come out and speak to her. After 
waiting a while, however, she recognised that 
there could be no Miss Mumby yet and went 
over to her father in the great porch. 

"Don't you get tired," she put to him, "of 
just sitting round here?" 

He turned to her his,small neat finely-wrinkled 
face, of an extreme yellowish pallor and which 
somehow suggested at this end of time an empty 
glass that had yet held for years so much strong 
wine that a faint golden tinge still lingered on 
^from it. " I can't get any more tired than I am 
already." His tone was flat, weak and so little 
charged with petulance that it betrayed the long 
habit of an almost exasperating mildness. This 
effect, at the same time, so far from suggesting 

12 



 

any positive tradition of civility was somehow 
that of a commonness instantly and peculiarly 
exposed. "It's a better place than ours," he 
added in a moment. "But I don't care." And 
then he went on: "I guess I'd be more tired in 
your position." 

"Oh you know I'm never tired. And now," 
said Rosanna, "I'm too interested." 

"Well then, so am I. Only for me it ain't a 
position." 

His daughter still hovered with her vague look 
about. "Well, if it's one for me I feel it's a good 
one. I mean it's the right one." 

Mr. Gaw shook his little foot with renewed 
intensity, but his irony was not gay. "The right 
one isn't always a good one. But ain't the ques- 
tion what his is going to be ? " 

"Mr. Fielder's? Why, of course," said Ro- 
sanna quietly. "That's the whole interest." 

"Well then, you've got to fix it." 

"I consider that I have fixed it — I mean if we 
can hold out." 

"Well"— and Mr. Gaw shook on— "I guess / 
can. It's pleasant here," he went on, "even if 
it is funny." 

"Funny?" his daughter echoed — yet inatten- 
tively, for she had become aware of another 
person, a middle-aged woman, but with neatly- 
kept hair already grizzled and in a white dress 
covered with a large white apron, who stood at 

13 



 

the nearest opening of the house. "Here we 
are, you see, Miss Mumby — but any news?" 
Miss Gaw was instantly eager. 

"Why he's right there upstairs," smiled the 
lady of the apron, who was clearly well affected 
to the speaker. 

This young woman flushed for pleasure. "Oh 
how splendid ! But when did he come ? " 

"Early this morning — by the New York boat. 
I was up at five, to change with Miss Ruddle, 
and there of a sudden were his wheels. He seems 
so nice!" Miss Mumby beamed. 

Rosanna's interest visibly rose, though she was 
prompt to explain it. "Why it's because he's 
nice! And he has seen him ?" 

"He's seeing him now — alone. For five min- 
utes. Not all at once." But Miss Mumby was 
visibly serene. 

This made Miss Gaw rejoice. "I'm not afraid. 
It will do him good. It has got to!" she finely 
declared. 

Miss Mumby was so much at ease that she 
could even sanction the joke. "More good than 
the strain of waiting. They're quite satisfied." 
Rosanna knew these judges for Doctor Root and 
Doctor Hatch, and felt the support of her friend's 
firm freshness. "So we can hope," this author- 
ity concluded. 

"Well, let my daughter run it — !" Abel Gaw 
had got up as if this change in the situation quali- 

14 



 

fied certain proprieties, but turned his small 
sharpness to Miss Mumby, who had at first 
produced in him no change of posture. "Well, 
if he couldn't stand me I suppose it was because 
he knows me — and doesn't know this other man. 
May Mr. Fielder prove acceptable!" he added, 
stepping off the verandah to the path. But as 
that left Rosanna's share in the interest still ap- 
parently unlimited he spoke again. "Is it going 
to make you settle over here ? " 

This mild irony determined her at once joining 
him, and they took leave together of their friend. 
"Oh I feel it's right now!" She smiled back at 
Miss Mumby, whose agitation of a confirmatory 
hand before disappearing as she had come testi- 
fied to the excellence of the understanding be- 
tween the ladies, and presently was trailing her 
light vague draperies over the grass beside her 
father. They might have been taken to resemble 
as they moved together a big ship staying its 
course to allow its belittled tender to keep near, 
and the likeness grew when after a minute Mr. 
Gaw himself stopped to address his daughter a 
question. He had, it was again marked, so scant 
a range of intrinsic tone that he had to resort 
for emphasis or point to some other scheme of 
signs — this surely also of no great richness, but 
expressive of his possibilities when once you 
knew him. "Is there any reason for your not 
telling me why you're so worked up ?" 

15 



 

His companion, as she paused for accommoda- 
tion, showed him a large flat grave face in which 
the general intention of deference seemed some- 
how to confess that it was often at the mercy — 
and perhaps most in this particular relation — of 
such an inward habit of the far excursion as could 
but incorrigibly qualify for Rosanna Gaw certain 
of the forms of attention, certain of the necessi- 
ties of manner. She was, sketchily speaking, so 
much higher-piled a person than her father that 
the filial attitude in her suffered at the best from 
the occasional air of her having to come down 
to him. You would have guessed that she was 
not a person to cultivate that air; and perhaps 
even if very acute would have guessed some other 
things bearing on the matter from the little man's 
careful way with her. This pair exhibited there 
in the great light of the summer Sunday morn- 
ing more than one of the essential, or perhaps 
the rather finally constituted, conditions of their 
intercourse. Here was a parent who clearly ap- 
pealed to nobody in the world but his child, and 
a child who condescended to nobody in the world 
but her parent; and this with the anomaly of a 
constant care not to be too humble on one side 
and an equal one not to be too proud on the 
other. Rosanna, her powerful exposed arm raised 
to her broad shoulder, slowly made her heavy 
parasol revolve, flinging with it a wide shadow 
that enclosed them together, for their question 

16 



 

and answer, as in a great bestreamered tent. "Do 
I strike you as worked up ? Why I've tried to keep 
as quiet about it as I possibly could — as one does 
when one wants a thing so tremendously much." 

His eyes had been raised to her own, but after 
she had said this in her perfunctory way they 
sank as from a sense of shyness and might have 
rested for a little on one of their tent-pegs. "Well, 
daughter, that's just what I want to understand 
— your personal motive." 

She gave a sigh for this, a strange uninforming 
sigh. "Ah father, 'my personal motives' !" 

With this she might have walked on, but when 
he barred the way it was as if she could have 
done so but by stepping on him. "I don't com- 
plain of your personal motives — I want you to 
have all you're entitled to and should like to 
know who's entitled to more. But couldn't you 
have a reason once in a while for letting me know 
what some of your reasons are ?" 

Her decent blandness dropped on him again, 
and she had clearly this time come further to 
meet him. "You've always wanted me to have 
things I don't care for — though really when you've 
made a great point of it I've often tried. But 
want me now to have this." And then as he 
watched her again to learn what "this," with the 
visibly rare importance she attached to it, might 
be: "To make up to a person for a wrong I once 
did him." 

17 



 

"You wronged the man who has come?" 

"Oh dreadfully!" Rosanna said with great 
sweetness. 

He evidently held that any notice taken of 
anyone, to whatever effect, by this great 
daughter of his was nothing less than an honour 
done, and probably overdone; so what prepos- 
terous "wrong" could count? The worst he 
could think of was still but a sign of her great- 
ness. "You wouldn't have him round ?" 

"Oh that would have been nothing!" she 
laughed; and this time she sailed on again. 



18 



II 

Rosanna found him again after luncheon shak- 
ing his little foot from the depths of a piazza 
chair, but now on their own scene and at a point 
where this particular feature of it, the cool spread- 
ing verandah, commanded the low green cliff and 
a part of the immediate approach to the house 
from the seaward side. She left him to the only 
range of thought of which he was at present 
capable — she was so perfectly able to follow it; 
and it had become for that matter an old story 
that as he never opened a book, nor sought a 
chance for talk, nor took a step of exercise, nor 
' gave in any manner a sign of an unsatisfied want, 
the extent of his vacancy, a detachment in which 
there just breathed a hint of the dryly invidious, 
might thus remain unbroken for hours. She 
knew what he was waiting for, and that if she 
hadn't been there to see him he would take his 
way across to the other house again, where the 
plea of solicitude for his old friend's state put 
him at his ease and where, moreover, as she now 
felt, the possibility of a sight of Graham Fielder 
might reward him. It was disagreeable to her 
that he should have such a sight while she denied 
it to her own eyes; but the sense of their common 
want Of application for their faculties was a thing 

19 



 

that repeatedly checked in her the expression of 
judgments. Their idleness was as mean and bare 
on her own side, she too much felt, as on his; 
and heaven knew that if he could sit with screwed- 
up eyes for hours the case was as flagrant in her 
aimless driftings, her incurable restless revolu- 
tions, as a pretence of "interests" could consort 
with. 

She revolved and drifted then, out of his sight 
and in another quarter of the place, till four 
o'clock had passed; when on returning to him 
she found his chair empty and was sure of what 
had become of him. There was nothing else in 
fact for his Sunday, as he on that day denied 
himself the resource of driving, or rather of being 
driven, from which the claim of the mechanical 
car had not, in the Newport connection, won 
him, and which, deep in his barouche, behind his 
own admirable horses, could maintain him in 
meditation for meditation's sake quite as well as 
a poised rocking-chair. Left thus to herself, 
though conscious she well might have visitors, 
she circled slowly and repeatedly round the 
gallery, only pausing at last on sight of a gentle- 
man who had come into view by a path from 
the cliff. He presented himself in a minute as 
Davey Bradham, and on drawing nearer called 
across to her without other greeting: "Won't 
you walk back with me to tea ? Gussy has sent 
me to bring you." 

20 



 

"Why yes, of course I will — that's nice of 
Gussy," she replied; adding moreover that she 
wanted a walk, and feeling in the prospect, though 
she didn't express this, a relief to her tension and 
a sanction for what she called to herself her tact. 
She might without the diversion not quite have 
trusted herself not to emulate, and even with 
the last crudity, her father's proceeding; which 
she knew she should afterwards be ashamed of. 
"Anyone that comes here," she said, "must 
come on to you — they'll know;" and when 
Davey had replied that there wasn't the least 
chance of anyone's not coming on she moved 
with him down the path, at the end of which they 
entered upon the charming cliff walk, a vast 
carpet of undivided lawns, kept in wondrous con- 
dition, with a meandering right-of-way for a sea- 
ward fringe and bristling wide-winged villas that 
spoke of a seated colony; many of these huge 
presences reducing to marginal meanness their 
strip of the carpet. 

Davey was, like herself, richly and healthily 
replete, though with less of his substance in 
stature; a frankly fat gentleman, blooming still 
at eight-and-forty, with a large smooth shining 
face, void of a sign of moustache or whisker and 
crowned with dense dark hair cropped close to 
his head after the fashion of a French schoolboy 
or the inmate of a jail. But for his half-a-dozen 
fixed wrinkles, as marked as the great rivers of 

21 



 

a continent on a map, and his thick and arched 
and active eyebrows, which left almost nothing 
over for his forehead, he would have scarce ex- 
hibited features — in spite of the absence of which, 
however, he could look in alternation the most 
portentous things and the most ridiculous. He 
would hang up a meaning in his large empty face 
as if he had swung an awful example on a gibbet, 
or would let loose there a great grin that you 
somehow couldn't catch in the fact but that per- 
vaded his expanses of cheek as poured wine per- 
vades water. He differed certainly from Rosanna 
in that he enjoyed, visibly, all he carnally pos- 
sessed — whereas you could see in a moment that 
she, poor young woman, would have been con- 
tent with, would have been glad of, a scantier 
allowance. "You'll find Cissy Foy, to begin 
with," he said as they went; "she arrived last 
night and told me to tell you she'd have walked 
over with me but that Gussy wants her for some- 
thing. However, as you know, Gussy always 
wants her for something — she wants everyone for 
something so much more than something for 
everyone — and there are none of us that are not 
worked hard, even though we mayn't bloom on 
it like Cissy, who, by the way, is looking a per- 
fect vision." 

"Awfully lovely?" — Rosanna clearly saw as 
she asked. 

"Prettier than at any time yet, and wanting 

22 



 

tremendously to hear from you, you know, about 
your protege — what's the fellow's name ? Graham 
Fielder ? — whose arrival we're all agog about." 

Rosanna pulled up in the path; she somehow 
at once felt her possession of this interest clouded 
— shared as yet as it had been only with her 
father, whose share she could control. It then 
and there came to her in one of the waves of 
disproportionate despair in which she felt half 
the impressions of life break, that she wasn't 
going to be able to control at all the great par- 
ticipations. She had a moment of reaction against 
what she had done; she liked Gray to be called 
her protege — forced upon her as endless numbers 
of such were, he would be the only one in the 
whole collection who hadn't himself pushed at 
her; but with the big bright picture of the villas, 
the palaces, the lawns and the luxuries in her 
eyes, and with something like the chink of money 
itself in the murmur of the breezy little waves 
at the foot of the cliff, she felt that, without her 
having thought of it enough in advance, she had 
handed him over to complications and relations. 
These things shimmered in the silver air of the 
wondrous perspective ahead, the region off there 
that awaited her present approach and where 
Gussy hovered like a bustling goddess in the 
enveloping cloud of her court. The man beside 
her was the massive Mercury of this urgent 
Juno; but — without mythological comparisons, 

23 



 

which we make for her under no hint that she 
could herself have dreamed of one-^she found 
herself glad just then that she liked Davey Brad- 
ham, and much less sorry than usual that she 
didn't respect him. An extraordinary thing 
happened, and all in the instant before she spoke 
again. It was very strange, and it made him 
look at her as if he wondered that his words 
should have had so great an effect as even her 
still face showed. There was absolutely no one, 
roundabout and far and wide, whom she posi- 
tively wanted Graham to know; no not one 
creature of them all — "all" figuring for her, while 
she stood, the great collection at the Bradhams'. 
She hadn't thought of this before in the least as 
it came to her now; yet no more had she time to 
be sure that even with the sharper consciousness 
she would, as her father was apt to say, have 
acted different. So much was true, yet while 
she still a moment longer hung fire Davey rounded 
himself there like something she could compara- 
tively rest on. "How in the world," she put to 
him then, "do you know anything away off 
"there — ? He has come to his uncle, but so 
quietly that I haven't yet seen him." 

"Why, my dear thing, is it new to you that 
we're up and doing — bright and lively? We're 
the most intelligent community on all this great 
coast, and when precious knowledge is in the air 
we're not to be kept from it. We knew at break- 

24 



 

fast that the New York boat had brought him, 
and Gussy of course wants him up to dinner to- 
night. Only Cissy claims, you see, that she has 
rights in him first — rights beyond Gussy's, I 
mean," Davey went on; "I don't know that she 
claims them beyond yours." 

She looked abroad again, his companion, to 
earth and sea and sky; she wondered and felt 
threatened, yet knowing herself at the same time 
a long way off from the point at which menace 
roused her to passion. She had always to suffer 
so much before that, and was for the present in 
the phase of feeling but weak and a little sick. 
But there was always Davey. She started their 
walk again before saying more, while he himself 
said things that she didn't heed. "I can't for 
the life of me imagine," she nevertheless at last 
declared, "what Cissy has to do with him. When 
and where has she ever seen him ? " 

Davey did as always his best to oblige. "Some- 
where abroad, some time back, when she was 
with her mother at some baths or some cure- 
place. Though when I think of it," he added, 
"it wasn't with the man himself — it was with 
some relation: hasn't he an uncle, or perhaps a 
stepfather? Cissy seems to know all about him, 
and he takes a great interest in her." 

It again all but stopped Rosanna. "Gray- 
Fielder an interest in Cissy ?" 

"Let me not," laughed Davey, "sow any seed 

25 



 

of trouble or engage for more than I can stand to. 
She'll tell you all about it, she'll clothe it in every 
grace. Only I assure you I myself am as much 
interested as anyone," he added — "interested, I 
mean, in the question of whether the old man 
there has really brought him out at the last gasp 
this way to do some decent thing about him. An 
impression prevails," he further explained, "that 
you're in some wonderful way in the old wretch's 
confidence, and I therefore make no bones of tell- 
ing you that your arrival on our scene there, 
since you're so good as to consent to come, has 
created an impatience beyond even what your 
appearances naturally everywhere create. I give 
you warning that there's no limit to what we want 
to know." 

Rosanna took this in now as she so often took 
things — working it down in silence at first: it 
shared in the general weight of all direct contri- 
butions to her consciousness. It might then, 
when she spoke, have sunk deep. She looked 
about again, in her way, as if under her constant 
oppression, and seeing, a little off from their 
gravelled walk, a public bench to which a possi- 
ble path branched down, she said, on a visibly 
grave decision: "Look here, I want to talk to 
you — you're one of the few people in all your 
crowd to whom I really can. So come and sit 
down." 

Davey Bradham, arrested before her, had an 
26 



 

air for his responsibilities that quite matched 
her own. "Then what becomes of them all 
there?" 

"I don't care a hang what becomes of them. 
But if you want to know," Rosanna said, "I do 
care what becomes of Mr. Fielder, and I trust you 
enough, being as you are the only one of your lot 
I do trust, to help me perhaps a little to do some- 
thing about it." 

"Oh, my dear lady, I'm not a bit discreet, you 
know," Mr. Bradham amusedly protested; "I'm 
perfectly unprincipled and utterly indelicate. 
How can a fellow not be who likes as much as I 
do at all times to make the kettle boil and the 
plot thicken ? I've only got my beautiful intelli- 
gence, though, as I say, I don't in the least want 
to embroil you. Therefore if I can really help 
you as the biggest babbler alive !" 

She waited again a little, but this time with her 
eyes on his good worn worldly face, superficially 
so smooth, but with the sense of it lined and 
scratched and hacked across much in the manner 
of the hard ice of a large pond at the end of a 
long day's skating. The amount of obstreperous 
exercise that had been taken on that recording 
field ! The difference between our pair, thus con- 
fronted, might have been felt as the greater by 
the very fact of their outward likeness as crea- 
tures so materially weighted ; it would have been 
written all over Rosanna for the considering eye 

27 



 

that every grain of her load, from innermost soul 
to outermost sense, was that of reality and sin- 
cerity; whereas it might by the same token have 
been felt of Davey that in the temperature of life 
as he knew it his personal identity had been, save 
for perhaps some small tough lurking residuum, 
long since puffed away in pleasant spirals of va- 
pour. Our young woman was at this moment, 
however, less interested in quantities than in 
qualities of candour; she could get what passed 
for it by the bushel, by the ton, whenever, right 
or left, she chose to chink her pocket. Her re- 
quirement for actual use was such a glimmer from 
the candle of truth as a mere poor woman might 
have managed to kindle. What was left of pre- 
cious in Davey might thus have figured but as a 
candle-end; yet for the lack of it she should per- 
haps move in darkness. And her brief intensity 
of watch was in a moment rewarded; her com- 
panion's candle-end was his not quite burnt-out 
Value as a gentleman. This was enough for her, 
and she seemed to see her way. "If I don't 
trust you there's nobody else in all the wide world 
I can. So you've got to know, and you've got 
to be good to me." 

"Then what awful thing have you done?" he 
was saying to her three minutes after they had 
taken their place temporarily on the bench. 

"Well, I got at Mr. Betterman," she said, "in 
spite of all the difficulty. Father and he hadn't 

28 



 

spoken for years — had had long ago the blackest, 
ugliest difference; believing apparently the hor- 
ridest things of each other. Nevertheless it was 
as father's daughter that I went to him — though 
after a little, I think, it was simply for the worth 
itself of what I had to tell him that he listened to 
me. 

"And what you had to tell him," Davey asked 
while she kept her eyes on the far horizon, "was 
then that you take this tender interest in Mr. 
Fielder?" 

"You may make my interest as ridiculous as 
you like- !" 

"Ah, my dear thing," Davey pleadingly pro- 
tested, "don't deprive me, please, of anything 
nice there is to know ! " 

"There was something that had happened years 
ago — a wrong I perhaps had done him, though in 
perfect good faith. I thought I saw my way to 
make up for it, and I seem to' have succeeded 
beyond even what I hoped." 

"Then what have you to worry about ?" said 
Davey. 

"Just my success," she answered simply. 
"Here he is and I've done it." 

"Made his rich uncle want him — who hadn't 
wanted him before ? Is that it ?" 

"Yes, interfered afresh in his behalf — as I had 
interfered long ago. When one has interfered 
one can't help wondering," she gravely explained. 

29 



 

"But dear lady, ever for his benefit of course," 
Davey extemporised. 

"Yes — except for the uncertainty of what is 
for a person's benefit. It's hard enough to know," 
'said Rosanna, "what's for one's own." 

"Oh, as to that," Davey joked, "I don't think 
that where mine's concerned I've ever a doubt! 
But is the point that the old man had quarrelled 
with him and that you've ■ brought about a re- 
conciliation ? " 

She considered again with her far-wandering 
eyes; as if both moved by her impulse to confi- 
dence and weighted with the sense of how much 
of it there all was. "Well, in as few words as 
possible, it was like this. He's the son but of a 
half-sister, the daughter of Mr. Betterman's father 
by a second marriage which he in his youth hadn't 
at all liked, and who made her case worse with him, 
as time went on, by marrying a man, Graham's 
father, whom he had also some strong objection 
to. Yes," she summarized, "he seems to have 
been difficult to please, but he's making up for it 
now. His brother-in-law didn't five long to suffer 
from the objection, and the sister, Mrs. Fielder, 
left a widow badly provided for, went off" with her 
boy, then very young, to Europe. There, later 
on, during a couple of years that I spent abroad 
with my mother, we met them and for the time 
saw much of them; she and my dear mother 
greatly took to each other, they formed the friend- 

30 



 

liest relation, and -we had in common that my 
father's business association with Mr. Betterman 
still at that time subsisted, though the terrible 
man — as he then was — hadn't at all made it up 
with our friend. It was while we were with her 
in Dresden, however, that something happened 
which brought about, by correspondence, some 
renewal of intercourse. This was a matter on 
which we were in her confidence and in which we 
took the greatest interest, for we liked also the 
other person concerned in it. An opportunity 
had come up for her to marry again, she had prac- 
tically decided to embrace it, and of this, though 
everything between them had broken ofF so short, 
her unforgiving brother had heard, indirectly, in 
New York." 

Davey Bradham, lighting cigarettes, and having 
originally placed his case, in a manner promptly 
appreciated, at his companion's disposal, crowned 
this now adjusted relation with a pertinence of 
comment. "And only again of course to be as 
horrid as possible about it! He hated husbands 
in general." 

"Well, he himself, it was to be said, had been 
but little of one. He had lost his own wife early 
and hadn't married again — though he was to lose 
early also the two children born to him. The 
second of these deaths was recent at the time I 
speak of, and had had to do, I imagine, with his 
sudden overture to his absent relations. He let 

3i 



 

his sister know that he had learnt her intention 
and thought very ill of it, but also that if she 
would get rid of her low foreigner and come back 
with the boy he would be happy to see what could 
be done for them." 

"What a jolly situation !" — Davey exhaled fine 
puffs. "Her second choice then — at Dresden — 
was a German adventurer ? " 

"No, an English one, Mr. Northover; an ad- 
venturer only as a man in love is always one, I 
suppose, and who was there for us to see and 
extremely to approve. He had nothing to do 
with Dresden beyond having come on to join her; 
they had met elsewhere, in Switzerland or the 
Tyrol, and he had shown an interest in her, and 
had made his own impression, from the first. 
She answered her brother that his demand of her 
was excessive in the absence of anything she 
could recognise that she owed him. To this he 
replied that she might marry then whom she liked, 
but that if she would give up her boy and send 
him home, where he would take charge of him and 
bring him up to prospects she would be a fool not 
to appreciate, there need be no more talk and 
she could lead her life as she perversely preferred. 
This crisis came up during our winter with her — 
it was a very cruel one, and my mother, as I 
have said, was all in her confidence." 

"Of course" — Davey Bradham abounded; " and 
you were all in your mother's ! " 

32 



 

Rosanna leaned back on the bench, her ciga- 
rette between her strong and rounded fingers; she 
sat at her ease now, this chapter of history filling, 
under her view, the soft lap of space and the com- 
fort of having it well out, and yet of keeping it, 
as her friend somehow helped her to do, well 
within her control, more and more operative. 
"Well, I was sixteen years old, and Gray at that 
time fourteen. I was huge and hideous and be- 
gan then to enjoy the advantage — if advantage 
it was — of its seeming so ridiculous to treat the 
monster I had grown as negligible that I had to 
be treated as important. I wasn't a bit stupider 
than I am now — in fact I saw things much more 
sharply and simply and knew ever so much bet- 
ter what I wanted and didn't. Gray and I had 
become excellent friends — if you want to think 
of him as my 'first passion' you are welcome to, 
unless you want to think of him rather as my fifth ! 
He was a charming little boy, much nicer than 
any I had ever seen; he didn't come up higher 
than my shoulder, and, to tell you all, I remember 
how once, in some game with a party of English 
and American children whom my mother had got 
together for Christmas, I tried to be amusing by 
carrying half-a-dozen of them successively on my 
back — all in order to have the pleasure of carrying 
him, whom I felt, I remember, but as a feather- 
weight compared with most of the others. Such 
a romp was I — as you can of course see I must 

33 



 

have been, and at the same time so horridly art- 
ful; which is doubtless now not so easy for you 
to believe of me. But the point," Rosanna de- 
veloped, "is that I entered all the way into our 
friends' situation and that when I was with my 
mother alone we talked for the time of nothing 
else. The strange, or at least the certain, thing 
was that though we should have liked so to have 
them over here, we hated to see them hustled 
even by a rich relative: we were rich ourselves, 
though we rather hated that too, and there was 
no romance for us in being so stuffed up. We 
liked Mr. Northover, their so devoted friend, we 
saw how they cared for him, how even Graham 
did, and what an interest he took in the boy, for 
whom we felt that a happy association with him, 
each of them so open to it, would be a great thing; 
we threw ourselves in short, and I dare say to 
extravagance, into the idea of the success of Mr. 
Northover's suit. She was the charmingest little 
woman, very pretty, very lonely, very vague, but 
very sympathetic, and we perfectly understood 
that the pleasant Englishman, of great taste and 
thoroughly a gentleman, should have felt en- 
couraged. We didn't in the least adore Mr. 
Betterman, between whom and my father the dif- 
ferences that afterwards became so bad were 
already threatening, and when I saw for myself 
how the life that might thus be opened to him 
where they were, with his mother's marriage and 

34 



 

a further good influence crowning it, would com- 
pare with the awfuL^aj^_JiLgrah,jto_.e.xpress it 
mildly, for which I was sure his uncle proposed 
to train him, I took upon myself to get more 
roused and wound-up than I had doubtless any 
real right to, and to wonder what I might really 
do to promote the benefit that struck me as the 
greater and defeat the one against which my prej- 
udice was strong." 

She had drawn up a moment as if what was to 
come required her to gather herself, while her 
companion seemed to assure her by the backward 
set of his head, that of a man drinking at a cool 
spout, how little his attention had lapsed. "I 
see at once, you dear grand creature, that you 
were from that moment at the bottom of every- 
thing that was to happen; and without knowing 
yet what these things were I back you for it now 
up to the hilt." 

"Well," she said, "I'm much obliged, and you're 
never for an instant, mind, to fail me; but I 
needed no backing then — I didn't even need my 
mother's: I took on myself so much from the 
moment my chance turned up." 

"You just walked in and settled the whole ques- 
tion, of course." He quite flaunted the luxury 
of his interest. "Clearly what moved you was 
one of those crowning passions of infancy." 

"Then why didn't I want, on the contrary, to 
have him, poor boy, where his presence would 

35 



 

feed my flame?" Rosanna at once inquired. 
"Why didn't I obtain of my mother to say to 
his — for she would have said anything in the world 
I wanted: 'You just quietly get married, don't 
disappoint this delightful man; while we take 
Gray back to his uncle, which will be awfully good 
for him, and let him learn to make his fortune, 
the decent women that we are fondly befriending 
him and you and your husband coming over 
whenever you like, to see how beautifully it an- 
swers.' Why if I was so infatuated didn't I do 
that ? " she repeated. 

He kept her waiting not a moment. "Just 
because you were so infatuated. Just because 
when you're infatuated you're sublime." She 
had turned her eyes on him, facing his gorgeous 
hospitality, but facing it with a visible flush. 
" Rosanna Gaw " — he took undisguised advantage 
of her — "you're sublime now, just as sublime as 
you can be, and it's what you want to be. You 
liked your young man so much that you were 
really capable ! " 

He let it go at that, for even with his drop she 
had not completed his sense. But the next thing, 
practically, she did so. "I've been capable ever 
since — that's the point: of feeling that I did act 
upon him, that, young and accessible as I found 
him, I gave a turn to his life." 

"Well," Davey continued to comment, "he's 
not so young now, and no more, naturally, are 

36 



 

you j but I guess, all the same, you'll give many 
another." And then, as facing him altogether 
more now, she seemed to ask how he could be so 
sure: "Why, if I'm so accessible, through my 
tough old hide, how is the exquisite creature 
formed to all the sensibilities for which you sought 
to provide going in the least to hold out? He 
owes you clearly everything he has become, and 
how can he decently not want you should know he 
feels it? All's well that ends well: that at least 
I foresee I shall want to say when I've had more 
of the beginning. You were going to tell me 
how it was in particular that you got your pull." 
She puffed and puffed again, letting her eyes 
once more wander and rest; after which, through 
her smoke, she recovered the sense of the past. 
"One Sunday morning we went together to the 
great Gallery — it had been between us for weeks 
that he was some day to take me and show me 
the things he most admired: that wasn't at all 
what would have been my line with him. The 
extent to which he was 'cleverer' than I and knew 
about the things I didn't, and don't know even 

now !" Greatly she made this point. "And 

yet the beauty was that I felt there were ways I 
could help him, all the same — I knew that even 
with all the things I didn't know, so that they 
remained ignorances of which I think I wasn't a 
bit ashamed: any more in fact than I am now, 
there being too many things else to be ashamed 

37 



 

of. Never so much as that day, at any rate, had 
I felt ready for my part — yes, it came to me there 
as my part; for after he had called for me at our 
hotel and we had started together I knew some- 
thing particular was the matter and that he of a 
sudden didn't care for what we were doing, though 
we had planned it as a great occasion much before; 
that in short his thoughts were elsewhere and 
that I could have made out the trouble in his face 
if I hadn't wished not to seem to look for it. I 

hated that he should have it, whatever it was 

just Jiow I hated it comes back to me as if from 
yesterday; and also how at the same time I pre- 
tended not to notice, and he attempted not to 
show he did, but to introduce me, in the rooms, 
to what we had come for instead — which gave us 
half-an-hour that I recover vividly, recover, I as- 
sure you, quite painfully still, as a conscious, 
solemn little farce. What put an end to it was 
that we at last wandered away from the great 
things, 'the famous Madonna, the Correggio, the 
Paul Veroneses, which he had quavered out the 
properest remarks about, and got off into a small 
room of little Dutch and other later masters, 
things that didn't matter and that we couldn't 
pretend to go into, but where the German sun- 
shine of a bright winter day came down through 
some upper light and played on all the rich little 
old colour and old gilding after a fashion that of 
a sudden decided me. 'I don't care a hang for 

38 



 

anything!' I stood before him and boldly spoke 
out: 'I haven't cared a hang since we came in, 
if you want to know — I care only for what you're 
worried about, and what must be pretty bad, 
since I can see, if you don't mind my saying it, 
that it has made you cry at home.'" 

"He can hardly have thanked you for thatV 
Davey's competence threw off. 

"No, he didn't pretend to, and I had known he 
wouldn't; he hadn't to tell me how a boy feels in 
taking such a charge from a girl. But there he 
was on a small divan, swinging his legs a little and 
with his head — he had taken his hat off — back 
against the top of the seat and the queerest look 
in his flushed face. For a moment he stared 
hard, and then at least, I said to myself, his tears 
were coming up. They didn't come, however — 
he only kept glaring as in fever; from which I 
presently saw that I had said not a bit the wrong 
thing, but exactly the very best. 'Oh if I were 
some good to you !' I went on — and with the sense 
the next moment, ever so happily, that that was 
really what I was being. 'She has put it upon 
me to choose for myself — to think, to decide and 
to settle it that way for both of us. She has put 
it all upon me,' he said — ' and, how can I choose, 
in such a difficulty,' he asked, 'when she tells 
me, and when I believe, that she'll do exactly as 
I say ?' 'You mean your mother will marry Mr. 
Northover or give him up according as you pre- 

19 



 

fer?' — but of course I knew what he meant. It 
was a joy to me to feel it clear up — with the good 
I had already done him, at a touch, by making 
him speak. I saw how this relieved him even 
when he practically spoke of his question as too 
frightful for his young intelligence, his young 
conscience — literally his young nerves. It was as 
if he had appealed to me to pronounce it posi- 
tively cruel — while I had felt at the first word 
that I really but blessed it. It wasn't too much 
for my young nerves — extraordinary as it may 
seem to you," Rosanna pursued, "that I should 
but have wished to undertake at a jump such a 
very large order. I wonder now from where my 
lucidity came, but just as I stood there I saw 
some things in a light in which, even with still 
better opportunities, I've never so much seen 
them since. It was as if I took everything in — 
and what everything meant; and, flopped there 
on his seat and always staring up at me, he under- 
stood that I was somehow inspired for him." 

"My dear child, you're inspired at this mo- 
ment!" — Davey Bradham rendered the tribute. 
"It's too splendid to hear of amid our greedy 
wants, our timid ideas and our fishy passions. 
You ring out like Briinnhilde at the opera. How 
jolly to have pronounced his doom!" 

"Yes," she gravely said, "and you see how 
jolly I now find it. I settled it. I was fate," 
Rosanna puffed. "He recognised fate — all the 

40 



 

more that he really wanted to; and you see there- 
fore," she went on, "how it was to be in every 
single thing that has happened since." 

"You stuck him fast there" — Mr. Bradham 
filled in the picture. "Yet not so fast after all," 
he understandingly added, " but that you've been 
able to handle him again as you like. He does 
in other words whatever you prescribe." 

"If he did it then I don't know what I should 
have done had he refused to do it now. For 
now everything's changed. Everyone's dead or 
dying. And I believe," she wound up, "that I 
was quite right then, that he has led his life and 
been happy." 

"I see. If he hadn't been !" Her com- 
panion's free glance ranged. 

"He would have had me to thank, yes. And 
at the best I should have cost him much !" 

"Everything, you mean, that the old man 
had more or less from the first in mind ? " 

Davey had taken her up; but the next mo- 
ment, without direct reply, she was on her feet. 
"At any rate you see!" she said to finish with 
it. 

"Oh I see a lot ! And if there's more in it than 
meets the eye I think I see that too," her friend 
declared. "I want to see it all at any rate — and 
just as you've started it. But what I want most 
naturally is to see your little darling himself." 

"Well, if I had been afraid of you I wouldn't 
41 



 

have spoken. You won't hurt him," Rosanna 
said as they got back to the cliff walk. 

"Hurt him ? Why I shall be his great warning 
light — or at least I shall be yours, which is better 
still." To this, however, always pondering, she 
answered nothing, but stood as if spent by her 
effort and half disposed in consequence to retrace 
her steps; against which possibility he at once 
protested. "You don't mean you're not coming 
on?" 

She thought another instant; then her eyes 
overreached the long smooth interval beyond 
which the nondescript excrescences of Gussy's 
"cottage," vast and florid, and in a kindred com- 
pany of hunches and gables and pinnacles con- 
fessed, even if in confused accents, to its mon- 
strous identity. The sight itself seemed after 
all to give her resolution. "Yes, now for Cissy !" 
she said and braved the prospect. i 



42 



Ill 

Half-an-hour later, however, she still had this 
young lady before her in extended perspective 
and as a satisfaction, if not as an embarrassment, 
to come; thanks to the fact that Mrs. Bradham 
had forty persons, or something like it, though 
all casually turning up, at tea, and that. she her- 
self had perhaps never been so struck with the 
activity of the charming girl's response to the 
considerations familiar alike to all of them as 
Gussy's ideas about her. Gussy's ideas about her, 
as about everything in the world, could on occa- 
sion do more to fill the air of any scene over which 
Gussy presided than no matter what vociferation 
of any massed crowd surrounding that lady: 
exactly which truth might have been notable now 
to Rosanna in the light of Cissy's occasional clear 
smile at her, always as yet from a distance, dur- 
ing lapses of intervals and across shifting barriers 
of the more or less eminent and brilliant. Mrs. 
Bradham's great idea — notoriously the most dis- 
interested Gussy had been known, through a 
careef rich in announced intentions and glorious 
designs, to entertain with any coherence — was 
that by placing and keeping on exhibition, under 
her eye, the loveliest flower of girlhood a splendid 
and confident society could have wished to wear 

43 



 

on its bosom she should at once signally enhance 
the dignity of the social part played by herself 
and steep the precious object in a medium in 
which the care of precious objects was supremely 
understood. "When she does so much for me 
what in the world mustn't I do for her ?" Cecilia 
Foy had put that to Rosanna again and again 
with perfect lucidity, .making her sense of fair 
play shine out of it and her cultivation of that 
ideal form perhaps not the least of the complica- 
tions under which our elder young woman, earnest 
in everything, endeavoured to stick to the just 
view of her. Cissy had from the first appealed 
to her with restrictions, but that was the way 
in which for poor brooding Rosanna every one 
appealed; only there was in the present case the 
difference that whereas in most cases the appeal, 
or rather her view of it, found itself somehow 
smothered in the attendant wrong possibilities, 
the interest of this bright victim of Mrs. Brad- 
ham's furtherance worked clearer, on the whole, 
with the closer, with the closest, relation, never 
starting the questions one might entertain about 
her except to dispose of them, even if when they 
had been disposed of she mostly started them 
again. 

Not often had so big a one at all events been 
started for Rosanna as when she saw the girl 
earn her keep, as they had so often called it to- 
gether, by multiplying herself for everyone else 

44 



 

about the place instead of remaining as single 
and possessable as her anxious friend had come 
over to invite her to be. Present to this observer 
to the last point indeed, and yet as nothing new, 
was the impression of that insolence of ease on 
Gussy's part which was never so great as when 
her sense for any relation was least fine and least 
true. She was naturally never so the vulgar rich 
woman able to afford herself all luxuries as when 
she was most stupid about the right enjoyment 
of these and most brutally systematic, as Ro^- 
sanna's inward voice phrased the matter, for some 
inferior and desecrating use of them. Mrs. Brad- 
ham would deeply have resented — as deeply- as 
a woman might who had no depth — any imputa- 
tion on her view of what would be fine and great 
for her young friend, but Rosanna's envy and 
admiration of possibilities, to say nothing of 
actualities, to which this view was quite blind, 
kept the girl before her at times as a sacrificed, 
truly an even prostituted creature; who yet also, 
it had to be added, could often alienate sympathy 
by strange, by perverse concurrences. However, 
Rosanna thought, Cissy wasn't in concurrence 
now, but was quite otherwise preoccupied than 
with what their hostess could either give her or 
take from her.' She was happy — this our young 
woman perfectly perceived, to her own very 
great increase of interest; so happy that, as had 
been repeatedly noticeable before, she multiplied 

45 



 

herself through the very agitation of it, appear- 
ing to be, for particular things they had to say to 
her, particular conversational grabs and snatches, 
all of the most violent, they kept attempting and 
mostly achieving, at the service of everyone at 
once, and thereby as obliging, as humane a beauty, 
after the fashion of the old term, as could have 
charmed the sight. What Rosanna most noted 
withal, and not for the first time either, every 
observation she had hitherto made seeming now 
but intensified, what she most noted was the 
huge general familiarity, the pitch of intimacy 
unmodulated, as if exactly the same tie, from 
person to person, bound the whole company to- 
gether and nobody had anything to say to any- 
one that wasn't equally in question for all. 

This, she knew, was the air and the sound, the 
common state, of intimacy, and again and again, 
in taking it in, she had remained unsure of whether 
it left her more hopelessly jealous or more rudely 
independent. She would have liked to be inti- 
mate — with someone or other, not indeed with 
every member of a crowd; but the faculty, as 
appeared, hadn't been given her (for with whom 
had she ever exercised it ? not even with Cissy, 
she felt now,) and it was ground on which she 
knew alternate languor and relief. The fact, 
however, that so much as all this could be pres- 
ent to her while she encountered greetings, ac- 
cepted tea, and failed of felicity before forms of 

46 



 

address for the most part so hilarious, or at least 
so ingenious, as to remind her further that she 
might never expect to be funny either — that 
fact might have shown her as hugging a treasure 
of consciousness rather than as seeking a soil for 
its interment. What they all took for granted! 
— this again and again had been before her; and 
never so as when Gussy Bradham after a little 
became possessed of her to the extent of their 
sharing a settee in one of the great porches on 
the lawny margin of which, before sundry over- 
archings in other and quite contradictious archi- 
tectural interests began to spread, a dozen dis- 
persed couples and trios revolved and lingered in 
sight. How was he, the young man at the other 
house, going to like these enormous assumptions ? 
— that of a sudden oddly came to her; so far in- 
deed as it was odd that Gussy should suggest 
such questions. She suggested questions in her 
own way at all times; Rosanna indeed mostly 
saw her in a sort of immodest glare of such, the 
chief being doubtless the wonder, never assuaged, 
of how any circle of the supposed amenities could 
go on "putting up" with her. The present was 
as a fact perhaps the first time our young woman 
had seen her in the light of a danger to herself. 
If society, or what they called such, had to reckon 
with her and accepted the charge, that was so- 
ciety's own affair — it appeared on the whole to 
understand its interest; but why should she, 

47 



 

Rosanna Gaw, recognise a complication she had 
done nothing ever to provoke ? It was literally 
as if the reckoning sat there between them and 
all the terms they had ever made with felt differ- 
ences, intensities of separation and opposition, 
had now been superseded by the need for fresh 
ones — forms of contact and exchange, forms of 
pretended intercourse, to be improvised in pres- 
ence of new truths. 

So it was at any rate that Rosanna's imagina- 
tion worked while she asked herself if there 
mightn't be something in an idea she had more 
than once austerely harboured — the possibility 
that Mrs. Bradham could on occasion be afraid 
-of her. If this lady's great note was that of an 
astounding assurance based on approved im- 
punity, how, certainly, should a plain dull shy 
spinster, with an entire incapacity for boldness 
and a perfect horror, in general, of intermeddling, 
have broken the spell ? — especially as there was 
no other person in the world, not one, whom she 
could have dreamed of wishing to put in fear. 
Deep was the discomfort for Miss Gaw of losing 
with her entertainer the commonest advantage 
she perhaps knew, that of her habit of escape 
from the relation of dislike, let alone of hostility, 
through some active denial for the time of any 
relation at all. What was there in Gussy that 
rendered impossible to Rosanna's sense this very 
vulgarest of luxuries ? She gave her always the 

48 



 

impression of looking at her with an exaggeration 
of ease, a guarded penetration, that consciously 
betrayed itself; though how could one know, 
after all, that this wasn't the horrid nature of 
her look for everyone? — which would have been 
publicly denounced if people hadn't been too 
much involved with her to be candid. With her 
wondrous bloom of life and health and her hard 
confidence that had nothing to do with sympathy, 
Gussy might have presented it as a matter of 
some pusillanimity, her present critic at the same 
time felt, that one should but detect the displeas- 
ing in such an exhibition of bright activity. The 
only way not to stand off from her, no doubt, 
was to be of her "bossed" party and crew, or in 
other words to be like everyone else; and per- 
haps one might on that condition have enjoyed 
as a work of nature or even of art, an example 
of all-efficient force, her braveries of aspect and 
attitude, resources of resistance to time and 
thought, things not of beauty, for some unyield- 
ing reason, and quite as little of dignity, but 
things of assertion and application in an extra- 
ordinary degree, things of a straight cold radiance 
and of an emphasis that was like the stamp of 
hard flat feet. Even if she was to be envied it 
would be across such gulfs; as it was indeed one 
couldn't so much as envy her the prodigy of her 
"figure," which had been at eighteen, as one had 
heard, that of a woman of forty and was now at 

49 



 

forty, one saw, that of a girl of eighteen: such 
a state of the person wasn't human, to the younger 
woman's sombre sense, but might have been that 
of some shining humming insect, a thing of the 
long-constricted waist, the minimised yet capari- 
soned head, the fixed disproportionate eye and 
tough transparent wing, gossamer guaranteed. 
With all of which, however, she had pushed 
through every partition and was in the centre 
of her guest's innermost preserve before she had 
been heard coming. 

"It's too lovely that you should have got him 
to do what he ought— that dreadful old man ! 
But I don't know if you feel how interesting it's 
all going to be; in fact if you know yourself how 
wonderful it is that he has already — Mr. Fielder 
has, I mean — such a tremendous friend in Cissy." 

Rosanna waited, facing her, noting her extra- 
ordinary perfections of neatness, of elegance, of 
arrangement, of which it couldn't be said whether 
they most handed over to you, as on some 
polished salver, the clear truth of her essential 
commonness or transposed it into an element 
that could please, that could even fascinate, as 
a supreme attestation of care. "Take her as an 
advertisement of all the latest knowledges of 
how to 'treat' every inch of the human surface 
and where to 'get' every scrap of the personal 
envelope, so far as she is enveloped, and she does 
achieve an effect sublime in itself and thereby 

SO 



 

absolute in a wavering world" — with so much 
even as that was Miss Gaw aware of helping to 
fill for her own use the interval before she spoke. 
"No," she said, "I know nothing of what any 
of you may suppose yourselves to know." After 
which, however, with a sudden inspiration, a 
quick shift of thought as though catching an 
alarm, "I haven't seen Mr. Fielder for a very 
long time, haven't seen him at all yet here," she 
added; "but though I hoped immensely he would 
come, and am awfully glad he has, what I want 
for him is to have the very best time he possibly 
can; a much better one than I shall myself at all 
know how to help him to." 

"Why, aren't you helping him to the greatest 
time he can have ever had if you've waked up 
his uncle to a sense of decency ? " Gussy demanded 
with her brightest promptness. "You needn't 
think, Rosanna," she proceeded with a well-nigh 
fantastic development of that ease, "you needn't 
think you're going to be able to dodge the least 
little consequence of your having been so won- 
derful. He's just going to owe you everything, 
and to follow that feeling up; so I don't see why 
you shouldn't want to let him — it would be so 
mean of him not to ! — or be deprived of the credit 
of so good a turn. When I do things" — Gussy 
always had every account of herself ready — "I 
want to have them recognised; I like to make 
them pay, without the least shame, in the way 

5 1 



 

of glory gained. However, it's between your- 
selves," her delicacy conceded, "and how can 
one judge — except just to envy you such a lovely 
relation ? All I want is that you should feel that 
here we are if you do want help. He should have 
here the best there is, and should have it, don't 
you think? before he tumbles from ignorance 
into any mistake — mistakes have such a way of 
sticking. So don't be unselfish about him, don't 
sacrifice him to the fear of using your advantage: 
what are such advantages as you enjoy meant 
for — all of them, I mean — but to be used up to 
the limit ? You'll see at any rate what Cissy 
says — she has great ideas about him. I mean," 
said Mrs. Bradham with a qualification in which 
the expression of Rosanna's still gaze suddenly 
seemed reflected, "I mean that it's so interesting 
she should have all the clues." 

Rosanna still gazed; she might even after a 
little have struck a watcher as held in spite of 
herself by some heavy spell. It was an old sense 
— she had already often- had it: when once Gussy 
had got her head up, got away and away as Davey 
called it, she might appear to do what she would 
with her victim; appear, that is, to Gussy her- 
self — the appearance never corresponded for Miss 
Gaw to an admission of her own. Behind the 
appearance, at all events, things on one side and 
the other piled themselves up, and Rosanna cer- 
tainly knew what they were on her side. Never- 

52 



 

theless it was as a vocal note too faintly quavered 
through some loud orchestral sound that she 

heard herself echo: "The clues ?" 

"Why, it's so funny there should be such a 
lot — and all gathered about here!" To this at- 
testation of how everything in the world, for that 
matter, was gathered right there Rosanna felt 
herself superficially yield; and even before she 
knew what was coming — for something clearly 
was — she was strangely conscious of a choice 
somehow involved in her attitude and dependent 
on her mind, and this too as at almost the acutest 
moment of her life. What it came to, with the 
presentiment of forces at play such as she had 
really never yet had to count with, was the ques- 
tion, all for herself, of whether she should be 
patently lying in the profession of a readiness to 
hand the subject of her interest over unreservedly 
to all waiting, all so remarkably gathering con- 
tacts and chances, or whether the act wouldn't 
partake of the very finest strain of her past sin- 
cerity. She was to remember the moment later 
on as if she had really by her definition, by her 
selection, "behaved" — fairly feeling the breath 
of her young man's experience on her cheek be- 
fore knowing with the least particularity what it 
would most be, and deciding then and there to 
swallow down every fear of any cost of anything 
to herself. She felt extraordinary in the presence 
of symptoms, symptoms of life, of death, of dan- 

53 



 

ger, of delight, of what did she know ? But this 
it was exactly that cast derision, by contrast, on 
such poor obscurities as her feelings, and settled 
it for her that when she had professed a few min- 
utes back that she hoped they would all, for his 
possible pleasure in it, catch him up and, so far 
as they might, make him theirs, she wasn't to 
have spoken with false frankness. Queer enough 
at the same time, and a wondrous sign of her 
state of sensibility, that she should see symptoms 
glimmer from so very far off. What was this one 
that was already in the air before Mrs. Bradham 
had so much as answered her question ? 

Well, the next moment at any rate she knew, 
and more extraordinary then than anything was 
the spread of her apprehension, off somehow to 
the incalculable, under Gussy's mention of a 
name. What did this show most of all, however, 
but how little the intensity of her private associa- 
tion with the name had even yet died out, or at 
least how vividly it could revive in a connection 
by which everything in her was quickened? 
"Haughty" Vint, just lately conversed with by 
Cissy in New York, it appeared, and now com- 
ing on to the Bradhams from one day to another, 
had fed the girl with information, it also, and 
more wonderfully, transpired— information about 
Gray's young past, all surprisingly founded on 
close contacts, the most interesting, between the 
pair, as well as the least suspected ever by Ro- 

54 



 

sanna: to such an effect that the transmitted 
trickle of it had after a moment swelled from 
Gussy's lips into a stream by which our friend's 
consciousness was flooded. "Clues" these con- 
nections might well be called when every touch 
could now set up a vibration. It hummed away 
at once like a pressed button — if she had been 
really and in the least meanly afraid of complica- 
tions she might now have sat staring at one that 
would do for oddity, for the oddity of that rela- 
tion of her own with Cissy's source of anecdote 
which could so have come and gone and yet 
thrown no light for her on anything but itself; 
little enough, by what she had tried to make of 
it at the time, though that might have been. It 
had meanwhile scarce revived for her otherwise, 
even if reviving now, as we have said, to intensity, 
that Horton Vint's invitation to her some three 
years before to bestow her hand upon him in 
marriage had been attended by impressions as 
singular perhaps as had ever marked a like case 
in an equal absence of outward show. The con- 
nection with him remaining for her had simply 
been that no young man — in the clear American 
social air — had probably ever approached a 
young woman on such ground with so utter a 
lack of ostensible warrant and had yet at the 
same time so saved the situation for himself, or 
for what he might have called his dignity, and 
even hers; to the positive point of his having 

55 



 

left her with the mystery, in all the world, that 
she could still most pull out from old dim con- 
fusions to wonder about, and wonder all in vain, 
when she had nothing better to do. Everything 
was over between them save the fact that they 
hadn't quarrelled, hadn't indeed so much as dis- 
cussed; but here withal was association, asso- 
ciation unquenched — from the moment a fresh 
breath, as just now, could blow upon it. He had 
had the appearance — it was unmistakeable — of 
absolutely believing she might accept him if he 
but put it to her lucidly enough and let her look 
at him straight enough; and the extraordinary 
thing was that, for all her sense of this at the 
hour, she hadn't imputed to him a real fatuity. 
It had remained with her that, given certain 
other facts, no incident of that order could well 
have had so little to confess by any of its aspects 
to the taint of vulgarity. She had seen it,, she 
believed, as he meant it, meant it with entire 
conviction: he had intended a tribute, of a high 
order, to her intelligence, which he had counted 
on, or at least faced with the opportunity, to 
recognise him as a greater value, taken all round, 
appraised by the whole suitability, than she was 
likely ever again to find offered. He was of course 
to take or to leave, and she saw him stand there 
in that light as he had then stood, not pleading, 
not pressing, not pretending to anything but the 
wish and the capacity to serve, only holding out 

56 



 

her chance, appealing to her judgment, inviting 
her inspection, meeting it without either a shade 
of ambiguity or, so far as she could see, any vanity 
beyond the facts. It had all been wonderful 
enough, and not least so that, although abso- 
lutely untouched and untempted, perfectly lucid 
on her own side and perfectly inaccessible, she 
had in a manner admired him, in a manner al- 
most enjoyed him, in the act of denying him 
hope. Extraordinary in especial had it been that 
he was probably right, right about his value, 
right about his rectitude, of conscious intention at 
least, right even as to his general calculation of 
effect, an effect probably producible on most 
women; right finally in judging that should he 
strike at all this would be the one way. It was 
only less extraordinary that no faintest shade of 
regret, no lightest play of rueful imagination, no 
subordinate stir of pity or wonder, had attended 
her memory of having left him to the mere cold 
comfort of reflection. It was his truth that had 
fallen short, not his error; the soundness, as it 
were, of his claim — so far as his fine intelligence, 
matching her own, that is, could make it sound — 
had had nothing to do with its propriety. She 
had refused him, none the less, without disliking 
* him, at the same time that she was at no mo- 
ment afterwards conscious of having cared whether 
he had suffered. She had been too unaware of 
the question even to remark that she seemed 

57 



 

indifferent; though with a vague impression — so 
far as that went — that suffering was not in his 
chords. His acceptance of his check she could 
but call inscrutably splendid — inscrutably per- 
haps because she couldn't quite feel that it had 
left nothing between them. Something there 
was, something there had to be, if only the marvel, 
so to say, of her present, her permanent, back- 
ward vision of the force with which they had 
touched and separated. It stuck to her somehow 
that they had touched still more than if they had 
loved, held each other still closer than if they 
had embraced: to such and so strange a tune 
had they been briefly intimate. Would any man 
ever look at her so for passion as Mr. Vint had 
looked for reason ? and should her own eyes 
ever again so visit a man's depths and gaze about 
in them unashamed to a tune to match that ad- 
venture? Literally what they had said was 
comparatively unimportant — once he had made 
his errand clear; whereby the rest might all have 
been but his silent exhibition of his personality, 
so to name it, his honour, his assumption, his 
situation, his life, and that failure on her own 
part to yield an inch which had but the more 
let him see how straight these things broke upon 
her. For all the straightness, it was true, the 
fact that might most have affected, not to say 
concerned, her had remained the least expressed. 
It wasn't for her now to know what difference 

58 



 

it could have made that he was in relation with 
Gray Fielder; incontestably, however, their re- 
lation, or their missing of one, hers and Haughty' s, 
flushed anew in the sudden light. 

"Oh I'm so glad he has good friends here then 
— with such a clever one as Mr. Vint we can cer- 
tainly be easy about him." So much Rosanna 
heard herself at last say, and it would doubtless 
have quite served for assent to Gussy's revela- 
tion without the further support given her by 
the simultaneous convergence upon them of va- 
rious members of the party, who exactly struck 
our young woman as having guessed, by the sight 
of hostess and momentous guest withdrawn to- 
gether, that the topic of the moment was there 
to be plucked from their hands. Rosanna was 
now on her feet — she couldn't sit longer and just 
take things; and she was to ask herself after- 
wards with what cold stare of denial she mightn't 
have appeared quite unprecedentedly to face the 
inquiring rout under the sense that now certainly, 
if she didn't take care, she should have nothing 
left of her own. It wasn't that they weren't, 
all laughter and shimmer, all senseless sound and 
expensive futility, the easiest people in the world 
to share with, and several the very prettiest and 
pleasantest, of the vaguest insistence after all, 
the most absurdly small awareness of what they 
were eager about; but that of the three or four 
things then taking place at once the brush across 

S9 



 

her heart of Gray's possible immediate question, 
"Have you brought me over then to live with 

these ? " had most in common with alarm. It 

positively helped her indeed withal that she 
found herself, the next thing, greeting with more 
sincerity of expression than she had, by her con- 
sciousness, yet used Mrs. Bradham's final leap 
to action in the form of "I want him to dinner 
of course right off!" She said it with the big 
brave laugh that represented her main mercy for 
the general public view of her native eagerness, 
an eagerness appraised, not to say proclaimed, 
by herself as a passion for the service of society, 
and in connection with which it was mostly agreed 
that she never so drove her flock before her as 
when paying this theoretic tribute to grace of 
manner. Before Rosanna could ejaculate, moved 
though she was to do so, the question had been 
taken up by the extremely pretty person who 
was known to her friends, and known even to 
Rosanna, as Minnie Undle and who at once put 
in a plea for Mr. Fielder's presence that evening, 
her own having been secured for v it. Before such 
a rate of procedure as this evocation implied even 
Gussy appeared to recoil, but with a prompt 
proviso in favour of the gentleman's figuring 
rather on the morrow, when Mrs. Undle, since 
she seemed so impatient, might again be of the 
party. Mrs. Undle agreed on the spot, though 
by this time Rosanna's challenge had ceased to 

60 



 

hang fire. "But do you really consider that you 
know him so much as that?" — she let Gussy 
have it straight, even if at the disadvantage that 
there were now as ever plenty of people to react, 
to the last hilarity, at the idea that acquaintance 
enjoyed on either side was needfully imputable 
to these participations. "That's just why — if we 
don't know him!" Mrs. Undle further contrib- 
uted; while Gussy declined recognition of the 
relevance of any word of Miss Gaw's. She de- 
clined it indeed in her own way, by a yet stiffer 
illustration of her general resilience; an "Of 
course I mean, dear, that I look to you to bring 
him!" expressing sufficiently her system. —— 

"Then you really expect him when his uncle's 

dying ?" sprang in all honesty from Ro- 

sanna's lips; to be taken up on the instant, how- 
ever, by a voice that was not Gussy's and that 
rang clear before Gussy could speak. 

"There can't be the least question of it — even 
if we're dying ourselves, or even if I am at least !" 
was what Rosanna heard; with Cissy Foy, of a 
sudden supremely exhibited, giving the case at 
once all happy sense, all bright quick harmony 
with their general immediate interest. She pressed 
to Rosanna straight, as if nothing as yet had had 
time to pass between them — which very little 
in fact had; with the result for our young woman 
of feeling helped, by the lightest of turns, not to 
be awkward herself, or really, what came to the 

61 



 

same thing, not to be anything herself. It was a 
fine perception she had had before — of how Cissy 
could on occasion "do" for one, and this, all ex- 
traordinarily and in a sort of double sense, by 
quenching one in her light at the very moment 
she offered it for guidance. She quenched Gussy, 
she was the single person who could, Gussy al- 
most gruntingly consenting; she quenched Minnie 
Undle, she cheapened every other presence, scat- 
tering lovely looks, multiplying happy touches, 
grasping Rosanna for possession, yet at the same 
time, as with her free hand, waving away every 
other connection: so that a minute or two later 
— for it scarce seemed more-^the pair were iso- 
lated, still on the verandah somewhere, but in- 
tensely confronted and talking at ease, or in a 
way that had to pass for ease, with its not matter- 
ing at all whether their companions, dazzled and 
wafted off, had dispersed and ceased to be, or 
whether they themselves had simply been floated 
to where they wished on the great surge of the 
girl's grace. The girl's grace was, after its manner, 
such a force that Miss Gaw had had repeatedly, 
on past occasions, to doubt even while she recog- 
nised — for could a young creature you weren't 
quite sure of use a weapon of such an edge only 
for good ? The young creature seemed at any 
rate now as never yet to give out its play for a 
thing to be counted on and trusted; and with 
Gussy Bradham herself shown just there behind 

62 



 

them as letting it take everything straight out 
of her hands, nobody else at all daring to touch, 
what were you to do but verily feel distinguished 
by its so wrapping you about ? The only sharp- 
ness in what had happened was that with Cissy's 
act of presence Mrs. Bradham had exercised her 
great function of social appraiser by staring and 
then, as under conclusions drawn from it, giving 
way. One might have found it redeemingly soft 
in her that before this particular suggestion she 
could melt, or that in other words Cissy appeared 
the single fact in all the world about which she 
had anything to call imagination. She imagined 
her, she imagined her now, and as dealing some- 
how with their massive friend; which conscious- 
ness, on the latter's part, it must be said, played 
for the moment through everything else. 

Not indeed that there wasn't plenty for the 
girl to fill the fancy with; since nothing could 
have been purer than the stream that she poured 
into Rosanna's as from an upturned crystal urn 
while she repeated over, holding her by the two 
hands, gazing at her in admiration: "I can see* 
how you care for him — I can see, I can see!" 
And she felt indeed, our young woman, how the 
cover was by this light hand whisked off her secret 
— Cissy made it somehow a secret in the act of 
laying it bare; and that she blushed for the felt 
exposure as even Gussy had failed to make her. 
Seeing which her companion but tilted the further 

63 



 

vessel of confidence. "It's too funny, it's too 
wonderful that I too should know something. 
But I do, and I'll tell you how — not now, for I 
haven't time, but as soon as ever I can; which 
will make you see. So what you must do for all 
you're worth," said Cissy, "is to care now more 
than ever. You must keep him from us, because 
we're not good enough and you are; you must 
act in the sense of what you feel, and must feel 
exactly as you've a right to — for, as I say, I know, 
I know!" 

It was impossible, Rosanna seemed to see, that 
a generous young thing should shine out in more 
beauty; so that what in the world might one 
ever keep from her? Surpassingly strange the 
, plea thus radiant on the very brow of the danger ! 
"You mean you know Mr. Fielder's history ? 
from your having met somebody ? " 

"Oh that of course, yes; Gussy, whom I've 
told of my having met Mr. Northover, will have 
told you. That's curious and charming," Cissy 
went on, "and I want awfully we should talk of 
it. But it isn't what I mean by what I know — 
and what you don't, my dear thing!" 

Rosanna couldn't have told why, but she had 
begun to tremble, and also to try not to show it. 
"What I don't know — about Gray Fielder? 
Why, of course there's plenty!" she smiled. 

Cissy still held her hands; but Cissy now was 
grave. "No, there isn't plenty — save so far as 

64 



 

what I mean is enough. And, I haven't told it to 
Gussy. It's too good for her," the girl added. 
"It's too good for anyone but you." 

Rosanna just waited, feeling herself perhaps 
grimace. "What, Cissy, are you talking about ?" 

"About what I heard from Mr. Northover 
when we met him, when we saw so much of him, 
three years ago at Ragatz, where we had gone 
for Mamma and where we went through the 
cure with him. He and I struck up a friendship 
and he often spoke to me of his stepson — who 
wasn't there with him, was at that time off some- 
where in the mountains or in Italy, I forget, but 
to whom I could see he was devoted. He and I 
hit it off beautifully together — he seemed to me 
awfully charming and to like to tell me things. 
So what I allude to is something he said to me." 

"About me?" Rosanna gasped. 

"Yes — I see now it was about you. But it's 
only to-day that I've guessed that. Otherwise, 

otherwise !" And as if under the weight of 

her great disclosure Cissy faltered. 

But she had now indeed made her friend de- 
sire it. "You mean that otherwise you'd have 
told me before?" 

"Yes indeed — and it's such a miracle I didn't. 
It's such a miracle," said Cissy, "that the person 
should all this time have been you — or you have 
been the person. Of course I had no idea that 
all this — everything that has taken place now, by 

65 



 

what I understand — was going so extraordinarily 
to happen. You see he never named Mr. Better- 
man, or in fact, I think," the girl explained, "told 
me anything about him. And he didn't name, 
either, Gray's friend — so that in spite of the im- 
pression made on me you've never till to-day 
been identified." 

Immense, as she went, Rosanna felt, the num- 
ber of things she gave her thus together to think 
about. What was coming she clearly needn't 
fear — might indeed, deep within, happily hold 
her breath for; but the very interest somehow 
made her rest an instant, as for refinement of 
suspense, on the minor surprises. "The impres- 
sion then has .been so great that you call him 
'Gray'?" 

The girl at this ceased holding hands; she 
folded her arms back together across her slim 
young person — the frequent habit of it in her 
was of the prettiest "quaint" effect; she laughed 
as if submitting to some just correction of a free- 
dom. "Oh, but my dear, he did, the delightful 
man — and isn't it borne in upon me that you 
do? Of course the impression was great — and 
if Mr. Northover and I had met younger I don't 
know," her laugh said, "what mightn't have 
happened. No, I never shall have had a greater, 
a more intelligent admirer! As it was we re- 
mained true, secretly true, for fond memory, to 
the end: at least I did, though ever so secretly 

66 



 

— you see I speak of it only now — and I want to 
believe so in his impression. But how I torment 
you ! " she suddenly said in another tone. 

Rosanna, nursing her patience, had a sad slow 
headshake. "I don't understand." 

"Of course you don't — and yet it's too beau- 
tiful. It was about Gray — once when we talked 
of him, as I've told you we repeatedly did. It 
was that he never would look at anyone else." 

Our friend could but appear at least to cast 
about. "Anyone else than whom ? " 

"Why than you," Cissy smiled. "The girl he 
had loved in boyhood. The American girl who, 
years before, in Dresden, had done for him some- 
thing he could never forget." 

"And what had she done?" stared Rosanna. 

"Oh he didn't tell me that I But if you don't] 
take great care, as I say," Cissy went on, "per-j 
haps he may — I mean Mr. Fielder himself mayj 
when we close round him in the way that, in your 
place, as I assure you, I would certainly do everyj 
thing to prevent." 

Rosanna looked about as with a sudden sense 
of weakness, the effect of overstrain; it was ab- 
surd, but these last minutes might almost, with 
their queer action, and as to the ground they 
covered, have been as many formidable days. 
A fine verandah settee again close at hand offered 
her support, and she dropped upon it, as for 
large retrieval of menaced ease, with a need she 

67 1 



 

herself alone could measure. The need was to 
recover some sense of perspective, to be able to 
place her young friend's somehow portentous 
assault off in such conditions, if only of mere 
space and time, as would make for some greater 
convenience of relation with it. It did at once 
help her — and really even for the tone in which 
she smiled across: "So you're sure?" 

Cissy hovered, shining, shifting, yet accepting 
the perspective as it were — when in the world 
had she to fear anyl — and positively painted 
there in bright contradiction, her very grace 
again, after the odd fashion in which it sometimes 
worked, seeming to deny her sincerity, and her 
very candour seeming to deny her gravity. "Sure 
of what ? Sure I'm right about you ?" 

Rosanna took a minute to say — so many things 
worked in her; yet when one of these came up- 
permost, pushing certain of the others back, she 
found for putting it forward a tone grateful to 
her own ear. This tone represented on her part 
too a substitute for sincerity, but that was ex- 
actly what she wanted. "I don't care a fig for 
any anecdote about myself — which moreover it 
j would be very difficult for you to have right. 
j What I ask you if you're certain of is your being 
really not fit for him. Are you absolutely," said 
Miss Gaw, "as bad as that?" 

The girl, placed before her, looked at her now, 
with raised hands folded together, as if she had 
been some seated idol, a great Buddha perched 

68 



 

up on a shrine. "Oh Rosanna, Rosanna !" 

she admiringly, piously breathed. 

But it was not such treatment that could keep 
Miss Gaw from completing her chosen sense. "I 
should be extremely sorry — so far as I claim any 
influence on, him — to interfere against his getting 
over here whatever impressions he may; inter- 
fere by his taking you for more important, in 
any way, than seems really called for." 

"Taking meV Cissy smiled. 

"Taking any of you — the people, in general 
and in particular, who haunt this house. We 
mustn't be afraid for him of his having the in- 
terest, or even the mere amusement, of learning 
all that's to be learnt about iis." 

"Oh Rosanna, Rosanna" — the girl kept it up 
— "how you adore him; and how you make me 
therefore, wretch that I am, fiendishly want to 
see him!" 

But it might quite have glanced now from 
our friend's idol surface. "You're the best of us, 
no doubt — very much; and I immensely hope 
you'll like him, since you've been so extraordi- 
narily prepared. It's to be supposed too that 
he'll have some sense of his own." 

Cissy continued rapt. "Oh but you're deep 
— deep deep deep !" 

It came out as another presence again, that of 
Davey Bradham, who had the air of rather rest- 
lessly looking for her, emerged from one of the 
long windows of the house, just at hand, to meet 

69 



 

Rosanna's eyes. She found herself glad to have 
him back, as if further to inform him. Wasn't it 
after all rather he that was the best of them and 
by no means Cissy? Her face might at any 
rate have conveyed as much while she reported 
of that young lady. "She thinks me so 
deep." 

It made the girl, who had not seen him, turn 
round; but with an immediate equal confidence. 
"And she thinks me, Davey, so good !" 

Davey's eyes were only on Cissy, but Rosanna 
seemed to feel them on herself. "How you must 
have got mixed!" he exclaimed. "But your 
father has come for you," he then said to Ro- 
sanna, who had got up. 

"Father has walked it?" — she was amazed. 

"No, he's there in a hack to take you home — 
and too excited to come in." 

Rosanna's surprise but grew. "Has anything 
happened ?" 

"Wonders — I asked them. Mr. Betterman's 
sitting right up." 

"Really improving ?" Then her mystifi- 
cation spread. " 'Them,' you say?" 

"Why his nurse, as I at least suppose her," 
said Davey, "is with him — apparently to give 
you the expert opinion." 

"Of the fiend's recuperating ? " Cissy cried with 
a wail. And then before her friend's bewilder- 
ment, "How dreadfully horrid!" she added. 

70 



 

"Whose nurse, please?" Rosanna asked of 
Davey. 

"Why, hasn't he got a nurse?" Davey him- 
self, as always, but desired lucidity. "She's 
doing her duty by him all the same!" 

On which Cissy's young wit at once appre- 
hended. "It's one of Mr. Betterman's taking a 
joy-ride in honour of his recovery ! Did you 
ever hear anything so cool ? " 

She had appealed to her friends alike, but 
Rosanna, under the force of her suggestion, was 
already in advance. "Then father himself must 
be ill 1" Miss Gaw had declared, moving rapidly 
to the quarter in which he so incongruously 
waited and leaving Davey to point a rapid moral 
for Cissy's benefit while this couple followed. 

"If he is so upset that he hasn't been trusted 
alone I'll be hanged if I don't just see it!" 

But the marvel was the way in which after an 
instant Cissy saw it too. "You mean because 
he can't stand Mr. Betterman's perhaps not 
dying?" 

"Yes, dear ingenuous child — he has wanted so 
to see him out." 

"Well then, isn't it what we're all wanting?" 

"Most undoubtedly, pure pearl of penetra- 
tion!" Davey returned as they went. "His 
pick-up will be a sell," he ruefully added; "even 
though it mayn't quite kill anyone of us but 
Mr. Gaw!" 

71 



BOOK SECOND 



Graham's view of his case and of all his proprie- 
ties, from the moment of his arrivak was that he 
should hold himself without reserve at his uncle's 
immediate disposition, and even such talk as 
seemed indicated, during the forenoon, with 
Doctor Hatch and Miss Mumby, the nurse then 
in charge, did little to lighten for him the im- 
mense prescription of delicacy. What he learnt 
was far from disconcerting; the patient, aware 
of his presence, had shown for soothed, not for 
agitated; the drop of the tension of waiting had 
had the^ benign effect; he had repeated over to 
his attendant that now "the boy" was there, 
all would be for the best, and had asked also 
with soft iteration if he were having everything 
he wanted. The happy assurance of this right 
turn of their affair, so far as they had got, he was 
now quietly to enjoy : he was to rest two or three 
hours, and if possible to sleep, while Graham, on 
his side, sought a like remedy — after the full in- 
dulgence in which their meeting would take 
place. The excellent fact for "the boy," who 
was two-and-thirty years of age and who now 

72 



 

quite felt as if during the last few weeks he had 
lived through a dozen more, was thus that he 
was doing his uncle good and that somehow, to 
complete that harmony, he might feel the opera- 
tion of an equal virtue. At his invitation, at his 
decision, the idea of some such wondrous matter 
as this had of course presided — for waiting and 
obliging good, which one was simply to open one's 
heart or one's hand to, had struck him ever as 
so little of the common stuff of life that now, 
at closer range, it could but figure as still more 
prodigious. At the same time there was nothing 
he dreaded, by his very nature, more than a fond 
fatuity, and he had imposed on himself from the 
first to proceed at every step as if without con- 
sideration he might well be made an ass of. It 
was true that even such a danger as this presented 
its interest — the process to which he should yield 
would be without precedent for him, and his 
imagination, thank heaven, had curiosity in a 
large measure for its principle; he wouldn't rush 
into peril, however, and flattered himself that 
after all he should not recognise its symptoms 
too late. 

What he said to himself just now on the spot 
was, at any rate, that he should probably have 
been more excited if he hadn't been so amused. 
To be amused to a high pitch while his nearest 
kinsman, apparently nursing, as he had been told, 
a benevolence, lay dying a few rooms off — let 

73 



 

this impute levity to our young man only till 
we understand that his liability to recreation 
represented in him a function serious indeed. 
Everything played before him, everything his 
senses embraced; and since his landing in New 
York on the morning before this the play had 
been of a delightful violence. No slightest aspect 
or briefest moment of it but had held and, so to 
say, rewarded him: if he had come back at last 
for impressions, for emotions, for the sake of the 
rush upon him of the characteristic, these things 
he was getting in a measure beyond his dream. 
It was still beyond his dream that what every- 
thing merely seen from the window of his room 
meant to him during these first hours should 
move him first to a smile of such ecstasy, and 
then to such an inward consumption of his smile, 
as might have made of happiness a substance 
you could sweetly put under your tongue. He 
recognised — that was the secret, recognised wher- 
ever he looked — and knew that when, from far 
back, during his stretch of unbroken absence, he 
had still felt, and liked to feel, what air had orig- 
inally breathed upon him, these piercing intensi- 
ties of salience had really peopled the vision. 
He had much less remembered the actual than 
forecast the inevitable, and the huge involved 
necessity of its all showing as he found it seemed 
fairly to shout in his ear. He had brought with 
him a fine intention, one of the finest of which 

74 



 

he was capable, and wasn't it, he put to himself, 
already working ? Wasn't he gathering in a per- 
fect bloom of freshness the fruit of his design 
rather to welcome the impression to extravagance, 
if need be, than to undervalue it by the breadth 
of a hair ? Inexpert he couldn't help being, but 
too estranged to melt again at whatever touch 
might make him, that he'd be hanged if he couldn't 
help, since what was the great thing again but 
to hold up one's face to any drizzle of light ? 

There it was, the light, in a mist of silver, even 
as he took in the testimony of his cool bedimmed 
room, where the air was toned by the closing of 
the great green shutters. It was ample and ele- 
gant, of an American elegance, which was so un- 
like any other, and so still more unlike any lapse 
of it, ever met by him, that some of its material 
terms and items held him as in rapt contempla- 
tion; what he had wanted, even to intensity, 
being that things should prove difFerent, should 
positively glare with opposition — there would be 
no fun at all were they only imperfectly like, as 
that wouldn't in the least mean character. Their 
character might be if it would in their consistently 
having none — than which deficiency nothing was 
more possible; but he should have to decline to 
be charmed by unsuccessful attempts at sorts of 
expression he had elsewhere known more or less 
happily achieved. This particular disappoint- < 
ment indeed he was clearly not in for, since what 

75 



 

could at once be more interesting than thus to 
note that the range and scale kept all their parts 
together, that each object or effect disowned con- 
nections, as he at least had all his life felt con- 
nections, and that his cherished hope of the fresh 
start and the broken link would have its measure 
filled to the brim. There was an American way 
for a room to be a room, a table a table, a chair a 
chair and a book a book — let alone a picture on 
a wall a picture, and a cold gush of water in a 
bath of a hot morning a promise of purification; 
and of this license all about him, in fine, he be- 
held the refreshing riot. 

It cast on him for the time a spell; he moved 
about with soft steps and long pauses, staring 
out between the slats of the shutters, which he 
gently worked by their attachment, and then 
again living, with a subtlety of sense that it was 
a pleasure to exercise, into the conditions rep- 
resented by whatever more nearly pressed. It 
was not only that the process of assimilation, un- 
like any other he had yet been engaged in, might 
stop short, to disaster, if he so much as breathed 
too hard; but that if he made the sufficient sur- 
render he might absolutely himself be assimilated 
— and that was truly an experience he couldn't 
but want to have. The great thing he held on 
to withal was a decent delicacy, a dread of ap- 
pearing even to himself to take big things for 
granted. This of itself was restrictive as to free- 

76 



 

doms — it stayed familiarities, it kept uncer- 
tainty cool; for after all what had his uncle done 
but cause to be conveyed to him across the sea 
the bare wish that he should come? He had 
straightway come in consequence, but on no 
explanation and for no signified reward; he had 
come simply to avoid a possible ugliness in his 
not coming. Generally addicted to such avoid- 
ances, to which it indeed seemed to him that the 
quest of beauty was too often reduced, he had 
found his reason sufficient until the present hour, 
when it was as if all reasons, all of his own at 
least, had suddenly abandoned him, to the effect 
of his being surrounded only with those of others, 
of which he was up to now ignorant, but which 
somehow hung about the large still place, some- 
how stiffened the vague summer Sunday and 
twinkled in the universal cleanness, a real reve- 
lation to him of that possible immunity in things. 
He might have been sent for merely to be blown 
up for the relief of the old man's mind on the 
perversity and futility of his past. There was 
before him at all events no gage of anything else, 
no intimation other than his having been, ma- 
terially speaking, preceded by preparations, to 
make him throw himself on a survey of prospects. 
What was before him at the least was a "big" 
experience — even to have come but to be cursed 
and dismissed would really be a bigger thing than 
yet had befallen him. Not the form but the fact 

77 



 

of the experience accordingly mattered — so that 
wasn't it there to a fine intensity by his standing 
ever and anon at the closed door of his room and 
feeling that with his ear intertt enough he could 
catch the pressure on the other side ? 

The pressure was at last unmistakeable, we 
note, in the form of Miss Mumby, who, having 
gently tapped, appeared there both to remark to 
him that he must surely at last want his luncheon 
and to affect him afresh and in the supreme de- 
gree as a vessel of the American want of corre- 
spondence. Miss Mumby was ample, genial, 
familiar and more radiantly clean than he had 
ever known any vessel, to whatever purpose 
destined; also the number of things she took for 
granted — if it was a question of that, or perhaps 
rather the number of things of which she didn't 
doubt and was incapable of doubting, surrounded 
her together with a kind of dazzling aura, a special 
radiance of disconnection. She wore a beautiful 
white dress, and he scarce knew what apparatus 
of spotless apron and cuffs and floating streamers 
to match; yet she could only again report to him 
of the impression that had most jumped at him 
from the moment of his arrival. He saw in a 
moment that any difficulty on his part of begin- 
ning with her at some point in social space, so 
to say, at which he had never begun before with 
any such person, would count for nothing in face 
of her own perfect power to begin. The faculty 

78 



 

of beginning would be in truth Miss Mumby's 
very genius, and in the moment of his appre- 
hension of this he felt too — he had in fact already 
felt it at their first meeting — how little his pale 
old postulates as to persons being "such" might 
henceforth claim to serve him. What person 
met by him during his thirty hours in American 
air was "such" again as any other partaker of 
contact had appeared or proved, no matter where, 
before his entering it ? What person had not at 
once so struck him in the light of violent repudia- 
tion of type, as he might save for his sensibility 
have imputed type, that nothing else in the case 
seemed predicable? He might have seen Miss 
Mumby, he was presently to recognise, in the 
light of a youngish mother perhaps, a sister, a 
cousin, a friend, even a possible bride, for these 
were aspects independent of type and bound- 
lessly free of range; but a "trained nurse" was 
a trained nurse, and that was a category of the 
most evolved — in spite of which what category 
in all the world could have lifted its head in Miss 
Mumby's aura ? 

Still, she might have been a pleasant cousin, 
a first cousin, the very first a man had ever had 
and not in any degree "removed," while she 
thus proclaimed the cheerful ease of everything 
and everyone, her own above all, and made him 
yield on the spot to her lightest intimation. He 
couldn't possibly have held off from her in any 

79 



 

way, and if this was in part because he always 
collapsed at a touch before nurses, it was at the 
same time not at all the nurse in her that now so 
afFected him, but the incalculable other force, 
of which he had had no experience and which 
was apparently that of the familiar in tone and 
manner. He had known, of a truth, familiarity 
greater— much greater, but only with greater oc- 
casions and supports for it; whereas on Miss 
Mumby's part it seemed independent of any or 
of every motive. He could scarce have said in 
fine, as he followed her to their repast, at which 
he foresaw in an instant that they were both to 
sit down, whether it more alarmed or just more 
coolingly enveloped him; his slight first bewilder- 
ment at any rate had dropped — he had already 
forgotten the moment wasted two or three hours 
before in wondering, with his sense of having 
known Nurses who gloried in their title, how his 
dear second father, for instance, would in his 
final extremity have liked the ministrations of a 
Miss, f By those he himself presently enjoyed in 
such different conditions, that is from across the 
table, bare and polished and ever so delicately 
charged, of the big dusky, yet just a little breezy 
dining-room, by those in short under which every 
association he had ever had with anything crashed 
down to pile itself as so much more tinklingly 
shivered glass at Miss Mumby's feet, that sort 
of question was left far behind — and doubtless 

80 



 

would have been so even if the appeal of the 
particular refection served to them had alone" 
had the case in hand. i'Trn going to make you 
like our food, so you might as well begin at once," 
his companion had announced; and he felt it on 
the spot as scarce less than delicious that this 
element too should play, and with such fineness, 
into that harmony of the amusingly exotic which 
was, under his benediction, working its will on 
him. "Oh yes," she rejoiced in answer to his 
exhibition of the degree in which what was be- 
fore him did stir again to sweetness a chord of 
memory, "oh yes, food's a great tie, it's like 
language — you can always understand your own, 
whereas in Europe I had to learn about six 
others." 

Miss Mumby had been to Europe, and he saw 
soon enough how there was nowhere one could 
say she hadn't gone and nothing one could say 
she hadn't done — one's perception could bear 
only on what she hadn't become; so that, as he 
thus perceived, though she might have affected 
Europe even as she was now affecting him, she 
was a pure negation of its having affected herself, 
unless perhaps by adding to her power to make 
him feel how little he could impose on her. She 
knew all about his references while he only missed 
hers, and that gave her a tremendous advantage 
— or would have done so hadn't she been too 
much his cousin to take it. He at any rate recog- 

81 



 

nised in a moment that the so many things she 
had had to learn to understand over there were 
not forms of speech but alimentary systems — as 
to which view he quite agreed with her that the 
element of the native was equally rooted in both 
supports of life. This gave her of course her op- 
portunity of remarking that she had indeed made 
for the assimilation of "his" cookery— which- 
ever of the varieties his had most been — scarce 
less an effort than she must confess now to making 
for that of his terms of utterance; where she had 
at once again the triumph that he was nowhere, 
by his own reasoning, if he pretended to an affinity 
with the nice things they were now eating and 
yet stood off from the other ground. "Oh I 
understand you, which appears to be so much 
more than you do me!" he laughed; "but am 
I really committed to everything because I'm 
committed, in the degree you see me, oh yes, to 
waffles and maple syrup, followed, and on such 
a scale, by melons and ice-cream ? You see in 
the one case I have but to take in, and in the 
other have to give out: so can't I have, in a quiet 
way the American palate without emitting the 
American sounds?" Thus was he on the 
straightest flattest level with Miss Mumby— it 
stretched, to his imagination, without a break, 
a rise or a fall, a perte de vue; and thus was it 
already attested that the Miss Mumbys (for it 
was evident there would be thousands of them) 

82 



 

were in society, or were, at any rate, not out of 
it, society thereby becoming clearly colossal. 
What was it, moreover, but the best society — 
as who should say anywhere — when his com- 
panion made the bright point that if anything 
had to -do with sounds the palate did ? returning 
with it also to the one already made, her due 
warning that she wasn't going to have him not 
like everything. "But I do, I do, I do," he de- 
clared, with his mouth full of a seasoned and 
sweetened, a soft, substantial coldness and rich- 
ness that were at once the revelation of a world 
and the consecration of a fate; "I revel in every- 
thing, I already wallow, behold: I move as in a 
dream, I assure you, and I only fear to wake up." 
"Well, I don't know as I want you to wallow, 
and I certainly don't want you to fear — though 
you'll wake up soon enough, I guess," his enter- 
tainer continued, "whatever you do. You'll 
wake up to some of our realities, and — well, we 
won't want anything better for you: will we, 
Doctor ? " Miss Mumby freely proceeded on their 
being joined for a moment by the friendly phy- 
sician who had greeted our young man, on his 
uncle's behalf, at his hour of arrival, and who, 
having been again for awhile with their interest- 
ing host, had left the second nurse in charge and 
was about to be off to other cares^ "I'm saying 
to Mr. Fielder that he's got to wake up to some 
pretty big things," she explained to Doctor Hatch, 

83 



 

whom it struck Gray she addressed rather as he 
had heard doctors address nurses than nurses 
doctors; a fact contributing offhand to his aware- 
ness, already definite, that everyone addressed 
everyone as he had nowhere yet heard the ad- 
dress perpetrated, and that so, evidently, there 
were questions connected with it that must yet 
wait over. It was pertinently to be felt further- 
more that Doctor Hatch's own freedom, which 
also had quite its own rare freshness of note, 
shared in the general property of the whole ap- 
peal to him, the appeal of the very form of the 
great sideboard, the very "school," though yet 
unrecognised by him, of the pictures hung about, 
the very look and dress, the apparently odd 
identity, of the selected and arrayed volumes in 
a bookcase charged with ornament and occupying 
the place of highest dignity in the room, to take 
his situation for guaranteed as it was surely not 
common for earthly situations to be. This he 
could feel, however, without knowing, to any 
great purpose, what it really meant; and he was 
afterwards even scarce to know what had further 
taken place, under Doctor Hatch's blessing, be- 
fore he passed out of the house to the verandah 
and the grounds, as their limitations of reach 
didn't prevent their being called, and gave him- 
self up to inquiries now permittedly direct. 

Doctor Hatch's message or momentary act of 
quaint bright presence came to him thus, on/the 

84 



 

verandah, while shining expanses opened, as an 
invitation to some extraordinary confidence, some 
flight of optimism without a precedent, as a posi- 
tive hint in fine that it depended on himself alone 
to step straight into the chariot of the sun, which 
on his mere nod would conveniently descend 
there to the edge of the piazza, and whirl away 
for increase of acquaintance with the time, as it 
was obviously going to be, of his life. This was 
but his reading indeed of the funny terms in 
which the delightful man put it to him that he 
seemed by his happy advent to have brought on 
for his uncle a prospect, a rise of pitch, not dis- 
similar from that sort of vision; by so high a tide 
of ease had the sick room above been flooded, 
and such a lot of good would clearly await the 
patient from seeing him after a little and at the 
perfect proper moment. It was to be that of 
Mr. Betterman's competent choice: he lay there 
as just for the foretaste of it, which was wholly 
tranquillising, and could be trusted — what else 
did doctor and nurse engage for? — to know the 
psychological hour on its striking and then, to 
complete felicity, have his visitor introduced. 
His present mere assurance of the visitor was in 
short so agreeable to him, and by the same 
token to Doctor Hatch himself— which was above 
all what the latter had conveyed — that the im- 
plication of the agreeable to Graham in return 
might fairly have been some imponderable yet 

85 



 

ever so sensible tissue, voluminous interwoven 
gold and silver, flung as a mantle over his 
shoulders while he went. Gray had never felt 
around him any like envelope whatever; so that 
on his looking forth at all the candid clearness — 
which struck him too, ever so amusingly, as even 
more candid when occasionally and aggressively, 
that is residentially, obstructed than when not — 
what he inwardly and fantastically compared it 
to was some presented quarto page, vast and 
fair, ever so distinctly printed and ever so un- 
expectedly vignetted, of a volume of which the 
leaves would be turned for him one by one and 
with no more trouble on his own part than when 
a friendly service beside him at the piano, where 
he so often sat, relieved him, from sheet to sheet, 
of touching his score. 

Wasn't he thus now again "playing," as it had 
been a lifelong resource to him to play in that 
other posture? — a question promoted by the 
way the composition suddenly broke into the 
vividest illustrational figure, that of a little man 
encountered on one of his turns of the verandah 
and who, affecting him at first as a small waiting 
and watching, an almost crouching gnome, the 
neat domestic goblin of some old Germanic, some 
harmonised, familiarised legend, sat and stared 
at him from the depths of an arrested rocking- 
chair after a fashion nothing up to then had led 
him to preconceive. This was a different note 

86 



 

from any yet, a queer, sharp, hard particle in 
all the softness; and it was sensible too, oddly 
enough, that the small force of their concussion 
but grew with its coming over him the next mo- 
ment that he simply had before him Rosanna 
Gaw's prodigious parent. Of course it was Mr. 
Gaw, whom he had never seen, and of whom 
Rosanna in the old time had so little talked; her 
mother alone had talked of him in those days, 
and to his own mother only — with whom Gray 
had indeed himself afterwards talked not a little; 
but the intensity of the certitude came not so 
much by any plain as by quite the most round- 
about presumption, the fact of his always having 
felt that she required some strange accounting 
for, and that here was the requirement met by 
just the ripest revelation. She had been in- 
volved in something, produced by something, 
intimately pressing upon her and yet as different 
as possible from herself; and here was the con- 
centrated difference-r-which showed him too, with 
each lapsing second, its quality of pressure. Abel 
Gaw struck him in this light as very finely 
blanched, as somehow squeezed together by the 
operation of an inward energy or necessity, and 
as animated at the same time by the conviction 
that, should he sit there long enough and still 
enough, the young man from Europe, known to 
be on the premises, might finally reward his 
curiosity. Mr. Gaw was curiosity embodied — 

87 



 

Gray was by the end of the minute entirely as- 
sured of that; it in fact quite seemed to him that 
he had never yet in all his life caught the prying 
passion so shamelessly in the act. Shamelessly, 
he was afterwards to remember having explained 
to himself, because his sense of the reach of the 
sharp eyes in the small white face, and of their 
not giving way for a moment before his own, 
suggested to him, even if he" could scarce have 
said why to that extent, the act of listening at 
the door, at the very keyhole, of a room, com- 
bined with the attempt to make it good under 
sudden detection. 

So it was, at any rate, that our speculative 
friend, the impression of the next turn of the 
case aiding, figured the extension, without forms, 
without the shade of a form, of their unmitigated 
mutual glare. The initiation of this exchange by 
the little old gentleman in the chair, who gave 
for so long no sign of moving or speaking, couldn't 
but practically determine in Graham's own face 
some resistance to the purpose exhibited and for 
which it was clear no apology impended. By the 
time he had recognised that his presence was in 
question for Mr. Gaw with such an intensity as 
it had never otherwise, he felt, had the benefit 
of, however briefly, save under some offered gage 
or bribe, he had also made out that no "form" 
would survive for twenty seconds in any close 
relation with the personage, and that if ever he 

88 



 

had himself known curiosity as to what might 
happen when manners were consistently enough 
ignored it was a point on which he should at once 
be enlightened. His fellow-visitor, of whose be- 
ing there Doctor Hatch and Miss Mumby were 
presumably unaware, continued to ignore every- 
thing but the opportunity he enjoyed and the 
certainty that Graham would contribute to it — 
which certainty made in fact his profit. The 
profit, that is, couldn't possibly fail unless Gray 
should turn his back and walk off"; which was 
of course possible, but would then saddle Gray 
himself with the repudiation of forms: so that — 
yes, infallibly — in proportion as the young man 
had to be commonly civil would Mr. Gaw's per- 
haps unholy satisfaction of it be able to prevail. 
The young man had taken it home that he couldn't 
simply stare long enough for successful defence 
by the time that, presently moving nearer, he 
uttered his adversary's name with no intimation 
of a doubt. Mr. Gaw failed, Gray was afterwards 
to inform Rosanna, "to so much as take this 
up"; he was left with everything on his hands 
but the character of his identity, the indications 
of his face, the betrayals he should so much less 
succeed in suppressing than his adversary would 
succeed in reading them. The figure presented 
hadn't stirred from his posture otherwise than 
by a motion of eye just perceptible as Graham 
moved; it was drinking him in, our hero felt, 

89 



 

and by this treatment of the full cup, continuously 
applied to the lips, stillness was of course imposed. 
It didn't again so much as recognise, by any sign 
given, Graham's remark that an acquaintance 
with Miss Gaw from of old involved naturally 
their acquaintance: there was no question of 
Miss Gaw, her friend found himself after another 
minute divining, as there was none of objects 
or appearances immediately there about them; 
the question was of something a thousand times 
more relevant and present, of something the in- 
terloper's silence, far more than breathed words 
could have done, represented the fond hope of 
mastering. 

Graham thus held already, by the old man's 
conviction, a secret of high value, yet which, 
with the occasion stretched a little, would prac- 
tically be at his service — so much as that at least, 
with the passage of another moment, he had con- 
cluded to; and all the while, in the absurdest 
way, without his guessing, without his at all 
measuring, his secret himself. Mr. Gaw fairly 
made him want to — want, that is, as a prelim- 
inary or a stopgap, to guess what it had best, 
most desirably and most effectively, become; for 
shouldn't he positively like to have something of 
the sort in order just to disoblige this gentleman ? 
Strange enough how it came to him at once as a 
result of the father's refusal of attention to any 
connection he might have glanced at with the 

90 



 

daughter, strange enough how it came to him, 
under the first flush of heat he had known since 
his arrival, that two could play at such a game 
and that if Rosanna's interests were to be so 
slighted her relative himself should miss even the 
minimum of application as one of them. "He 
must have wanted to know, he must have wanted 

to know !" this young woman was on a later 

day to have begun to explain; without going on, 
however, since by that time Gray had rather 
made out, the still greater rush of his impressions 
helping, the truth of Mr. Gaw's desire. It bore, 
that appetite, upon a single point and, daughter 
or no daughter, on nothing else in the world — 
the question of what Gray's "interest," in the 
light of his uncle's intentions, might size up to; 
those intentions having, to the Gaw imagination, 
been of course apprehensible on the spot, and 
within the few hours that had lapsed, by a nephew 
even of but rudimentary mind. At the present 
hour meanwhile, short of the miracle which our 
friend's counter-scrutiny alone could have brought 
about, there worked for this young intelligence, 
and with no small sharpness, the fact itself of 
such a revealed relation to the ebb of their host's 
life — upon which was thrust the appearance of 
its being, watch in hand, all impatiently, or in 
other words all offensively, timed. The very air 
at this instant tasted to Gray, quite as if some- 
thing under his tongue had suddenly turned from 

9i 



 

the sweet to the appreciably sour, of an assump- 
tion diffused through it in respect to the rudi- 
ments of mind. He was afterwards to date the 
breaking-in upon him of the general measure of 
the smallest vision of business a young man might 
self-respectingly confess to from Mr. Gaw's ex- 
traordinary tacit "Oh come, you can't fool me: 
don't I know you know what I want to know — 
don't I know what it must mean for you to have 
been here since six o'clock this morning with 
nothing whatever else to do than just to take it 
in?" 

That was it — Gray was to have taken in the 
more or less definite value involved for him in 
his uncle's supposedly near extinction, and was 
to be capable, if not of expressing it on the spot 
in the only terms in which a value of any sort 
could exist for this worthy, yet still at least of 
liability to such a betrayal as would yield him 
something to conclude upon. It was only after- 
wards, once more, that our young man was to 
master the logic of the conclusive as it prevailed 
for Mr. Gaw; what concerned his curiosity was 
to settle whether or no they were in presence 
together of a really big fact — distinguishing as 
the Gaw mind did among such dimensions and 
addressed as it essentially was to a special ques- 
tion — a question as yet unrecognised by Gray. 
He was subsequently to have his friend's word 
to go upon — when, in the extraordinary light of 

92 



 

Rosanna's explication, he read clear what he had 
been able on the verandah but half to glimmer 
out: the queer truth of Mr. Gaw's hunger to 
learn to what extent he had anciently, to what 
degree he had irremediably, ruined his whilom 
associate. He didn't know— .so strange was it, 
at the time and since, that, thanks to the way 
Mr. Betterman had himself fixed things, he 
couldn't be sure; but what he wanted, and what 
he hung about so displeasingly to sniff up the 
least stray sign of, was a confirmation of his 
belief that Doctor Hatch's and Miss Mumby's 
patient had never really recovered from the 
wound of years before. They were nursing him 
now for another complaint altogether, this one 
admittedly such as must, with but the scantest 
further reprieve, dispose of him; whereas doubts 
were deep, as Mr. Gaw at least entertained them, 
as to whether the damage he supposed his own 
just resentment to have inflicted when propriety 
and opportunity combined to inspire him was 
amenable even to nursing the most expert or to 
medication the most subtle. These mysteries of 
calculation were of course impenetrable to Gray 
during the moments at which we see him so al- 
most indescribably exposed at once and rein- 
forced; but the effect of the sharper and sharper 
sense as of a spring pressed by his companion was 
that a whole consciousness suddenly welled up in 
him and that within a few more seconds he had 

93 



 

become aware of a need absolutely adverse to 
any trap that might be laid for his candour. He 
could as little have then said why as he could 
vividly have phrased it under the knowledge to 
come, but that his mute interlocutor desired some- 
how their association in a judgment of what his 
uncle was "worth," a judgment from which a 
comparatively conceited nephew might receive an 
incidental lesson, played through him as a certi- 
tude and produced quite another inclination. 
That recognition of the pleasant on which he had 
been floating affirmed itself as in the very face 
of so embodied a pretension to affirm the direct 
opposite, to thrust up at him in fine a horrid con- 
tradiction — a contradiction which he next heard 
himself take, after the happiest fashion, the 
straightest way to rebut. 

"I'm sure you'll be glad to know that I seem 
to be doing my uncle a tremendous lot of good. 
They tell me I'm really bringing him round" — 
and Graham smiled down at little blanched Mr. 
Gaw. "I don't despair at all of his getting much 
better." 

It was on this that for the first time Mr. Gaw 

became articulate. "Better ?" he strangely 

quavered, and as if his very eyes questioned such 
conscious flippancy. 

"Why yes — through cheering him up. He 
takes, I gather," Gray went on, " as much pleasure 
as I do — — !" His assurance, however, had 

94 



 

within the minute dropped a little — the effect of 
it might really reach, he apprehended, beyond 
his idea. The old man had been odd enough, 
but now of a sudden he looked sick, and that 
one couldn't desire. 

"'Pleasure' ?" he was nevertheless able 

to echo; while it struck Gray that no sound so 
weak had ever been so sharp, or none so sharp 
ever so weak. "Pleasure in dying; — > — ?" Mr. 
Gaw asked in this flatness of doubt. 

"But my dear sir," said Gray, his impulse to 
be jaunty still nevertheless holding out a little, 
"but, my dear sir, if, as it strikes me, he isn't 
dying ?" 

"Oh twaddle!" snapped Mr. Gaw with the 
emphasis of his glare — shifted a moment, Gray 
next saw, to a new object in range. Gray felt 
himself even before turning for it rejoined by 
Miss Mumby, who, rounding the corner of the 
house, had paused as in presence of an odd con- 
junction; not made the less odd moreover by 
Mr. Gaw's instant appeal to her. "You think 
he ain't then going to ? " 

He had to leave it at that, but Miss Mumby 
supplied, with the loudest confidence, what ap- 
peared to be wanted. "He ain't going to get 
better? Oh we hope so!" she declared to Gra- 
ham's delight. 

It helped him to contribute in his own way. 
"Mr. Gaw's surprise seems for his holding out !" 

95 



 

"Oh I guess he'll hold out," Miss Mumby was 
pleased to say. 

"Then if he ain't dying what's the fuss about?" 
Mr. Gaw wanted to know. 

"Why there ain't any fuss — but what you 
seem to make," Miss Mumby could quite assure 
him. 

"Oh well, if you answer for it !" He got 

up on this, though with an alertness that, to 
Gray's sense, didn't work quite truly, and stood 
an instant looking from one of his companions 
to the other, while our young man's eyes, for 
their part, put a question to Miss Mumby 's — 
a question which, articulated, would have had 
the sense of "What on earth's the matter with 
him ? " There seemed no knowing how Mr. 
Gaw would take things — as Miss Mumby, for 
that matter, appeared also at once to reflect. 

"We're sure enough not to want to have you 
sick too," she declared indeed with more cheer 
than apprehension; to which she added, however, 
to cover all the ground, "You just leave Mr. 
Betterman to us and take care of yourself. We 
never say die and we won't have you say it — 
either about him or anyone else, Mr. Gaw." 

This gentleman, so addressed, straightened and 
cleared himself in such a manner as to show that 
he saw, for the moment, Miss Mumby's point; 
which he then, a wondrous small concentration 
of studied blankness — studied, that is, his com- 

96 



 

panions were afterwards both to show they had 
felt— commemorated his appreciation of in a tiny, 
yet triumphant, "Well, that's all right!" 

"It ain't so right but what I'm going to see 
you home," Miss Mumby returned with au- 
thority; adding, however, for Graham's benefit, 
that she had come down to tell him his uncle 
was now ready. "You just go right up — you'll 
find Miss Goodenough there. And you'll see for 
yourself," she said, "how fresh he is!" 

"Thanks — that will be beautiful!" Gray 
brightly responded; but with his eyes on Mr. 
Gaw, whom of a sudden, somehow, he didn't 
like to leave. 

It at any rate determined on the little man's 
part a surprised inquiry. "Then you haven't 
seen him yet — with your grand account of him ?" 

"No — but the account," Gray smiled, "has 
an authority beyond mine. Besides," he kept on 
after this gallant reference, "I feel what I shall 
do for him." 

"Oh they'll have great times !" — Miss Mumby, 
with an arm at the old man's service, bravely 
guaranteed it. But she also admonished Graham: 
"Dqn't keep him waiting, and mind what Miss 
Goodenough tells you ! So now, Mr. Gaw — you're 
to mind me\" she concluded; while this subject 
of her more extemporised attention so far com- 
plied as slowly to face with her in the direction 
of the other house. Gray wondered about him, 

97 



 

but immensely trusted Miss Mumby, and only 
watched till he saw them step off together to the 
lawn, Mr. Gaw independent of support, with 
something in his consciously stiffened even if not 
painfully assumed little air, as noted thus from 
behind, that quite warranted his protectress. 
Seen that way, yes, he was a tremendous little 
person; and Gray, excited, immensely readvised 
and turning accordingly to his own business, felt 
the assault of impressions fairly shake him as he 
went — shake him though it apparently seemed 
most capable of doing but to the effect of hilarity. 



98 



II 

Whether or no by its so different appearance 
from that of Mr. Gaw, the figure propped on 
pillows in the vast cool room and lighted in such 
a way that the clear deepening west seemed to 
flush toward it, through a wide high window, in 
the interest of its full effect, impressed our young 
man as massive and expansive, as of a beautiful 
bland dignity indeed — though emulating Rosan- 
na's relative, he was at first to gather, by a 
perfect readiness to stare rather than speak. 
Miss Goodenough had hovered a little, for full 
assurance, but then had thrown off with a timbre 
of voice never yet used for Gray's own ear in any 
sick room, "Well, I guess you won't come to 
blows!" and had left them face to face — besides 
leaving the air quickened by the freedom of her 
humour. They were face to face for the time 
across an interval which, to do her justice, she 
had not taken upon herself to deal with directly; 
this in spite of Gray's apprehension at the end 
Of a minute that she might, by the touch of her 
hand or the pitch of her spirit, push him further 
forward than he had immediately judged decent 
to advance. He had stopped at a certain dis- 
tance from the great grave bed, stopped really 
for consideratipn and deference, or through the 

99 



 

instinct of submitting himself first of all to ap- 
proval, or at least to encouragement; the space, 
not great enough for reluctance and not small 
enough for presumption, showed him ready to 
obey any sign his uncle should make. Mr. Bet- 
terman struck him, in this high quietude of con- 
templation, much less as formidable than as 
mildly and touchingly august; he had not sup- 
posed him, he became suddenly aware, so great 
a person — a presence like that of some weary 
veteran of affairs, one of the admittedly eminent 
whose last words would be expected to figure in 
history. The large fair face, rather square than 
heavy, was neither clouded nor ravaged, but 
finely serene; the silver-coloured hair seemed to 
bind the broad high brow as with a band of splen- 
did silk, while the eyes rested on Gray with an 
air of acceptance beyond attestation by the mere 
play of cheer or the comparative gloom of re- 
lief. 

"Ah le beau type, le beau type!" was during 
these instants the visitor's inward comment 
breaking into one of the strange tongues that 
experience had appointed him privately to use, 
in many a case, for the appropriation of aspects 
and appearances. It was not till afterwards that 
he happened to learn how his uncle had been 
capable, two or three hours before seeing him, 
of offering cheek and chin to the deft ministra- 
tion of a barber, a fact highly illuminating, though 

ioo 



 

by that time the gathered lights were thick. 
What the patient owed on the spot to the sacri- 
fice, he easily made out, was that look as of the 
last refinement of preparation, that positive 
splendour of the immaculate, which was really, 
on one's taking it all in, but part of an earnest 
recognition of his guest's own dignity. The grave 
beauty of the personal presence, the vague an- 
ticipation as of something that might go on to 
be commemorated for its example, the great 
pure fragrant room, bathed in the tempered 
glow of the afternoon's end, the general lucidity 
and tranquillity and security of the whole pre- 
sented case, begot in fine, on our young friend's 
part, an extraordinary sense that as he himself 
was important enough to be on show, so these 
peculiar perfections that met him were but so 
many virtual honours rendered and signs of the 
high level to which he had mounted. On show, 
yes — that was it, and more wonderfully than 
could be said: Gray was sure after a little of 
how right he was to stand off" as yet in any in- 
terest of his own significance that might be in- 
volved. There was clearly something his uncle 
so wanted him to be that he should run no pos- 
sible danger of being it to excess, and that if he 
might only there and then grasp it he would ask 
but to proceed, for decency's sake, according to 
his lights: just as so short a time before a like 
force of suggestion had played upon him from 

IOI 



 

Mr. Gaw— each of these appeals clothing him 
in its own way with such an oddity of pertinence, 
such a bristling set of attributes. This wait of 
the parties to the present one for articulate ex- 
pression, on either side, of whatever it was that 
might most concern them together, promised also 
to last as the tension had lasted down on the 
verandah, and would perhaps indeed have drawn 
itself further out if Gray hadn't broken where he 
stood into a cry of admiration — since it could 
scarcely be called less — that blew to the winds 
every fear of overstepping. 

"It's really worth one's coming so far, uncle, 
if you don't mind my saying so — it's really worth 
a great pilgrimage to see anything so splendid." 

The old man heard, clearly, as by some process 
that was still deeply active; and then after a 
pause that represented, Gray was sure, no failure 
at all of perception, but only the wide embrace 
of a possibility of pleasure, sounded bravely back: 
"Does it come up to what you've seen?" 

It was Gray rather who was for a moment 
mystified— though only to further spontaneity 
when he had caught the sense of the question. 
"Oh, you come up to everything — by which I 
mean, if I may, that nothing comes up to you ! 
I mean, if I may," he smiled, "that you yourself, 
uncle, affect me as the biggest and most native 
American impression that I can possibly be ex- 
posed to." 

102 



 

"Well," said Mr. Betterman, and again as with 
a fond deliberation, "what I'm going to like, I 
see, is to listen to the way you talk. That," he 
added with his soft distinctness, a singleness of 
note somehow for the many things meant, "that, 
I guess, is about what I most wanted you to come 
for. Unless it be to look at you too. I like to 
look right at you." 

"Well," Gray harmoniously laughed again, "if 

even that can give you pleasure !" He stood 

as for inspection, easily awkward, pleasantly loose, 
holding up his head as if to make the most of no 
great stature. "I've never been so sorry that 
there isn't more of me." 

The fine old eyes on the pillow kept steadily 
taking him in; he could quite see that he hap- 
pened to be, as he might have called it, right; 
and though he had never felt himself, within his 
years, extraordinarily or excitingly wrong, so that 
this felicity might have turned rather flat for 
him, there was still matter for emotion, for the 
immediate throb and thrill, in finding success so 
crown him. He had been spared, thank goodness, 
any positive shame, but had never known his 
brow brushed or so much as tickled by the laurel 
or the bay. "Does it mean," he might have 
murmured to himself, "the strangest shift of 
standards?" — but his uncle had meanwhile 
spoken. "Well, there's all of you I'm going to 
want. And there must be more of you than I 

103 



 

see. Because you are different," Mr. Better- 
man considered. 

"But different from what?" Truly was Gray 
interested to know. 

It took Mr. Betterman a moment to say, but 
he seemed to convey that it might have been 
guessed. "From what you'd have been if you 
had come." 

The young man was indeed drawn in. "If 
I had come years ago? Well, perhaps," he so 
far happily agreed — "for I've often thought of 
that myself. Only, you see," he laughed, "I'm 
different from that too. I mean from what I was 
when I didn't come." 

Mr. Betterman looked at it quietly. "You're 
different in the sense that you're older — and you 
seem to me rather older than I supposed. All 
the better, all the better," he continued to make 
out. "You're the same person I didn't tempt, 
the same person I couldn't — that time when I 
tried. I see you are, I see what you are." 

"You see terribly much, sir, for the few min- 
utes!" smiled Gray. 

"Oh when I want to see 1" the old man 

comfortably enough sighed. "I take you in, I 
take you in; though I grant that I don't quite 
see how you can understand. Still," he pursued, 
"there are things for you to tell me. You're 
different from anything, and if we had time for 
particulars I should like to know a little how 

104 



 

you've kept so. I was afraid you wouldn't turn 
out perhaps so thoroughly the sort of thing I 
liked to think — for I hadn't much more to go 
upon than what she said, you know. However," 
Mr. Betterman wound up as with due comfort, 
"it's by what she says that I've gone — and I 
want her to know that I don't feel fooled." 

If Gray's wonderment could have been said to 
rest anywhere, hour after hour, long enough to 
be detected in the act, the detaining question 
would have been more than any other perhaps 
that of whether Miss Gaw would "come up." 
Now that she did so however, in this quiet way, 
it had no strangeness that his being at once glad 
couldn't make but a mouthful of; and the recent 
interest of what she had lately written to him 
was as nothing to the interest of her becoming 
personally his uncle's theme. With which, at 
the same time, it was pleasanter to him than any- 
thing else to speak of her himself. "If you allude 
to Rosanna Gaw you'll no doubt understand how 
tremendously I want to see her." 

The sick man waited a little — but not, it quite 
seemed, from lack of understanding. "She wants 
tremendously to see you, Graham. You might 
know that, of course from her going to work so." 
Then again he gathered his thoughts and again 
after a little went on. "She had a good idea, 
and I Jove her for it; but I'm afraid my own 
hasn't been so very much to give her the satis- 

i°5 



 

faction. I've wanted it myself, and — well, here 
I am getting it from you. Yes," he kept up, his 
eyes never moving from his nephew, "you couldn't 
give me more if you had tried, from so far back, 
on purpose. But I can't tell you half!" He ex- 
haled a long breath — he was a little spent. "You 
tell me. You tell me." 

"I'm tiring you, sir," Gray said. 

"Not by letting me see — you'd only tire me 
if you didn't." Then for the first time his eyes 
glanced about. "Haven't they put a place for 
you to sit? Perhaps they knew," he suggested, 
while Gray reached out for a chair, "perhaps 
they knew just how I'd want to see you. There 
seems nothing they don't know," he contentedly 
threw off again. 

Gray had his chair before him, his hands on 
the back tilting it a little. "They're extraordi- 
nary. I've never seen anything like them. They 
help me tremendously," he cheerfully confessed. 

Mr. Betterman, at this, seemed to wonder. 
"Why, have you difficulties?" 

"Well," said Gray, still with his chair, "you 
say I'm different — if you mean it for my being 
alien from what I feel surrounding me. But if 
you knew how funny all that seems to me," he 
laughed, "you'd understand that I clutch at 
protection." 

"'Funny'?" — his host was clearly interested, 
without offence, in the term. 

106 



 

"Well then terrific, sir!" 

"So terrific that you need protection ?" 

"Well," Gray explained, gently shaking his 
chair-back, "when one simply sees that nothing 
of one's former experience serves, and that one 
doesn't know anything about anything !" 

More than ever at this his uncle's look might 
have covered him. "Anything round here — no! 
That's it, that's it," the old man blandly repeated. 
That's just the way — I mean the way I hoped. 
She knows you don't know — and doesn't want 
you to either. But put down your chair," he 
said; and then after, when Gray, instantly and 
delicately complying, had placed the precious 
article with every precaution back where it had 
stood: "Sit down here on the bed. There's 
margin." 

"Yes," smiled Gray, doing with all consider- 
ation as he was told, "you don't seem anywhere 
very much a I'etroit." 

"I presume," his uncle returned, "you know 
French thoroughly." 

Gray confessed to the complication* "Of 
course when one has heard it almost from the 
cradle—!" 

"And the other tongues too?" 

He seemed to wonder if, for his advantage, he 
mightn't deny them. "Oh a couple of others. 
In the countries there they come easy." 

"Well, they wouldn't have come easy here — 
107 



 

and I guess nothing else would; I mean of the 
things we principally grow. And I won't have 
you tell me," Mr. Betterman said, "that if you 
had taken that old chance they might have done 
so. We don't know anything about it, and at 
any rate it would have spoiled you. I mean for 
what you are." 

"Oh," returned Gray, on the bed, but pressing 
lightly, "oh what I 'am' !" 

"My point isn't so much for what you are as 
for what you're not. So I won't have anything 
else; I mean I won't have you but as I want 
you," his host explained. "I want you just this 
way." 

With which, while the young man kept . his 
arms folded, and his hands tucked away as for 
compression of his personal extent and weight, 
they exchanged, at their close range, the most 
lingering look yet. Extraordinary to him, in the 
gravity of this relation, his deeper impression of 
something beautiful and spreadingly clear — very 
much as if the wide window and the quiet clean 
sea and the finer sunset light had all had, for assis- 
tance and benediction, their word to say to it. 
They seemed to combine most to remark together 
"What an exquisite person is your uncle!" This 
is what he had for the minute the sense of taking 
from them, and the expression of his assent to it 
was in the tone of his next rejoinder. "If I could 

only know what it is you'd most like !" 

108 



 



««T 



'Never mind what I most like — only tell me, 
only tell me," his companion again said: "You 
can't say anything that won't absolutely suit me; 
in fact I defy you to, though you mayn't at all 
see why that's the case. I've got you — without 
a flaw. So!" Mr. Betterman triumphantly 
breathed. Gray's sense was by this time of his 
being examined and appraised as never in his 
life before — very much as in the exposed state 
of an important "piece," an object of value picked, 
for finer estimation, from under containing glass. 
There was nothing then but to face it, unless 
perhaps also to take a certain comfort in his 
being, as he might feel, practically clean and in 
condition. That such an hour had its meaning, 
and that the meaning might be great for him, 
this of course surged softly in, more and more, 
from every point of the circle that held him; but 
with the consciousness making also more at each 
moment for an uplifting, a fantastic freedom, a 
sort of sublime simplification, in which nothing 
seemed to depend on him or to have at any time 
so depended. He was really face to face thus 
with bright immensities, and the handsome old 
presence from which, after a further moment, a 
hand had reached forth a little to take his own, 
guaranteed by the quietest of gestures at once 
their truth and the irrelevance, as he could only 
feel it, of their scale. Cool and not weak, to his 
responsive grasp, this retaining force, to which 

109 



 

strength was added by what next came. "It's 
not for myself, it's not for myself — I mean your 
being as I say. What do I matter now except 
to have recognised it? No, Graham — it's in an- 
other connection." Was the connection then with 
Rosanna ? Graham had time to wonder, and 
even to think what a big thing this might make 
of it, before his uncle brought out: "It's for the 
world." 

"The world ?" — Gray's vagueness again reigned. 

"Well, our great public." 

"Oh your great public !" 

The exclamation, the cry of alarm, even if also 
of amusement in face of such a connection as 
that, quickened for an instant the good touch of 
the cool hand. "That's the way I like you to 
sound. It's the way she told me you would — I 
mean that would be natural to you. And it's 
precisely why — being the awful great public it 
is — we require the difference that you'll rriake. 
So you see you're for our people." 

Poor Graham's eyes widened. "I shall make 
a difference for your people ?" 

But his uncle serenely went on. "Don't think 
you know them yet, or what it's like over here 
at all. You may think so and feel you're pre- 
pared. But you don't know till you've had the 
whole thing v.p against you." 

"May I ask, sir," Gray smiled, "what you're 
talking about?" 

no 



 

His host met his eyes on it, but let it drop. 
"You'll see soon enough for yourself. Don't 
mind what I say. That isn't the thing for you 
now — it's all done. Only be true," said Mr. Bet- 
terman. "You are and, as I've said, can't help 
yourself." With which he relapsed again to one 
of his good conclusions. "And after all don't 
mind the public either." 

"Oh," returned Gray, "all great publics are 
awful." 

"Ah no no — I won't have that. Perhaps they 
may be, but the trouble we're concerned with is 
about ours — and about some other things too." 
Gray felt in the hand's tenure a small emphasiz- 
ing lift of the arm, while the head moved a little 
as off toward the world they spoke of— which 
amounted for our young man, however, but to a 
glance at all the outside harmony and prosperity, 
bathed as these now seemed in the colour of the 
flushed sky. Absurd altogether that he should 
be in any way enlisted against such things. His 
entertainer, all the same, continued to see the 
reference and to point it. "The enormous pre- 
ponderance of money. Money is their life." — 

"But surely even here it isn't everyone who 
has it. Also," he freely laughed, "isn't it a good 
thing to have?" 

"A very good thing indeed." Then his uncle 
waited as in the longest inspection yet. "But 
you don't know anything about it." 

in 



 

"Not about large sums," Gray cheerfully ad- 
mitted. 

"I mean it has never been near you. That 
sticks out of you — the way it hasn't. I knew it 
couldn't have been — and then she told me she 
knew. I see you're a blank — and nobody here's 
a blank, not a creature I've ever touched. That's 
what I've wanted," the old man went on — "a 
perfect clean blank. I don't mean there aren't 
heaps of them that are damned fools, just as 
there are heaps of others, bigger heaps probably, 
that are damned knaves; except that mostly the 
knave is the biggest fool. But those are not 
blanks; they're full of the poison — without a 
blest other idea. Now you're the blank I want, 
if you follow — and yet you're not the blatant 
ass." 

"I'm not sure I quite follow," Gray laughed, 
"but I'm very much obliged." 

"Have you ever done three cents' worth of 
business?" Mr. Betterman judicially asked. 

It helped our young man to some ease of de- 
lay. "Well, I'm afraid I can't claim to have had 
much business to do. Also you're wrong, sir," 
he added, "about my not being a blatant ass. 
Oh please understand that I am a. blatant ass. 
Let there be no mistake about that," Gray touch- 
ingly pleaded. 

"Yes — but not on the subject of anything but 
business." 

112 



 

"Well — no doubt on the subject of business 
more than on any other." 

Still the good eyes rested. "Tell me one thing, 
other than that, for which you haven't at least 
some intelligence." 

"Oh sir, there are no end of things, and it's 
odd one should have to prove that — though it 
would take me long. But I allow there's nothing 
I understand so little and like so little as the mys- 
tery of the 'market' and the hustle of any sort.". 

"You utterly loathe and abhor the hustle ! 
That's what I blissfully want of you," said Mr. 
Betterman. 

"You ask of me the declaration ?" Gray 

considered. "But how can I know, don't you 
see ? — when I am such a blank, when I've never 
had three cents' worth of business, as you say, 
to transact?" 

"The people who don't loathe it are always 
finding it somehow to do, even if preposterously 
for the most part, and dishonestly. Your case," 
Mr. Betterman reasoned, "is that you haven't 
a grain of the imagination of any such interest. 
If you had had," he wound up, "it would have 
stirred in you that first time." 

Gray followed, as his kinsman called it, enough 
to be able to turn his memory a moment on this. 
"Yes, I think my imagination, small scrap of a 
thing as it was, did work then somehow against 
you." 

"3 



 

"Which was exactly against business" — the 
old man easily made the point. "I was business. 
I've been business and nothing else in the world. 
I'm business at this moment still — because I can't 
be anything else. I mean I've such a head for 
it. So don't think you can put it on me that I 
haven't thought out what I'm doing to good 
purpose. I do what I do but too abominably 
well." With which he weakened for the first 
time to a faint smile. "It's none of your af- 
fair." 

"Isn't it a little my affair," Gray as genially 
objected, "to be more touched than I can ex- 
press by your attention to me — as well (if you'll 
let me say so) as rather astonished at it?" And 
then while his host took this without response, 
only engaged as to more entire repletion in the 
steady measure of him, he added further, even 
though aware in sounding it of the complacency 
or fatuity, of the particular absurdity, his ques- 
tion might have seemed to embody: "What in 
the world can I want but to meet you in every 
way?" His perception at last was full, the great 
strange sense of everything smote his eyes; so 
that without the force of his effort at the most 
general amenity possible his lids and his young 
lips might have convulsively closed. Even for 
his own ear "What indeed ?" was thus the ironic 
implication — which he felt himself quite grimace 
to show he should have understood somebody 

114 



 

else's temptation to make. Here, however, where 
his uncle's smile might pertinently have broadened, 
the graver blandness settled again, leaving him 
in face of it but the more awkwardly assured. 
He felt as if he couldn't say enough to abate the 
ugliness of that — and perhaps it even did come 
out to the fact of beauty that no profession of 
the decent could appear not to coincide with the 
very candour of the greedy. "I'm prepared for 
anything, yes — in the way of a huge inheritance": 
he didn't care if it might sound like that when he 
next went on, since what could he do but just 
melt to the whole benignity? "If I only under- 
stood what it is I can best do for you." 

"Do? The question isn't of your doing, but 
simply of your being." 

Gray cast about. "But don't they come to 
the same thing?" 

"Well, I guess that for you they'll have to." 

"Yes, sir," Gray answered — "but suppose I 
should say 'Don't keep insisting so on me'?" 
Then he had a romantic flight which was at the 
same time, for that moment at least, a sincere 
one. "I don't know that I came out so very 
much for myself." 

"Well, if you didn't it only shows the more 
what you are" — Mr. Betterman made the point 
promptly. "It shows you've got the kind of 
imagination that has nothing to do with the 
kind I so perfectly see you haven't. And if you 

US 



 

don't do things for yourself," he went on, "you'll 
be doing them the more for just what I say." 
With which too, as Graham but pleadingly gaped : 
"You'll be doing them for everyone else — that 
is finding it impossible to do what they do. From 
the moment they notice that — well, it will be 
what I want. We know, we know," he remarked 
further and as if this quite settled it. 

Any ambiguity in his "we" after an instant 
cleared up; he was to have alluded but ever so 
sparely, through all this scene, to Rosanna Gaw, 
but he alluded now, and again it had for' Gray 
an amount of reference that was like a great sum 
of items in a bill imperfectly scanned. None the 
less it left him desiring still more clearness. His 
whole soul centred at this point in the need not 
to have contributed by some confused accommo- 
dation to a strange theory of his future.' Strange 
he could but feel this one to be, however simply, 
that is on however large and vague an assump- 
tion, it might suit others, amid their fathomless 
resources and their luxuries or perversities of 
waste, to see it. He wouldn't be smothered in 
the vague, whatever happened, and had now the 
gasp and upward shake of the head of a man in 
too deep water. "What I want to insist on," he 
broke out with it, "is that I mustn't consent to 
any exaggeration in the interest of your, or of 
any other, sublime view of me, view of my ca- 
pacity of any sort. There's no sublime view of 

116 



 

me to be taken that consorts in the least with 
any truth; and I should be a very poor creature 
if I didn't here and now assure you that no proof 
in the world exists, or has for a moment existed, 
of my being capable of anything whatever." 

He might have supposed himself for a little to 
have produced something of the effect that would 
naturally attach to a due vividness in this truth 
— for didn't his uncle now look at him just a shade 
harder, before the fixed eyes closed, indeed, as 
under a pressure to which they had at last really 
to yield ? They closed, and the old white face 
was for the couple of minutes so thoroughly still 
without them that a slight uneasiness quickened 
him, and it would have taken but another mo- 
ment to make a slight sound, which he had to 
turn his head for the explanation of, reach him 
as the response to an appeal. The door of the 
room, opening gently, had closed again behind 
Miss Goodenough, who came forward softly, but 
with more gravity, Gray thought, than he had 
previously seen her show. Still in his place and 
conscious of the undiminished freshness of her 
invalid's manual emphasis, he looked at her for 
some opinion as to the latter's appearance, or 
to the move on his own part next indicated; dur- 
ing which time her judgment itself, considering 
Mr. Betterman, a trifle heavily waited. Gray's 
doubt, before the stillness which had followed 
so great even if so undiscourageable an efFort, 

117 



 

moved him to some play of disengagement; where- 
upon he knew himself again checked, and there, 
once more, the fine old eyes rested on him. "I'm 
afraid I've tired him out," he could but say to 
the nurse, who made the motion to feel her pa- 
tient's pulse without the effect of his releasing his 
visitor. Gray's hand was retained still, but his 
kinsman's eyes and next words were directed to 
Miss Goodenough. 

"It's all right — even more so than I told you 
it was going to be." 

"Why of course it's all right — you look too 
sweet together!" she pronounced. 

"But I mean I've got him; I mean I make 
him squirm" — which words had somehow the 
richest gravity of any yet; "but all it does for 
his resistance is that he squirms right to me." 

"Oh we won't have any resistance!" Miss 
Goodenough freely declared. "Though for all 

the fight you've got in you still !" she in 

fine altogether backed Mr. Betterman. 

He covered his nephew again as for a final or 
crushing appraisement, then going on for Miss 
Goodenough 's benefit: "He tried something a 
minute ago to settle me, but I wish you could 
just have heard how he expressed himself." 

"It is a pleasure to hear him — when he's good !" 
She laughed with a shade of impatience. 

"He's never so good as when he wants to be 
bad. So there you are, sir!" the old man said. 

118 



 

"You're like the princess in the fairy-tale; you've 
only to open your mouth " 

"And the pearls and diamonds pop out!" — 
Miss Goodenough, for her patient's relief, com- 
pleted his meaning. "So don't try for toads and 
snakes!" she promptly went on to Gray. To 
which she added with still more point: "And 
now you must go." 

"Not one little minute more?" His uncle 
still held him. 

"Not one, sir!" Miss Goodenough decided. 

"It isn't to talk," the old man explained. "I 
like just to look at him." 

"So do I," said Miss Goodenough; "but we 
can't always do everything we like." 

"No then, Graham — remember that. You'd 
like to have persuaded me that I don't know 
what I mean. But you must understand you 
haven't." 

His hand had loosened, and Gray got up, turn- 
ing a face now flushed and a little disordered 
from one of them to the other. "I don't pre- 
tend to understand anything!" 

It turned his uncle to their companion. "Isn't 
he fine?" 

"Of course he's fine," said Miss Goodenough; 
"but you've quite worn him out." 

"Have I quite worn you out?" Mr. Better- 
man calmly inquired. 

As if indeed finished, each thumb now in a 
119 



 

pocket of his trousers, the young man dimly- 
smiled. "I think you must have — quite." 

"Well, let Miss Mumby look after you. He'll 
find her there?" his uncle asked of her colleague. 
And then as the latter showed at this her first 
indecision, "Isn't she somewhere round?" he 
demanded. 

Miss Goodenough had wavered, but as if it 
really mattered for the friend there present she 
responsibly concluded. "Well, no — just for a 
while." And she appealed to Gray's indulgence. 
"She's had to go to Mr. Gaw." 

"Why, is Mr. Gaw sick?" Mr. Betterman 
asked with detachment. 

"That's what we shall know when she comes 
back; She'll come back all right," she continued 
for Gray's encouragement. 

He met it with proper interest. "I'm sure I 
hope so!" 

"Well, don't be too sure !" his uncle judiciously 
said. 

"Oh he has only borrowed her." Miss Good- 
enough smoothed it down even as she smoothed 
Mr. Betterman's sheet, while with the same move- 
ment of her head she wafted Gray to the door. 

"Mr. Gaw," her patient returned, "has bor- 
rowed from me before. Mr. Gaw, Graham !" 

"Yes sir?" said Gray with the door ajar and 
his hand on the knob. 

The fine old presence on the pillow had faltered 
1 20 



 

before expression; then it appeared rather sigh- 
ingly and finally to give the question up. "Well, 
Mr. Gaw's an abyss." 

Gray found himself suddenly responsive. "Isn't 
he, the strange man ? " 

"The strange man — that's it." This summary 
description sufficed now to Mr. Betterman's 
achieved indifference. "/But you've seen him?" 

"Just for an instant." 

"And that was enough?" 

"Well, I don't know." Gray himself gave it 
up. "You're all so fiercely interesting!" 

"I think Rosanna's lovely!" Miss Goodenough 
contributed, to all appearance as an attenuation, 
while she tucked their companion in. 

"Oh Miss Gaw's quite another matter," our 
young man still paused long enough to reply. 

"Well, I don't mean but what she's interest- 
ing in her way too," Miss Good enough's con- 
science prompted. 

' "Oh he knows all about her. That's all right," 
Mr. Betterman remarked for his nurse's benefit. 

"Why of course I know it," this lady candidly 
answered. "Miss Mumby and I have had to 
feel that. I guess he'll want to send her his love," 
she continued across to Gray. 

"To Miss Mumby?" asked Gray, his general 
bewilderment having moments of aggravation. 

"Why no — she's sure of his affection. To 
Miss Gaw. Don't you want," she inquired of 

121 



 

her patient, "to send your love to that poor 
anxious girl ? " 

"Is she anxious?" Gray returned in advance 
of his uncle. 

Miss Goodenough hung fire but a moment. 
"Well, I guess I'd be in her place. But you'll 
see." 

"Then," said Gray to his host, "if Rosanna's 
in trouble I'll go to her at once." 

The old man, at this, once more delivered him- 
self. "She won't be in trouble — any more than 
I am. But tell her — tell her !" 

"Yes, sir" — Gray had again to wait. 

But Miss Goodenough now would have no 
more of it. "Tell her that we're about as fresh 
as we can live!" — the wave of her hand accom- 
panying which Gray could take at last for his 
dismissal. 



122 



Ill 

It was nevertheless not at once that he sought 
out the way to find his old friend; other ques- 
tions than that of at once seeing her hummed 
for the next half-hour about his ears — an interval 
spent by him in still further contemplative mo- 
tion within his uncle's grounds. He strolled and 
stopped again and stared before him without see- 
ing; he came and went and sat down on benches 
and low rocky ledges only to get up and pace 
afresh; he lighted cigarettes but to smoke them 
a quarter out and then chuck them away to 
light others. He said to himself that he was 
enormously agitated, agitated as never in his 
life before, but that, strangely enough, he dis- 
liked that condition far less than the menace of 
it would have made him suppose. He didn't, 
however, like it enough to say to himself "This 
is happiness!" — as could scarcely have failed if 
the kind of effect on his nerves had really con- 
sorted with the kind of advantage that he was 
to understand his interview with his uncle to 
have promised him; so far, that is, as he was 
yet to understand anything. His after-sense of 
the scene expanded rather than settled, became 
an impression of one of those great insistent 

123 



 

bounties that are not of this troubled world; the 
anomaly expressing itself in such beauty and 
dignity, with all its elements conspiring together, 
as would have done honour to a great page of 
literary, of musical or pictorial art. The huge 
grace of the matter ought somehow to have left 
him simply captivated — so at least, all wonder- 
ing, he hung about there to reflect; but excess 
of harmony might apparently work like excess 
of discord, might practically be a negation of 
the idea of the quiet life. Ignoble quiet he had 
never asked for — this he could now with assur- 
ance remember; but something in the pitch of 
his uncle's guarantee of big things, whatever they 
were, which should at the same time be pleasant 
things, seemed to make him an accomplice in 
some boundless presumption. In what light had 
he ever seen himself that made it proper the 
pleasant should be so big for him or the big so 
pleasant? Suddenly, as he looked at his watch 
and saw how the time had passed — time already, 
didn't it seem, of his rather standing off" and 
quaking? — it occurred to him that the last thing 
he had proposed to himself in the whole connec- 
tion was to be either publicly or privately afraid; 
in the act of noting which he became aware again 
of Miss Mumby, who, having come out of the 
house apparently to approach him, was now at 
no great distance. She rffse before him the next 
minute as in fuller possession than ever of his 

124 



 

fate, and yet with no accretion of reserve in her 
own pleasure at this. 

"What I want you to do is just to go over to 
Miss Gaw." 

"It's just what / should like, thank you— and 
perhaps you'll be so good as to show me the way." 
He wasn't quite succeeding in not being afraid 
— that a moment later came to him; since if this 
extraordinary woman was in touch with his 
destiny what did such words on his own part 
represent but the impulse to cling to her and, as 
who should say, keep on her right side? His 
uncle had spoken to him of Rosanna as protective 
— and what better warrant for such a truth than 
that here was he thankful on the spot even for 
the countenance of a person speaking apparently 
in her name ? All of which was queer enough, 
verily — since it came to the sense of his clutch- 
ing for immediate light, through the now gathered 
dusk, at the surge of guiding petticoats, the 
charity of women more or less strange. Miss 
Mumby at once took charge of him, and he learnt 
more things still before they had proceeded far. 
One of these truths, though doubtless the most 
superficial, was that Miss Gaw proposed he 
should dine with her just as he was — he himself 
recognising that with her father suddenly and to 
all appearance gravely ill it was no time for vain 
forms. Wasn't the rather odd thing, none the 
less, that the crisis should have suggested her 

125 



 

desiring company? — being as it was so acute 
that the doctor, Doctor Hatch himself, would 
even now have arrived with a nurse, both of 
which pair of ears Miss Mumby required for her 
report of those symptoms in their new patient 
that had appealed to her practised eye an hour 
before. Interesting enough withal was her ex- 
planation to Gray of what she had noted on 
Mr. Gaw's part as a consequence of her joining 
them at that moment under Mr. Betterman's 
roof; all the more that he himself had then won- 
dered and surmised — struck as he was with the 
effect on the poor man's nerves of their visitor's 
announcement that her prime patient had 
brightened. Mr. Gaw but too truly, our young 
man now learned, had taken that news ill — as, 
given the state of his heart, any strong shock 
might determine a bad aggravation. Such a 
shock Miss Mumby had, to her lively regret, 
administered, though she called Gray's attention 
to the prompt and intelligent action of her re- 
morse. Feeling at once responsible she had taken 
their extraordinary little subject in charge — 
with every care indeed not to alarm him; to the 
point that, on his absolute refusal to let her go 
home with him and his arresting a hack, on the 
public road, which happened to come into view 
empty, the two had entered the vehicle and she 
had not lost sight of him till, his earnest call upon 
his daughter at Mrs. Bradham's achieved, he 

126 



 

had been in effect restored to his own house. 
His daughter, who lived with her eyes on his 
liability to lapses, was now watching with him, 
and was well aware, Miss Mumby averred, of 
what the crisis might mean; as to whose own 
due presence of mind in the connection indeed 
how could there be better proof than this present 
lucidity of her appeal to Mr. Betterman's guest 
on such a matter as her prompt thought for spar- 
ing him delay ? 

"If she didn't want you to wait to dress, it 
can only be, I guess, to make sure of seeing you 
before anything happens," his guide was at no 
loss to remark; "and if she can mention dinner 
while the old gentleman is — well, as he is — it 
shows she's not too beside herself to feel that 
you'll at any rate want yours." 

"Oh for mercy's sake don't talk of dinner!" 
Gray pulled up under the influence of these reve- 
lations quite impatiently to request. "That's not 
what I'm most thinking of, I beg you to believe, 
in the midst of such prodigies and portents." 
They had crossed the small stretch of road which 
separated Mr. Betterman's gate from that of the 
residence they were addressed to; and now, 
within the grounds of this latter, which loomed 
there, -through vague boskages, with an effect of 
windows numerously and precipitately lighted, 
the forces of our young friend's consciousness 
were all in vibration at once. "My wondrous 

127 



 

uncle, I don't mind telling you, since you're so 
kind to me, has given me more extraordinary 
things to think of than I see myself prepared in 
any way to do justice to; and if I'm further to 
understand you that we have' between us, you 
and I, destroyed this valuable life, I leave you to 
judge whether what we may have to face in con- 
sequence finds me eager." 

"How do you know it's such a valuable life?" 
Miss Mumby surprisingly rejoined; sinking that 
question, however, in a livelier interest, before 
his surprise could express itself. "If she has 
sent me for you it's because she knows what 
she's about, and because I also know what I am 
— so that, wanting you myself so much to come, 
I guess I'd have gone over for you on my own 
responsibility. Why, Mr. Fielder, your place is 
right here by her at such a time as this, and if 
you don't already realise it I'm very glad I've 
helped you." 

Such was the consecration under which, but 
a few minutes later, Gray found himself turning 
about in the lamp-lit saloon of the Gaws very 
much as he had a few hours before revolved at 
the other house. Miss Mumby had introduced 
him into this apartment straight from the terrace 
to which, in the warm air, a long window or two 
stood open, and then had left him with the as- 
surance that matters upstairs would now be in 
shape for their friend to join him at once. It 

128 



 

was perhaps because he had rather inevitably 
expected matters upstairs — and this in spite of 
his late companion's warning word — to assault 
him in some fulness with Miss Gaw's appearance 
at the door, that a certain failure of any such 
effect when she did appear had for him a force, 
even if it was hardly yet to be called a sense, 
beyond any air of her advancing on the tide of 
pain. He fairly took in, face to face with her, 
that what she first called for was no rattle of 
sound, however considerately pitched, about the 
question of her own fear; she had pulled no long 
face, she cared for no dismal deference: she but 
stood there, after she had closed the door with 
a backward push that took no account, in the 
hushed house, of some possible resonance, she 
but stood there smiling in her mild extravagance 
of majesty, smiling and smiling as he had seen 
women do as a preface to bursting into tears. 
He was to remember afterwards how he had felt 
for an instant that whatever he said or did would 
deprive her of resistance to an inward pressure 
which was growing as by the sight of him, but 
that she would thus break down much more 
under the crowned than under the menaced 
moment — thanks to which appearance what 
could be stranger than his inviting her to clap 
her hands ? Still again was he later to recall 
that these hands had been the moment after 
held in his own while he knew himself smiling 

129 



 

too and saying: "Well, well, well, what wonders 
and what splendours!" and seeing that though 
there was even more of her in presence than he 
had reckoned there was somehow less of her in 
time; as if she had at once grown and grown and 
grown, grown in all sorts of ways save the most 
natural one of growing visibly older. Such an 
oddity as that made her another person a good 
deal more than her show of not having left him 
behind by any break with their common youth 
could keep her the same. 

These perceptions took of course but seconds, 
with yet another on their heels, to the effect that 
she had already seen him, and seen him to some 
fine sense of pleasure, as himself enormously 
different — arriving at that clearness before they 
had done more than thus waver between the 
"fun," all so natural, of their meeting as the 
frankest of friends and the quite other intelligence 
of their being parties to a crisis. It was to re- 
main on record for him too, and however over- 
scored, that their crisis, surging up for three or 
four minutes by its essential force, suffered them 
to stand there, with irrelevant words and mo- 
tions, very much as if it were all theirs alone and 
nobody's else, nobody's more important, on 
either side, than they were, and so take a brush 
from the wing of personal romance. He let her 
hands go, and then, if he wasn't mistaken, held 
them afresh a moment in repeated celebration, 

130 



 

he exchanged with her the commonest remarks 
and the flattest and the easiest, so long as it wasn't 
speaking but seeing, and seeing more and more, 
that mattered: they literally talked of his jour- 
ney and his arrival and of whether he had had a 
good voyage and wasn't tired; they said "You 
sit here, won't you?" and "Shan't you be better 
there?"— they said "Oh I'm all right!" and 
"Fancy it's happening after all like this!" be- 
fore there even faintly quavered the call of a 
deeper note. This was really because the deep 
one, from minute to minute, was that acute hush 
of her so clearly finding him not a bit what she 
might have built up. He had grown and grown 
just as she had, certainly; only here he was for 
her clothed in the right interest of it, not bare 
of that grace as he fancied her guessing herself 
in his eyes, and with the conviction sharply thrust 
upon him, beyond any humour he might have 
cultivated, that he was going to be so right fori 
her and so predetermined, whatever he did and 
however he should react there under conditions) 
incalculable, that this would perhaps more over- 
load his consciousness than ease it. It could 
have been further taken for strange, had there 
been somebody so to note it, that even when 
their first vaguenesses dropped what she really 
at once made easiest for him was to tell her that 
the wonderful thing had come to pass, the thing 
she had whisked him over for — he put it to her 

131 



 

that way; that it had taken place in conditions 
too exquisite to be believed, and that under the 
bewilderment produced by these she must re- 
gard him as still staggering. 

"Then it's done, then it's done — as I knew it 
would be if he could but see you." Flushed, but 
with her large fan held up so that scarce more 
than her eyes, their lids drawn together in the 
same nearsighted way he remembered, presented 
themselves over it, she fairly hunched her high 
shoulders higher for emphasis of her success. The 
more it might have embarrassed her to consider 
him without reserve the more she had this relief, 
as he took it, of her natural, her helpful blink- 
ing; so that what it came to really for her general 
advantage was that the fine closing of the eyes, 
the fine thing in her big face, but expressed effec- 
tive scrutiny. Below her in stature — as various 
other men, for that matter, couldn't but be — he 
hardly came higher than her ear; and he for the 
shade of an instant struck himself as a small 
boy, literally not of man's estate, reporting, under 
some research, just to the amplest of mothers. 
He had reported to Mr. Betterman, so far as 
intent candour in him hadn't' found itself dis- 
traught, and for the half hour had somehow af- 
fronted the immeasurable; but that didn't at 
all prevent his now quick sense of his never in 
his life having been so watched and waited upon 
by the uncharted infinite, or so subject to its 

132 



 

operation — since infinities, at the rate he was 
sinking in, could apparently operate, and do it 
too without growing smaller for the purpose. 
He cast about, not at all upright on the small 
pink satin sofa to which he had unconsciously 
dropped; it was for him clearly to grow bigger, 
as everything about expressively smiled, smiled 
absolutely through the shadow cast by doctors 
and nurses again, in suggestion of; which, nat- 
urally, was what one would always want to do — 
but which any failure of, he after certain mo- 
ments perfectly felt, wouldn't convert to the 
least difference for this friend. How could that 
have been more established than by her neglect 
of his having presently said, out of his particular 
need, that he would do anything in reason that 
was asked of him, but that he fairly ached with 

the desire to understand ■■ ? She blinked upon 

his ache to her own sufficiency, no doubt; but 
no further balm dropped upon it for the moment 
than by her appearing to brood with still deeper 
assurance, in her place and her posture, on the 
beauty of the accomplished fact, the fact of her 
performed purpose and her freedom now but to 
take care — yes, herself take care — for what would 
come of it. She might understand that he didn't 
— all the way as yet; but nothing could be more 
in the line of the mild and mighty mother than 
her treating that as a trifle. It attenuated a 
little perhaps, it just let light into the dark warmth 

133 



 

of her spreading possession of what she had done, 
that when he had said, as a thing already ten 
times on his lips and now quite having to come 
out, "I feel some big mistake about me somehow 
at work, and want to stop it in time ! " she met 
this with the almost rude decision of "There's 
nothing you can stop now, Graham, for your 
fate, or our situation, has the gained momentum 
of a rush that began ever so far away and that 
has been growing and growing. It would be too 
late even if we wanted to — and you can judge 
for yourself how little that's my wish. So here 
we are, you see, to make the best of it." 

"When you talk of my 'fate,'" he allowed 
himself almost the amusement of answering, "you 
freeze the current of my blood; but when you 
say 'our situation,' and that we're in it together, 
that's a little better, and I assure you that I 
shall not for a moment stay in anything, what- 
ever it may be, in which you're not close beside 
me. So there you are at any rate — and I matter 
at least as much as this, whatever the mistake: 
that I have hold of you as tight as ever you've 
been held in your life, and that, whatever and 
whatever the mistake, you've got to see me 
through." 

"Well, I took my responsibility years ago, and 
things came of it" — so she made reply; "and the 
other day I took this other, and now this has 
come of it, and that was what I wanted, and 

134 



 

wasn't afraid of, and am not afraid of now — like 
the fears that came to me after the Dresden 
time." No more direct than that was her answer 
to his protest, and what she subjoined still took 
as little account of it. "I rather lost them, those 
old fears — little by little; but one of the things 
I most wanted the other day was to see whether 
before you here they wouldn't wholly die down. 
They're over, they're over," she repeated; "I 
knew three minutes of you would do it — and not 
a ghost of them remains." 

"I can't be anything but glad that you 
shouldn't have fears — and it's horrid to me to 
learn, I assure you," he said, "that I've ever 
been the occasion of any. But the extent to 
which," he then frankly laughed, " 'three min- 
utes ' of me seems to be enough for people ! " 

He left it there, just throwing up his arms, 
passive again as he had accepted his having to 
be in the other place; but conscious more and 
more of the anomaly of her showing so markedly 
at such an hour a preoccupation, and of the very 
intensest, that should not have her father for its 
subject. Nothing could have more represented 
this than her abruptly saying to him, without 
recognition of his point just made, so far as it 
might have been a point: "If your impression 
of your uncle, and of his looking so fine and being 
so able to talk to you, makes you think he has 
any power really to pick up or to last, I want 

135 



 

you to know that you're wholly mistaken. It 
has kept him up," she went on, "and the effect 
may continue a day or two more — it will, in fact, 
till certain things are done. But then the flicker 
will have dropped — for he won't want it not to. 
He'll feel all right. The extraordinary inspira- 
tion, the borrowed force, will have spent itself — 
it will die down and go out, but with no pain. 
There has been at no time much of that," she 
said, "and now I'm positively assured there's 
none. It can't come back — nothing can but the 
weakness. It's too lovely," she remarkably 
added — "so there indeed and indeed we are." 

To take in these words was to be, after a fashion 
he couldn't have expressed, on a basis of reality 
with her the very rarest and queerest; so that, 
bristling as it did with penetrative points, her 
speech left him scarce knowing for the instant 
which penetrated furthest. That she made no 
more of anything he himself said than if she had 
just sniffed it as a pale pink rose and then tossed 
it into the heap of his other sweet futilities, such 
another heap as had seemed to grow up for him 
in his uncle's room, this might have pressed 
sharpest hadn't something else, not wholly over- 
scored by what followed, perhaps pricked his 
consciousness most. " 'It,' you say, has kept 
him up? May I ask you what 'it' then may so 
wonderfully have been ?" 

She had no more objection to say than she 
136 



 

apparently had difficulty. "Why, his having 
let me get at him. That was to make the whole 
difference." 

It was somehow as much in the note of their 
reality as anything could well be; which was 
perhaps why he could but respond with "Oh 
I see!" and remain lolling a little with a sense 
of flatness — a flatness moreover exclusively his 
own. 

So without flatness of her own she didn't even 
mind his; something in her brushed quite above 
it while she observed next, as if it were the most 
important thing that now occurred to her: "That 
of course was my poor father's mistake." And 
then as Gray but stared: "I mean the idea that 
he can pick up." 

"It's your father's mistake that he can ?" 

She met it as if really a shade bewildered at his 
own misconception; she was literally so far off 
from any vision of her parent in himself, a phi- 
losopher might have said, that it took her an 
instant to do the question justice. "Oh no — I 
mean that your uncle can. It was your own re- 
port of that to him, with Miss Mumby backing 
you, that put things in the bad light to him." 

"So bad a light that Mr. Gaw is in danger by 
it ? " This was catching on of a truth to realities 
— and most of all to the one he had most to face. 
"I've been then at the bottom of that?" 

He was to wonder afterwards if she had very 
137 



 

actually gone so far as to let slip a dim smile for 
the intensity of his candour on this point, or 
whether her so striking freedom from intensity 
in the general connection had but suggested to 
him one of the images that were most in opposi- 
tion. Her answer at any rate couldn't have had 
more of the eminence of her plainness. "That 
you yourself, after your uncertainties, should 
have found Mr. Betterman surprising was per- 
fectly natural — and how indeed could you have 
dreamed that father so wanted him to die?" 
And then as Gray, affected by the extreme salience 
of this link in the chain of her logic, threw up his 
head a little for the catching of his breath, her 
supreme lucidity, and which was lucidity all in 
his interest, further shone out. "Father is in- 
deed ill. He has had these bad times before, but 
nothing quite of the present gravity. He has 
been in a critical state for months, but one thing 
has kept him alive — the wish to see your uncle 
so far on his way that there could be no doubt. 
It was the appearance of doubt so suddenly this 
afternoon that gave him the shock." She con- 
tinued to explain the Case without prejudice. 
"To take it there from you for possible that 
Mr. Bettenman might revive and that he should 
have in his own so unsteady condition to wait 
was simply what father couldn't stand." 

"So that I just dealt the blow ?" 

But it was as if she cared too little even to try 
138 



 

to make that right. "He doesn't want, you see, 
to live after." 

"After having found he is mistaken?" 

She had a faint impatience. "He isn't of 
course really — since what I told you of your 
uncle is true. And he knows that now, having 
my word for it." 

Gray couldn't be clear enough about her clear- 
ness. "Your word for it that my uncle has re- 
vived but for the moment?" 

"Absolutely. Wasn't my giving him that," 
Rosanna asked, "a charming filial touch?" 

This was tremendously much again to take in, 
but Gray's capacity grew. "Promising him, you 
mean, for his benefit, that my uncle shan't last ? " 

The size of it on his lips might fairly, during 
the instant she looked at him, have been giving 
her pleasure. "Yes, making it a bribe to father's 
patience." 

"Then why doesn't the bribe act?" 

"Because it comes too late. It was amazing," 
she pursued, "that, feeling as he did, he could 
take that drive to the Bradhams' — and Miss 
Mumby was right in perfectly understanding 
that. The harm was already done — and there 
it is." 

She had truly for the whole reference the most 
astounding tones. "You literally mean then," 
said Gray, "that while you sit here with me he's 
dying — dying of my want of sense ?" 

139 



 

"You've no want of sense" — she spoke as if 
this were the point really involved. "You've 
a sense the most exquisite — and surely you had 
best take in soon rather than late," she went on, 
"how you'll- never be free not to have on every 
occasion of life to reckon with it and pay for it." 

"Oh I say!" was all the wit with which he 
could at once meet this charge; but she had 
risen as she spoke and, with a remark about there 
being another matter, had moved off to a piece 
of furniture at a distance where she appeared 
to take something from a drawer unlocked with 
a sharp snap for the purpose. When she returned 
to him she had this object in her hand, and Gray 
recognised in it an oblong envelope, addressed, 
largely sealed in black, and seeming to contain 
a voluminous letter. She kept it while he noted 
that the seal was intact, and she then reverted 
not to the discomfiture she had last produced in 
him but to his rueful reference of a minute be- 
fore that. 

"He's not dying of anything you said or did, 
or of anyone's act or words. He's just dying of 
twenty millions." 

"Twenty millions?" There was a kind of 
enormity in her very absence of pomp, and Gray 
felt as if he had dropped of a sudden, from his 
height of simplicity, far down into a familiar 
relation to quantities inconceivable — out of which 
depths he fairly blew and splashed to emerge, 

140 



 

the familiar relation, of all things in the world, 
being so strange a one. " That's what you mean 
here when you talk of money ?" 

"That's what we mean," said Rosanna, "when 
we talk of anything at all — for of what else but 
money do we ever talk? He's dying, at any 
rate," she explained, "of his having wished to 
have to do with it on that sort of scale. Having 
to do with it consists, you know, of the things 
you do for it — which are mostly very awful; and 
there are all kinds of consequences that they 
eventually have. You pay by these consequences 
for what you have done, and my father has been 
for a long time paying." Then she added as if 
of a sudden to summarise and dismiss the whole 
ugly truth: "The effect has been to dry up his 
life." Her eyes, with this, reached away for the 
first time as in search of something not at all 
before her, and it was on the perfunctory note 
that she had the next instant concluded. "There's 
nothing at last left for him to pay with." 

For Gray at least, whatever initiations he had 
missed, she couldn't keep down the interest. 
"Mr. Gaw then will leave twenty millions -?" 

"He has already left them — in the sense of 
having made his will; as your uncle, equally to 
my knowledge, has already made his." Some- 
thing visibly had occurred to her, and in connec- 
tion, it might seem, with the packet she had 
taken from her drawer. She looked about — 

141 



 

there being within the scene, which was somehow 
at once blank and replete, sundry small scattered 
objects of an expensive negligibility; not one of 
which, till now, he could guess, had struck her 
as a thing of human application. Human ap- 
plication had sprung up, the idea of selection at 
once following, and she unmistakeably but won- 
dered what would be best for her use while she 
completed the statement on which she had so 
strikingly embarked. "He has left me his whole 
fortune." Then holding up an article of which 
she had immediately afterwards, with decision, 
proceeded to possess herself, "Is that a thing 
you could at all bear?" she irrelevantly asked. 
She had caught sight, in her embarrassed way, 
of something apparently adapted to her unex- 
plained end, and had left him afresh to assure 
herself of its identity, taking up from a table 
at first, however, a box in Japanese lacquer only 
to lay it down unsatisfied. She had circled thus 
at a distance for a time, allowing him now 
his free contemplation; she had tried in succes- 
sion, holding them close to her eyes, several em- 
bossed or embroidered superfluities, a blotting- 
book covered with knobs of malachite, a silver 
box, flat, largely circular and finely fretted, a 
gold cigar case of absurd dimensions, of which 
she played for a moment the hinged lid. Such 
was the object on which she puzzlingly chal- 
lenged him. 

142 



 

"I could bear it perhaps better if I ever used 
cigars." 

"You don't smoke?" she almost wailed. 

"Never cigars. Sometimes pipes — but mostly, 
thank goodness, cigarettes." 

"Thank the powers then indeed!" — and, the 
golden case restored to the table, where she had 
also a moment before laid her prepared missive, 
she went straight to a corner of the mantel-shelf, 
hesitations dropping from her, and, opening there 
a plainer receptacle than any she had yet touched, 
turned the next instant with a brace of cigarettes 
picked out and an accent she had not yet used. 
"You are a blessing, Gray — I'm nowhere without 
one !" There were matches at hand, and she had 
struck a light and applied it, at his lips, to the 
cigarette passively received by him, afterwards 
touching her own with it, almost before he could 
wonder again at the oddity of their transition. 
Their light smoke curled while she went back to 
her table; it quickened for him with each puff 
the marvel of a domestic altar graced at such a 
moment by the play of that particular flame. 
Almost, to his fine vision, it made Rosanna dif- 
ferent — for wasn't there at once a gained ease in 
the tone with which, her sealed letter still left 
lying on the table, she returned to that conve- 
nience for the pocket of the rich person of which 
she had clicked and re-clicked the cover? What 
strange things, Gray thought, rich persons had ! 

143 



 

— and what strange things they did, he might 
mentally even have added, when she developed 
in a way that mystified him but the more: "I 
don't mean for your cigars, since you don't use 
them; but I want you to have from my hand 
something in which to keep, with all due con- 
sideration, a form of tribute that has been these 
last forty-eight hours awaiting you here, and 
which, it occurs to me, would just slide into this 
preposterous piece of furniture and nestle there 
till you may seem to feel you want it." She pro- 
ceeded to recover the packet and slide it into 
the case, the shape of which, on a larger scale, 
just corresponded with its own, and then, once 
more making the lid catch, shook container and 
contents as sharply as she might have shaken a 
bottle of medicine. "So — there it is; I some- 
how don't want just to thrust at you the letter 
itself." 

"But may I be told what the letter itself is ?" 
asked Gray, who had followed these movements 
with interest. 

"Why of course — didn't I mention? Here 
are safely stowed," she said, her gesture causing 
the smooth protective surfaces to twinkle more 
brightly before him, "the very last lines (and 
many there, appear to be of them !) that, if I am 
not mistaken, my father's hand will have traced. 
He wrote them, in your interest, as he considers, 
when he heard of your arrival in New York, and, 

144 



 

having sealed and directed them, gave them to 
me yesterday to take care of and deliver to you. 
I put them away for the purpose, and an hour 
ago, during our drive back from Mrs. Bradham's, 
he reminded me of my charge. Before asking 
Miss Mumby to tell you I should like to see you 
I transferred the letter from its place of safety 
in my room to the cabinet from which, for your 
benefit, I a moment ago took it. I carefully 
comply, as you see, with my father's request. 
I know nothing whatever of what he has written 
you, and only want you to have his words. But 
I want also," she pursued, "to make just this 
little affair of them. I want" — and she bent her 
eyes on the queer costliness, rubbing it with her 
pockethandkerchief— "to do what the Lord Mayor 
of London does, doesn't he ? when he offers the 
Freedom of the City; present them in a precious 
casket in which they may always abide. I want 
in short," she wound up, "to put them, for your 
use, beautifully away." 

Gray went from wonder to wonder. "It isn't 
then a thing you judge I should open at 
once r 

"I don't care whether you never open it in 
your life. But you don't, I can see, like that 
vulgar thing!" With which having opened her 
receptacle and drawn forth from it the subject 
of her attention she tossed back to its place on 
the spread of brocade the former of these trifles. 

145 



 

The big black seal, under this discrimination, 
seemed to fix our young man with a sombre 
eye; 

"Is there any objection to my just looking at 
the letter now?" And then when he had taken 
it and yet was on the instant and as by the mere 
feel and the nearer sight, rather less than more 
conscious of a free connection with it, " Is it going 
to be bad for me ? " he said. 

"Find out for yourself!" 

"Break the seal?" 

"Isn't it meant to break?" she asked with a 
shade of impatience. 

He noted the impatience, sounding her nervous- 
ness, but saw at the same time that her interest 
in the communication, whatever it might be, was 
of the scantest, and that she suffered from having 
to defer to his own. "If I needn't answer to- 
night !" 

"You needn't answer ever." 

"Oh well then it can wait. But you're right 
— it mustn't just wait in my pocket." 

This pleased her. "As I say, it must have a 
place of its own." 

He considered of that. "You mean that when 
I have read it I may still want to treasure it ?" 

She had in hand again the great fan that hung 
by a long fine chain from her girdle, and, flaring 
it open, she rapidly closed it again, the motion 
seeming to relieve her. "I mean that my father 

146 



 

has written you at this end of his days — and that 
that's all I know about it." 

"You asked him no question ?" 

"As to why he should write? I wouldn't," 
said Rosanna, "have asked him for the world. 
It's many a day since we've done that, either he 
or I — at least when a question could have a 
sense." 

"Thank you then," Gray smiled, "for answer- 
ing mine." He looked about him for whatever 
might still help them, and of a sudden had a 
light. "Why the ivory tower!" And while her 
eyes followed: "That beautiful old thing on the 
top of the secretary— happy thought if it is old !" 
He had seen at a glance that this object was what 
they wanted, and, a nearer view confirming the 
thought, had reached for it and taken it down. 
"There it was waiting for you. Isn't it an ivory 
tower, and doesn't living in an ivory tower just 
mean the most distinguished retirement ? I don't 
want yet awhile to settle in one myself — though 
I've always thought it a thing I should like to 
come to; but till I do make acquaintance with 
what you have for me a retreat for the mystery 
is pleasant to think of." Such was the fancy he 
developed while he delicately placed his happy 
find on the closed and polished lid of the grand 
piano, where the rare surface reflected the pale 
rich ivory and his companion could have it well 
before her. The subject of this attention might 

147 



 

indeed pass, by a fond conceit, on its very re- 
duced scale, for a builded white-walled thing, 
very tall in proportion to the rest of its size and 
rearing its head from its rounded height as if a 
miniature flag might have flown there. It was a 
remarkable product of some eastern, probably 
some Indian, patience, and of some period as 
well when patience in such causes was at the - 
greatest — thanks to which Gray, loving ancient 
artistry and having all his life seen much of it, 
had recognised at a glance the one piece in the 
room that presented an interest. It consisted 
really of a cabinet, of easily moveable size, seated 
in a circular socket of its own material and 
equipped with a bowed door, which dividing in 
the middle, after a minute gold key had been 
turned, showed a superposition of small drawers 
that went upwards diminishing in depth, so that 
the topmost was of least capacity. The high 
curiosity of the thing was in the fine work required 
for making and keeping it perfectly circular; an 
effect arrived at by the fitting together, apparently 
by tiny golden rivets, of numerous small curved 
plates of the rare substance, each of these, in- 
cluding those of the two wings of the exquisitely 
convex door, contributing to the artful, the total 
rotundity. The series of encased drawers worked 
to and fro of course with straight sides, but also 
with small bowed fronts, these made up of the 
same adjusted plates. The whole, its infinite 

148 



 

neatness exhibited, proved a wonder of wasted 
ingenuity, and Rosanna, pronouncing herself stu- 
pid not to have anticipated him, rendered all 
justice, under her friend's admiring emphasis, to 
this choicest of her resources. Of how they had 
come by it, either she or her sparing parent, she 
couldn't at once bethink herself: on their taking 
the Newport house for the few weeks her direc- 
tion had been general that an assortment of odds 
and ends from New York should disperse itself, 
for mitigation of bleakness, in as many of the 
rooms as possible; and with quite different matters 
to occupy her since she had taken the desired 
effect for granted. Her father's condition had 
precluded temporary inmates, and with Gray's 
arrival also in mind she had been scarce aware 
of minor importances. "Of course you know — 
I knew you would !" were the words in which 
she assented to his preference for the ivory tower 
and which settled for him, while he made it beau- 
tifully slide, the fact that the shallowest of the 
drawers would exactly serve for his putting his 
document to sleep. So then he slipped it in, re- 
joicing in the tight fit of the drawer, carefully 
making the two divisions of the protective door 
meet, turning the little gold key. in its lock and 
finally, with his friend's permission, attaching the 
key to a small silver ring carried in his pocket 
and serving for a cluster of others. With this 
question at rest it seemed at once, and as with 

149 



 

an effect out of proportion to the cause, that a 
great space before them had been cleared: they 
looked at each other over it as if they had be- 
come more intimate, and as if now, in the free 
air, the enormities already named loomed up 
again. All of which was expressed in Gray's 
next words. 

"May I ask you, in reference to something 
you just now said, whether my uncle took action 
for leaving me money before our meeting .could 
be in question ? Because if he did, you know, I 
understand less than ever. That he should want 
to see me if he was thinking of me, that of course 
I can conceive; but that he shouldn't wait till 
he had seen me is what I find extraordinary." 

If she gave him the impression of keeping her 
answer back a little, it wasn't, he was next to 
see, that she was not fully sure of it. "He had 
seen you." 

"You mean as a small boy?" 

"No — at this distance of time that didn't 
count." She had another wait, but also another 
assurance. "He had seen you in the great fact 
about you." 

"And what in the world do you call that ?" 

"Why, that you are more out of it all, out of 
the air he has breathed all his life and that in 
these last years has more and more sickened him, 
than anyone else in the least belonging to him, 
that he could possibly put his hand on." 

150 



 

He stood before her with his hands in his 
pockets — he could study her now quite as she 
had studied himself. "The extent, Rosanna, to 
which you must have answered for me!" 

She met his scrutiny from between more nar- 
rowed lids. "I did put it all to him — I spoke for 
you as earnestly as one can ever speak for an- 
other. But you're not to gather from it," she 
thus a trifle awkwardly smiled, "that I have let 
you in for twenty millions, or for anything ap- 
proaching. He will have left you, by my con- 
viction, all he has; but he has nothing at all like 
that. That's all I'm sure of — of no details what- 
ever. Even my father doesn't know," she added; 
"in spite of its having been for a long time the 
thing he has most wanted to, most sat here, these 
weeks, on some chance of his learning. The 
truth, I mean, of Mr. Betterman's affairs." 

Gray felt a degree of relief at the restrictive 
note on his expectations which might fairly have 
been taken, by its signs, for a betrayed joy in their 
extent. The air had really, under Rosanna's 
touch, darkened itself with numbers; but what 
she had just admitted was a rift of light. In this 
light, which was at the same time that of her allu- 
sion to Mr. Gaw's unappeased appetite, his vision 
of that gentleman at the other house came back 
to him, and he said in a moment: "I see, I see. 
He tried to get some notion out of me." 

"Poor father!" she answered to this — but 
IS* 



 

without time for more questions, as at the mo- 
ment she spoke the door of the room opened and 
Doctor Hatch appeared. He paused, softly por- 
tentous, where he stood, and so he met Rosanna's 
eyes. He held them a few seconds, and the effect 
was to press in her, to all appearance, the same 
spring our young man had just touched. "Poor, 
poor, poor father !" she repeated, but as if brought 
back to him from far away. She took in what 
had happened, but not at once nor without an 
effort what it called on her for; so that "Won't 
you come up ? " her informant had next to ask. 
To this, while Gray watched her, she rallied 
— "If you'll stay here." With which, looking 
at neither of them again, as the Doctor kept the 
door open, she passed out, he then closing it on 
her and transferring his eyes to Gray — who 
hadn't to put a question, so sharply did the 
raised and dropped hands signify that all was 
over. The fact, in spite of everything, startled 
our young man, who had with his companion a 
moment's mute exchange. 

"He has died while I've kept her here?" 
Doctor Hatch just demurred. "You kept. her. 
through her having sent for you to talk to you." 
"Yes, I know. But it's very extraordinary!" 
"You seem to make people extraordinary. 

You've made your uncle, you know !" 

"Yes indeed — but haven't I made him better ?" 
Gray asked. 

152 



 

The Doctor again for a moment hesitated. 
"Yes — in the sense that he must be now at last 
really resting. But I go back to him." 

"I'll go with you of course," said Gray, look- 
ing about for his hat. As he found it he oddly 
remembered. "Why she asked me to dinner!" 

It all but amused the Doctor. "You inspire 
remarkable efforts." 

"Well, I'm incapable of making them." It 
seemed now queer enough. "I can't stay to 
dinner." 

"Then we'll go." With which however, Doc- 
tor Hatch was not too preoccupied to have had 
his attention, within the minute, otherwise taken. 
"What a splendid piece!" he exclaimed in pres- 
ence of the ivory tower. 

"It is splendid," said Gray, feeling its beauty 
again the brightest note in the strangeness; but 
with a pang of responsibility to it taking him 
too. "Miss Gaw has made me a present of it." 

"Already? You do work them!" — and the 
good physician fairly grazed again the act of 
mirth. "So you'll take it away?" 

Gray paused a moment before his acquisition, 
which seemed to have begun to guard, within 
the very minute, a secret of greater weight. Then 
"No, I'll come back to it," he said as they de- 
parted by the long window that opened to the 
grounds and through which Miss Mumby had 
brought him in. 

153 



BOOK THIRD 

I 

"Why I haven't so much as seen him yet," 
Cissy perforce confessed to her friend, Mrs. Brad- 
ham's friend, everybody's friend, even, already 
and so coincidentally, Graham Fielder's; this 
recipient of her avowal having motored that day 
from Boston, after detention there under a neces- 
sity of business and the stress of intolerable heat, 
but having reached Newport in time for tea, a 
bath, a quick "change" and a still quicker im- 
pression of blest refreshment from the fine air 
and from various other matters. He had come 
forth again, during the time left him between 
these performed rites and the more formal dress- 
ing-hour, in undisguised quest of our young 
lady, who had so disposed certain signs of her 
whereabouts that he was to waste but few steps 
in selection of a short path over the longest stretch 
of lawn and the mass of seaward rocks forming 
its limit. Arriving to spend with the Bradhams 
as many or as few days as the conditions to be 
recognised on the spot might enjoin, this hero, 
Horton Vint, had alighted at one of those hours 
of brilliant bustle which could show him as all 

154 



 

in his element if he chose to appear so, or could 
otherwise appeal at once to his perfect aptitude 
for the artful escape and the undetected counter- 
plot. But the pitch had by that moment dropped 
and the company dispersed, so far as the quarter 
before him was concerned : the tennis-ground was 
a velvet void, the afternoon breeze conveyed soft 
nothings — all of which made his occasion more 
spacious for Horton. Cissy, from below, her 
charmingly cool cove, had watchfully signalled 
up, and they met afresh, on the firm clear sand 
where the drowsy waves scarce even lapsed, with 
forms of intimacy that the ( sequestered spot 
happily favoured. The sense of waiting under- 
stood and crowned gave grace to her opened arms 
when the young man, as he was still called, erect, 
slim, active, brightly refreshed and, like herself, 
given the temperature, inconsiderably attired, 
first showed himself against the sky; it had cost 
him but a few more strides and steps, an easy 
descent, to spring to her welcome with the 
strongest answering emphasis. They met as 
on ground already so prepared that not an un- 
certainty, on either side, could make reunion less 
brave or confidence less fine; they had to effect 
no clearance, to stand off from no risk; and, ob- 
serving them thus in their freedom, you might 
well have asked yourself by what infallible tact 
they had mastered for intercourse such perfect 
reciprocities of address. You would certainly 

iS5 



 

have concluded to their entire confidence in 
these. "With a dozen people in the house it is 
luck," Horton had at once appreciatively said; 
but when their fellow-visitors had been handled 
between them for a minute or so only to collapse 
again like aproned puppets on removal of pressure 
from the squeak, he had jumped to the question 
of Gray Fielder and to frank interest in Cissy's 
news of him. This news, the death of Mr. Better- 
man that morning, quite sufficiently explained 
her inability to produce the more direct impres- 
sion; that worthy's nephew and heir, in close 
and more and more quickened attendance on 
him during the previous days, had been seen as 
yet, to the best of her belief, by no one at all but 
dear Davey — not counting of course Rosanna 
Gaw, of the fact of whose own bereavement as 
well Horton was naturally in possession, and who 
had made it possible, she understood, for their 
friend to call on Graham. 

"Oh Davey has called on Graham?" Horton 
was concerned to ask while they sat together on 
a rude worn slab. "What then, if he has told 
you, was his particular idea?" 

"Won't his particular idea," Cissy returned, 
"be exactly the one he won't have told me? 
What he did speak to me of yesterday morning, 
and what I told him I thought would be beautiful 
of him, was his learning by inquiry, in case your, 
friend could see him, whether there was any sort 

156 



 

of thing he could do for him in his possible want 
of a man to put a hand on. Because poor Ro- 
sanna, for all one thinks of her," said the girl, 
" isn't exactly a man." 

Horton's attention was deeply engaged; his 
hands, a little behind him, rested, as props to 
his slight backward inclination, on the con- 
venient stone; his legs, extended before him, 
enabled him to dig in his heels a little, while his 
eyes, attached to the stretch of sea commanded 
by their rocky retreat, betrayed a fixed and 
quickened vision. Rich in fine lines and propor- 
tions was his handsome face — with scarce less, 
moreover, to be said of his lean, light and long- 
drawn, though so much more pointed and rounded 
figure. His features, after a manner of their own, 
announced an energy and composed an array 
that his expression seemed to disavow, or at 
least to be indifferent to, and had the practical 
effect of toning down; as if he had been conscious 
that his nose, of the bravest, strongest curve and 
intrinsically a great success, was too bold and 
big for its social connections, that his mouth pro- 
tested or at least asserted more than he cared to 
back it up to, that his chin and jaw were of too 
tactless an importance, and his fine eyes, above 
all, which suggested choice samples of the more 
or less precious stone called aquamarine, too dis- 
posed to darken with the force of a straight look 
— so that the right way to treat such an excess 

157 



 

of resource had become for him quite the incon- 
gruous way, the cultivation of every sign and 
gage that liberties might be taken with him. He 
seemed to keep saying that he was not, tem- 
peramentally and socially, in his own exaggerated 
style, and that a bony structure, for instance, as 
different as possible from the one he unfortunately 
had to flaunt, would have been no less in har- 
mony with his real nature than he sought oc- 
casion to show it was in harmony with his con- 
duct. His hard mouth sported, to its visible 
relief and the admiration of most beholders, a 
beautiful mitigating moustache; his eyes wan- 
dered and adventured as for fear of their very 
own stare; his smile and his laugh went all lengths, 
you would almost have guessed, in order that 
nothing less pleasant should occupy the ground; 
his chin advanced upon you with a grace fairly 
tantamount to the plea, absurd as that might 
have seemed, that it was in the act of receding. 
Thus you gained the impression — or could do so 
if your fancy quickened to him — that he would 
perhaps rather have been as unwrought and un- 
finished as so many monstrous men, on the gen- 
eral peopled scene of those climes, appeared more 
and more to show themselves, than appointed to 
bristle with a group of accents that, for want of 
a sense behind them, could attach themselves 
but to a group of blanks. The sense behind the 
outward man in Horton Vint bore no relation, 

158 



 

it incessantly signified, to his being importantly 
goodlooking; it was in itself as easily and freely 
human a sense, making as much for* personal re- 
assurance, as the appeal of opportunity in an 
enjoying world could ever have drawn forth and 
with the happy appearance of it confirmed by 
the whimsical, the quite ironic, turn given by the 
society in which he moved to the use of his name. 
It could never have been so pronounced and 
written Haughty if in spite of superficial ac- 
cidents his charming clever humility and so- 
ciability hadn't thoroughly established themselves. 
He lived in the air of jokes, and yet an air in which 
bad ones fell flat; and there couldn't have been 
a worse one than to treat his designation as true. 
It might have been, at the same time, scarce 
in the least as a joke that he presently said, in 
return for the remark on Cissy's part last re- 
ported: "Rosanna is surely enough of a man to 
be much more of one than Davey. However," 
he went on, "we agree, don't we? about the. mil- 
lion of men it Would have taken to handle Gussy. 
A Davey the more or the less, or with a shade 
more or less of the different sufficiency, would 
have made no difference in that question" — which 
had indeed no interest for them anyhow, he con- 
veyed, compared with the fun apparently pro- 
posed by this advent of old Gray. That, frankly, 
was to him, Horton, as amusing a thing as could 
have happened — at a time when if it hadn't been 

159 



 

for Cissy's herself happening to be for him, by 
exception, a comfort to think of, there wasn't 
a blest thing in his life of the smallest interest. 
"It hadn't struck me as probable at all, this 
revulsion of the old man's," he mentioned, "and 
though Fielder must be now an awfully nice 
chap, whom you'll like and find charming, I 
own I didn't imagine he would come so tremen- 
dously forward. Over there, simply with his 
tastes, his 'artistic interests,' or literary ones, 
or whatever — I mean his array of intellectual 
resources and lack of any others — he was well 
enough, by my last impression, and I liked him 
both for his decent life and ways and for his liking 
me, if you can believe it, so extraordinarily much 
as he seemed to. What the situation appears 
most to mean, however, is that of a sudden he 
pops into a real light, a great blazing light visible 
from afar — which is quite a different affair. It 
can't not mean at least all sorts of odd things — 
or one has a right to wonder if it mayn't mean 
them." And Horton might have been taken up 
for a minute of silence with his consideration of 
some of these glimmering possibilities; a mo- 
ment during which Cissy Foy maintained their 
association by fairly, by quite visibly breathing 
with him in unison — after a fashion that testified 
more to her interest than any "cutting in" could 
have done. It would have been clear that they 
were far beyond any stage of association at which 

160 



 

their capacity for interest in the contribution of 
either to what was between them should depend 
upon verbal proof. It depended in fact as little 
on any other sort, such for instance as searching 
eyes might invoke; she hadn't to look at her 
friend to follow him further — she but looked off 
to those spaces where his own vision played, and 
it was by pressing him close there that she fol- 
lowed. Her companion's imagination, by the 
time he spoke again, might verily have travelled 
far. 

"What comes to me is just the wonder of 
whether such a change of fortune may possibly 
not spoil him — he was so right and nice as he 
was. I remember he used really to exasperate 
me almost by seeming not to have wants, unless 
indeed it was by having only those that could 
be satisfied over there as a kind of matter of 
course and that were those I didn't myself have — 
in any degree at least that could make up for 
the non-satisfaction of my others. I suppose it 
amounted really," said Horton, "to the fact 
that, being each without anything to speak of 
in our pockets, or. then any prospect of anything, 
he accepted that because he happened to like 
most the pleasures that were not expensive. I 
on my side raged at my inability to meet or to 
cultivate expense — which seemed to me good and 
happy, quite the thing most worth while, in it- 
self: as for that matter it still seems. 'La lecture 

161 



 

et la promenade,' which old Roulet, our pasteur 
at Neuchatel used so to enjoin on us as the highest 
joys, really appealed to Gray, to all appearance, 
in the sense in which Roulet regarded, or pre- 
tended to regard, them — once he could have pic- 
tures and music and talk, which meant of course 
pleasant people, thrown in. He could go in for 
such things on his means — ready as he was to do 
all his travelling on foot (I wanted as much then 
to do all mine on horseback,) and to go to the 
opera or the play in the shilling seats when he 
couldn't go in the stalls. I loathed so everything 
but the stalls — the stalls everywhere in life — that 
if I couldn't have it that way I didn't care to 
have it at all. So when I think it stakes me I 
must have liked him very much not to have 
wanted to slay him — for I don't remember hav- 
ing given way at any particular moment to threats 
or other aggressions. That may have been be- 
cause I felt he rather extravagantly liked me — 
as I shouldn't at all wonder at his still doing. 
At the same time if I had found him beyond a 
certain point objectionable his showing he took 
me for anything wonderful would have been, I 
think," the young man reflected, "but an ag- 
gravation the more. However that may be, I'm 
bound to say, I shan't in the least resent his taking 
me for whatever he likes now — if he can at all 
go on with it himself I shall be able to hold up 
my end. The dream of my life, if you must know 

162 



 

all, dear — the dream of my life has been to be 
admired, really admired, admired for all he's 
worth, by some awfully rich man. Being admired 
by a rich woman even isn't so good — though I've 
tried for that too, as you know, and equally failed 
of it; I mean in the sense of their being ready to 
do it for all they are worth. I've only had it from 
the poor, haven't I ? — and we've long since had 
to recognise, haven't we? how little that has 
done for either of us." So Horton continued — 
so, as if incited and agreeably, irresistibly in- 
spired, he played, in the soft stillness and the 
protected nook, before the small salt tide that 
idled as if to listen, with old things and new, with 
actualities and possibilities, on top of the ancien- 
tries, that seemed to want but a bit of talking 
of in order to flush and multiply. "There's one 
thing at any rate I'll be hanged if I shall allow," 
he wound up; "I'll be hanged if what we may do 
for him shall — by any consent of mine at least 
— spoil him for the old relations without inspir- 
ing him for the new. He shan't become if I can 
help it as beastly vulgar as the rest of us." 

The thing was said with a fine sincere ring, 
but it drew from Cissy a kind of quick wail of 
pain. "Oh, oh, oh — what a monstrous idea, 
Haughty, that he possibly could, ever!" 

It had an immediate, even a remarkable effect; 
it made him turn at once to look at her, giving 
his lightest pleasantest laugh, than which no 

163 



 

sound of that sort equally manful had less of 
mere male stridency. Then it made him, with 
a change of posture, shift his seat sufficiently 
nearer to her to put his arm round her altogether 
and hold her close, pressing his cheek a moment, 
with due precautions, against her hair. "That's 
awfully nice of you. We will pull something off. 
Is what you're thinking of what your friend out 
there dans le temps, the stepfather, Mr. Wen- 
dover, was it ? told you about him in that grand 
manner?" 

"Of course it is," said Cissy in lucid surrender 
and as if this truth were of a flatness almost to 
blush for. "Don't you know I fell so in love 
with Mr. Northover, whose name you mispro- 
nounce, that I've kept true to him forever, and 
haven't been really in love with you in the least, 
and shall never be with Gray himself, however 
much I may want to, or you perhaps may even 
try to make me ? — any more than I shall ever be 
with anyone else. What's inconceivable," she 
explained, "is that anyone that dear delicious 
man thought good enough to talk of to me as he 
talked of his stepson should be capable of any- 
thing in the least disgusting in any way." 

"I see, I see." It made Horton, for reasons, 
hold her but the closer— yet not withal as if 
prompted by her remarks to affectionate levity. 
It was a sign of the intercourse of this pair that, 
move each other though they might to further 

164 



 

affection, and therewith on occasion to a con- 
gruous gaiety, they treated no cause and no effect 
of that sort as waste; they had somehow already 
so worked off, in their common interest, all pos- 
sible mistakes and vain imaginings, all false 
starts and false pursuits, all failures of unanimity. 
"Why then if he's really so decent, not to say 
so superior," Haughty went on, "won't it be the 
best thing in the world and a great simplification 
for you to fall — that is for you to be — in love 
with him ? That will be better for me, you know, 
than if you're not; for it's the impression evi- 
dently made on you by the late Northover that 
keeps disturbing my peace of mind. I feel, though 
I can't quite tell you why," he explained, "that 
I'm never going to be in the least jealous of Gray, 
and probably not even so much as envious; so 
there's your chance — take advantage of it all 
the way. Like him at your ease, my dear, and 
God send he shall like you ! Only be sure it's 
for himself you do it — and for your own self; 
as you make out your possibilities, de part et 
d'autre, on your getting nearer to them." 

"So as to be sure, you mean," Cissy inquired, 
"of not liking him for his money ?" 



165 



II 

He waited a moment, and if she had not imme- 
diately after her words sighed "Oh dear, oh 
dear!" in quite another, that is a much more 
serious, key, the appearance would perhaps have 
been that for once in a blue moon she had put 
into his mind a thought he couldn't have. He 
couldn't have the thought that it was of the least 
importance she should guard herself in the way 
she mentioned; and it was in the air, the very next 
thing, that she couldn't so idiotically have strayed 
as to mean to impute it. He quickly enough made 
the point that what he preferred was her not 
founding her interest in Gray so very abjectly 
on another man's authority — given the uncanny 
fact of the other man's having cast upon her a 
charm which time and even his death had done 
so little to abate. Yes, the late Northover had 
clearly had something about him that it worried 
a fellow to have her perpetually rake up. There 
she was in peril of jealousy — his jealousy of the 
queer Northover ghost; unless indeed it was she 
herself who was queerest, ridden as her spirit 
seemed by sexagenarian charms ! He could look 
after her with Gray — they were at one about 
Gray; what would truly alienate them, should 
she persist, would be his own exposure to com- 

166 



 

parison with the memory of a rococo Briton he 
had no arms to combat. Which extravagance of 
fancy had of course after a minute sufficiently 
testified to the clearance of their common air that 
invariably sprang from their feeling thejnselves 
again together and finding once more what this 
came to — all under sublime palpability of proof. 
The renewed consciousness did perhaps nothing 
for their difficulties as such, but it did everything 
for the interest, the amusement, the immediate 
inspiration of their facing them: there was in 
that such an element of their facing each other 
and knowing, each time as if they had not known 
it before, that this had absolute beauty. It had 
unmistakably never had more than now, even 
when their freedom in it had rapidly led them, 
under Cissy's wonderment, to a consideration of 
whether a happy relation with their friend (he 
was already thus her friend too, without her ever 
having seen him !) mightn't have to count with 
some inevitable claim, some natural sentiment, 
asserted and enjoyed on Rosanna's part, not to 
speak of the effect on Graham himself of that 
young woman's at once taking such an interest 
in him and coming in for such a fortune. 

"In addition to which who shall pretend to 

deny," the girl earnestly asked, "that Rosanna 

has in herself the most extraordinary charm?" 

"Oh you think she has extraordinary charm?" 

"Of course I do — and so do you: don't be 

167 



 

absurd ! She's simply superb," Cissy expounded, 
"in her own original way, which no other woman 
over here — except me a little perhaps ! — has so 
much as a suspicion of anything to compare with; 
and which, for all we know, constitutes a luxury 
entirely at Graham's service." Cissy required 
but a single other look at it all to go on: "I 
shouldn't in the least wonder if they were already 
engaged." 

"I don't think there's a chance of it," Haughty 
said, "and I hold that if any such fear is your 
only difficulty you may be quite at your ease. 
Not only do I so see it," he went on, "but I know 
why I do." 

C^ssy just waited. "You consider that because 
she refused Horton Vint she'll decline marriage 
altogether ? " 

"I think that throws a light," this gentleman 
smiled — "though it isn't all my ground. She 
turned me down, two years ago, as utterly as I 
shall ever have been turned in my life — and if I 
chose so to look at it the experience would do for 
me beautifully as that of an humiliation served 
up to a man in as good form as he need desire. 
That it was, that it still is when I live it through 
again; that it will probably remain, for my com- 
fort — in the sens% that I'm likely never to have 
a worse. I've had my dose," he figured, "of 
that particular black draught, and I've got the 
bottle there empty on the shelf." 

168 ' 



 

"And yet you signify that you're all the same 

glad ?" Cissy didn't for the instant wholly 

follow. 

"Well, it all came to me then; and that it did 
all come is what I have the advantage of now — 
I mean, you see, in being able to reassure you as 
I do. I had some wonderful minutes with her — 
it didn't take long," Haughty laughed. "We 
saw in those few minutes, being both so horribly 
intelligent; and what I recognised has remained 
with me. What she did is her own affair — and 
that she could so perfectly make it such, without 
leaving me a glimmer of doubt, is what I have, 
as I tell you, to blink at forever. I may ask my- 
self if you like," he pursued, "why I should 'mind' 
so much if I saw even at the moment that she 
wasn't at any rate going to take someone else — 
and if you do I shall reply that I didn't need 
that to make it bad. It was bad enough just in 
itself. My point is, however," Horton concluded, 
"that I can give you at least the benefit of my 
feeling utterly sure that Gray will have no chance. 
She's in the dreadful position — and more than 
ever of course now — of not being able to believe 
she can be loved for herself." 

"You mean because you couldn't make her 
believe it ?" asked Cissy after taking this in. 

"No — not that, for I didn't so much as try. 
I didn't — and it was awfully superior of me, you 
know — approach her at all on that basis. That," 

169 



 

said Horton, "is where it cuts. The basis was 
that of my own capacity only — my capacity to 
serve her, in every particular, with every apti- 
tude I possess in the world, and which I could 
see she saw I possess (it was given me somehow 
to send that home to her !) without a hair's breadth 
overlooked. I shouldn't have minded her taking 
me so for impossible, blackly impossible, if she 
had done it under an illusion; but she really 
believed in me as a general value, quite a first- 
rate value — that I stood there and didn't doubt. 
And yet she practically said 'You ass !' " 

His encircling arm gained, for response to this, 
however, but the vibration of her headshake — 
without so much as any shudder at the pain he 
so vividly imaged. "She practically said that 
she was already then in love with Mr. Graham, 
and you wouldn't have had a better chance had 
a passion of your own stuck out of you. If I 
thought she didn't admire you," Cissy said, "I 
shouldn't be able to do with her at all — it would 
be too stupid of her; putting aside her not accept- 
ing you, I mean — for a woman can't accept every 
man she admires. I suppose you don't at present 
object," she continued, "to her admiring Mr. 
Graham enough to account for anything; espe- 
cially as it accounts so for her having just acted 
on his behalf with such extraordinary success. 
Doesn't that make it out for him," she asked, 
"that he's admired by twenty millions plus the 

170 



 

amount that her reconciliation of him with his 
uncle just in time to save it, without an hour to 
spare, will represent for his pocket ? We don't 
know what that lucky amount may be " 

"No, but we more or less shall " — Horton took 
her straight up. "Of course, without exaggera- 
tion, that will be interesting — even though it 
will be but a question, I'm quite certain, of com- 
paratively small things. Old Betterman — there 
are people who practically know, and I've talked 
with them — isn't going to foot up to any faint 
likeness of what Gaw does. That, however, has 
nothing to do with it: all that is relevant — since 
I quite allow that, speculation for speculation, 
our association in this sort represents finer fun 
than it has yet succeeded in doing in other sorts 
— all that's relevant is that when you've seen 
Gray you mayn't be in such a hurry to figure him 
as a provoker of insatiable passions. Your in- 
sidious Northover has, as you say, worked you 
up, but wait a little to see if the reality corre- 
sponds." 

"He showed me a photograph, my insidious 
Northover," Cissy promptly recalled; "he was 
naif enough, poor dear, for that. In fact he 
made me a present of several, including one of 
himself; I owe him as well two or three other 
mementos, all of which I've cherished." 

"What was he up to anyway, the old cor- 
rupter of your youth?" — Horton seemed really 

171 



 

to wonder. "Unless it was that you simply re- 
duced him to infatuated babble." 

"Well, there are the photographs and things 
to show," she answered unembarrassed — "though 
I haven't them with me here; they're put away 
in New York. His portrait's extremely good- 
looking." 

"Do you mean Mr. Northover's own?" 

"Oh his is of course quite beautiful. But I 
mean Mr. Fielder's — at his then lovely age. I 
remember it," said Cissy, "as a nice, nice face." 

Haughty on his side indulged in the act of 
memory, concluding after an instant to a head- 
shake. "He isn't at all remarkable for looks; 
but putting his nice face at its best, granting 
that he has a high degree of that advantage, do 
you see Rosanna so carried away by it as to cast 
everything to the winds for him ?" 

Cissy weighed the question. "We've seen 
surely what she has been carried away enough 
to do." 

"She has had other reasons — independent of 
headlong passion. And remember," he further 
argued — "if you impute to her a high degree of 
that sort of sensibility- — how perfectly proof she 
was to my physical attractions, which I declare 
to you without scruple leave the very brightest 
you may discover in Gray completely in the 
shade." 

Again his companion considered. "Of course 
172 



 

you're dazzlingly handsome; but are you, my 
dear, after all — I mean in appearance— so very 
interesting ?" 

The inquiry was so sincere that it could be 
met but in the same spirit. "Didn't you then 
find me so from the first minute you ever looked 
at me ? " 

"We're not talking of me," she returned, "but 
of people who happen to have been subjects less 
predestined and victims less abject. What," she 
then at once went on, "is Gray's appearance 
'anyway' ? Is he black, to begin with, or white, 
or betwixt and between ? Is he little or big or 
neither one thing or t'other? Is he fat or thin 
or of 'medium weight' ? There are always such 
lots to be told about people, and never a creature 
in all the wide world to tell. Even Mr. North- 
over, when I come to think of it, never mentioned 
his size." 

"Well, you wouldn't mention it," Horton 
amiably argued. The appeal, he showed withal, 
stirred him to certain recoveries. "And I should 
call him black — black as to his straight thick 
hair, which I see rather distinctively 'slick' and 
soigne — the hair of a good little boy who never 
played at things that got it tumbled. No, he's 
only very middling tall; in fact so very mid- 
dling," Haughty made out, "that it probably 
comes to his being rather short. But he has 
neither a hump nor a limp, no marked physical 

173 



 

deformity of any sort; has in fact a kind of futile 
fidgetty quickness which suggests the little man, 
and the nervous and the active and the ready; 
the ready, I mean, for anything in the way of 
interest and talk — given that the matter isn't 
too big for him. The 'active,' I say, though 
at the same time," he noted, "I ask myself 
what the deuce the activity will have been 
about." 

The girl took in these impressions to the effect 
of desiring still more of them. "Doesn't he 
happen then to have eyes and things?" 

"Oh yes" — Horton bethought himself — "lots 
and lots of eyes, though not perhaps so many 
of other things. Good eyes, fine eyes, in fact I 
think anything whatever you may require in the 
way of eyes." 

"Then clearly they're not 'black': I never 
require black ones," she said, "in any conceivable 
connection: his eyes — blue-grey, or grey-blue, 
whichever you may call it, and far and away the 
most charming kind when one doesn't happen to 
be looking into your glorious green ones — his 
satisfactory eyes are what will more than any- 
thing else have done the business. They'll have 
done it so," she went on, "that if he isn't red in 
the face, which I defy him to be, his features 
don't particularly matter — though there's not 
the least reason either why he should have mean 
or common ones. In fact he hasn't them in the 

174 



 

photograph, and what are photographs, the 
wretched things, but the very truth of life ?" 

"He's not red in the face," Haughty was able 
to state — "I think of him rather as of a pale, 
very pale, clean brown; and entirely unad- 
dicted," he felt sure, "to flushing or blushing. 
What I do sort of remember in the feature way 
is that his teeth though good, fortunately, as 
they're shown a good deal, are rather too small 
and square; for a man's, that is, so that they make 
his smile a trifle " 

"A trifle irresistible of course," Cissy broke in 
— "through their being, in their charming form, 
of the happy Latin model; extremely like my 
own, be so good as to notice for once in your 
life, and not like the usual Anglo-Saxon fangs. 
You're simply describing, you know," she added, 
"about as gorgeous a being as one could wish 
to see." 

"It's not I who am describing him — it's you, 
love; and ever so delightfully." With which, 
in consistency with that, he himself put a ques- 
tion. "What does it come to, by the way, in 
the sense of a moustache? Does he, or doesn't 
he after all, wear one ? It's odd I shouldn't re- 
member, but what does the photograph say?" 

"It seems odd indeed / shouldn't" — Cissy had 
a moment's brooding. She gave herself out as 
ashamed. "Fancy my not remembering if the 
photograph is moustachue ! " 

175 



 

"It can't be then very" Horton contributed 
— the point was really so interesting. 

"No," Cissy tried to settle, "the photograph 
can't be so very moustachue." 

"His moustaches, I mean, if he wears 'em, 
can't be so very prodigious; or one could scarcely 
have helped noticing, could one?" 

"Certainly no one can ever have failed to 
notice yours — and therefore Gray's, if he has 
any, must indeed be very inferior. And yet he 
can't be shaved like a sneak-thief — or like all 
the world here," she developed; "for I won't 
have him with nothing at all any more than I'll 
have him with anything prodigious, as you say; 
which is worse than nothing. When I say I 
won't have him with nothing," she explained, 
"I mean I won't have him subject to the so uni- 
versally and stupidly applied American law that 
every man's face without exception shall be 
scraped as clean, as glabre, as a fish's — which it 
makes so many of them so much resemble. I 
won't have him so," she said, "because I won't 
have him so idiotically gregarious and without 
that sense of differences in things, and of their 
relations and suitabilities, which such exhibitions 
make one so ache for. If he's gregarious to that 
sort of tune we must renounce our idea — that is 
you must drop yours — of my working myself up 
to snatch him from the arms of Rosanna. I 
must believe in him, for that, I must see him at 

176 



 

least in my own way," she pursued; "believing 
in myself, or even believing in you, is a com- 
parative detail. I won't have him bristle with 
horrid demagogic notes. I shouldn't be able to 
act a scrap on that basis." 

It was as if what she said had for him the in- 
terest at once of the most intimate and the most 
enlarged application; it was in fact as if she 
alone in all the world could touch him in such 
fine ways — could amuse him, could verily in- 
struct him, to anything like such a tune. "It 
seems peculiarly a question of bristles if it all 
depends on his moustache. Our suspense as to 
that, however, needn't so much ravage us," 
Haughty added, "when we remember that Davey, 
who, you tell me, will by this time have seen 
him, can settle the question for us as soon as we 
meet at dinner. It will by the same stroke then 
settle that of the witchcraft which has according 
to your theory so bedevilled poor dear Rosanna's 
sensibility — leading it such a dance, I mean, and 
giving such an empire to certain special items 
of our friend's 'personality,' that the connection 
was practically immediate with his brilliant 
status." 



177 



Ill 



Horton, looking at his watch, had got up as he 
spoke — which Cissy at once also did under this 
recall of the lapse of their precious minutes. 
There was a point, however, left for her to make; 
which she did with the remark that the item they 
had been discussing in particular couldn't have 
been by itself the force that had set their young 
woman originally in motion, inasmuch as Gray 
wouldn't have had a moustache when a small 
boy or whatever, and as since that young con- 
dition, she understood, Rosanna hadn't again 
seen him. A proposition to which Haughty's 
assent was to remain vague, merged as it sud- 
denly became in the cry of "Hello, here he is!" 
and a prompt gay brandish of arms up at their 
host Bradham, arrayed for the evening, white- 
waistcoated and buttonholed, robustly erect on 
an overlooking ledge and explaining his presence, 
from the moment it was thus observed, by calling 
down that Gussy had sent him to see if she wasn't 
to expect them at dinner. It was practically a 
summons to Cissy, as the girl easily recognised, 
to leave herself at least ten minutes to dress de- 
cently — in spite of the importance of which she 
so challenged Davey on another score that, as 
a consequence, the good gorgeous man, who 

178 



 

shone with every effect of the bath and every 
resource of the toilet, had within the pair of 
minutes picked out such easiest patent-leather 
steps as would enable him to convict the com- 
panions of a shameless dawdle. She had had 
time to articulate for Horton's benefit, with no 
more than due distinctness, that he must have 
seen them, and Horton had as quickly found the 
right note and the right wit for the simple re- 
assurance "Oh Davey !" As occupants of 

a place of procrastination that they only were 
not such fools as to leave unhaunted they frankly 
received their visitor, any impulse in whom to 
sprinkle stale banter on their search for solitude 
would have been forestalled, even had it been 
supposable of so perfect a man of the world, by 
the instant action of his younger guest's strategic 
curiosity. 

"Has he, please, just has he or no, got a mous- 
tache ? " — she appealed as if the fate of empires 
depended on it. 

"I've been telling her," Horton explained, 
"whatever I can remember of Gray Fielder, but 
she won't listen to anything if I can't first be 
sure as to that. So as I want her enormously to 
like him, we both hang, you see, on your lips; 
unless you call it, more correctly, on his." 

Davey's evening bloom opened to them a dense 
but perfectly pathless garden of possibilities; out 
of which, while he faced them, he left them to 

179 



 

pluck by their own act any bright flower they 
sufficiently desired to reach. Wonderful during 
the few instants, between these flagrant world- 
lings, the exchange of fine recognitions. It would 
have been hard perhaps to say of them whether 
it was most discernible that Haughty and Cissy 
trusted most his intelligence or his indifference, 
and whether he most applauded or ignored the 
high perfection of their assurance. What was 
testified to all round, at all events — 1 

"Ah then he is as 'odd' as I was sure — in spite 
of Haughty's perverse theory that we shall find 
him the flattest of the flat !" 

It might have been at Haughty's perverse 
theory that Davey was most moved to stare — 
had he not quickly betrayed, instead of this, a 
marked attention to the girl herself. "Oh you 
little wonder and joy !" 

"She is a little wonder and joy," Horton said 
— that at any rate came out clear. 

"What you are, my boy, I'm not pretending 

1 There is a gap here in the MS., with the following note by the 
author: "It is the security of the two others with him that is testi- 
fied to; but I mustn't make any sort of spread about it or about 
anything else here now, and only put Davey on some non-committal 
reply to the question addressed him, such as keeps up the mystery 
or ambiguity or suspense about Gray, his moustache and everything 
else, so as to connect properly with what follows. The real point 
is — that comes back to me, and it is in essence enough — that he 
pleads he doesn't remember, didn't notice, at all; and thereby oddly 
enough can't say. It will come to me right once I get into it. One 
sees that Davey plays with them." 

1 80 



 

to say," Davey returned in answer to this; "for 
I don't accept her account of your vision of Gray 
as throwing any light on it at all." 

"On his judgment of Mr. Fielder, do you 
mean," Cissy earnestly asked, "or on your evi- 
dently awful opinion of his own dark nature?" 

"Haughty knows that I lose myself in his 
dark nature, at my spare moments, and with 
wind enough on to whistle in that dark, very 
much as if I had the fine excitement of the Foret 
de Bondy to deal with. He's well aware that I 
know no greater pleasure of the imagination than 
that sort of interest in him — when I happen also 
to have the time and the nerve. Let these things 
serve me now, however, only to hurry you up," 
Davey went on; "and to say that I of course 
had with our fortunate friend an impressive 
quarter of an hour — which everyone will want 
to know about, so that I must keep it till we sit 
down. But the great thing is after all for your- 
self, Haughty," he added — "and you had better 
know at once that he particularly wants to see 
you. He'll be glad of you at the very first mo- 
ment " 

But Horton had already taken him easily up. 
"Of course I know, my dear man, that he par- 
ticularly wants to see me. He has written me 
nothing else from the moment he arrived." 

"He has written you, you wretch," Cissy at 
once extravagantly echoed — "he has written you 

181 



 

all sorts of things and you haven't so much as 
told me?" 

"He hasn't written me all sorts of things" — 
Horton directed this answer to Davey alone— 
"but has written me in such straight confidence 
and friendship that I've been wondering if I 
mayn't go round to him this evening." 

"Gussy will no doubt excuse you for that pur- 
pose with the utmost joy," Davey rejoined — 
"though I don't think I advise you to ask her 
leave if you don't want her at once to insist on 
going with you. Go to him alone, very quietly 
— and with the happy confidence of doing him 
good." 

It had been on Cissy that, for his part, Davey 
had, in speaking, rested his eyes; and it might 
by the same token have been for the benefit of 
universal nature, suspended to listen over the 
bosom of the deep, that Horton's lips phrased 
his frank reaction upon their entertainer's words. 
"Well then, ye powers, the amount of good that 
I shall undertake ! " 

Davey Bradham and Cissy Foy exchanged on 
the whole ground for a moment a considerable 
smile; his share in which, however, it might 
exactly have been that prompted the young 
woman's further expression of their intelligence, 
"It's too charming that he yearns so for Haughty 
— and too sweet that Haughty can now rush to 
him at once." To which she then appended in 

182 



 

another tone: "One takes for granted of course 
that Rosanna was with him." 

Davey at this but continued to bloom and beam; 
which gave Horton, even with a moment's delay, 
time to assist his better understanding. "She 
doesn't even yet embrace the fact, tremendously 
as I've driven it into her, that if Rosanna had 
been there he couldn't have breathed my name." 

This made Davey, however, but throw up de- 
risive hands; though as with an impatient turn 
now for their regaining the lawn. "My dear 
man, Rosanna breathes your name with all the 
force of her lungs ! " 

Horton, jerking back his head for the bright 
reassurance, laughed out with amusement. "What 
a jolly cue then for my breathing of hers ! I'll 
roar it to all the echoes, and everything will be 
well. But what one's talking about," he said, 
"is the question of Gray's naming me" He 
looked from one of his friends to the other, and 
then, as gathering them into the interest of it: 
"I'll bet you a fiver that he doesn't at any rate 
speak to me of Miss Gaw." 

"Well, what will that prove?" Davey asked,quite 
easy about it and leading the way up the rocks. 

"In the first place how much he thinks of her," 
said Cissy, who followed close behind. "And in 
the second that it's ten to one Haughty will find 
her there." 

"I don't care if I do — not a scrap!" Horton 
183 



 

also took his way. "I don't care for anything 

now but the jolly fun, the jolly fun !" He 

had committed it all again, by the time they 
reached the clifPs edge, to the bland participating 
elements. 

"Oh the treat the poor boy is evidently going 
to stand us all\" — well, was something that 
Davey, rather out of breath as they reached the 
lawn again and came in sight of the villa, had 
just yet no more than those light words for. He 
was more definite in remarking immediately 
after to Cissy that Rosanna would be as little 
at the other house that evening as she had been 
at the moment of his own visit, and that, since 
the nurses and other outsiders appeared to have 
dispersed, there would be no one to interfere 
with Gray's free welcome of his friend. The girl 
was so attentive for this that it made them pause 
again while she brought out in surprise: "There's 
nobody else there, you mean then, to watch with 
the dead ?" 

It made Mr. Bradham for an instant wonder, 
Horton, a little apart from them now and with 
his back turned, seeming at the same moment, 
and whether or no her inquiry reached his ear, 
struck with something that had pulled him up 
as well and that made him stand and look down 
in thought. "Why, I suppose the nephew must 
be himself a sort of watcher," Davey found him- 
self not other than decently vague to suggest. 

184 



 

But it scarce more contented Cissy than if the 
point had really concerned her. She appeared 
indeed to question the more, though her eyes 
were on Haughty's rather brooding back while 
she did so. "Then if he does stay in the room, 
when he comes out of it to see people ?" 

Her very drop seemed to present the state of 
things to which the poor deceased was in that 
case left; for which, however, her good host de- 
clined to be responsible. "I don't suppose he 
comes out for so many." 

"He came out at any rate for you." The sense 
of it all rather remarkably held her, and it might 
have been some communication of this that, 
overtaking Horton at his slight distance, deter- 
mined in him the impulse to leave them, without 
more words, and walk by himself to the house. 
"We don't surround such occasions with any 
form or state of imagination — scarcely with any 
decency, do we?" Cissy adventured while ob- 
serving Haughty's retreat. "I should like to 
think for him of a catafalque and great draped 
hangings — I should like to think for him of tall 
flambeaux in the darkened room, and of relays 
of watchers, sisters of charity or suchlike, sur- 
rounding the grand affair and counting their 
beads." 

Davey's rich patience had a shrug. "The 
grand affair, my dear child, is their affair, over 
there, and not mine; though when you indulge 

185 



 

in such fancies 'for him,' I can't but wonder who 
it is you mean." 

"Who it is ?" She mightn't have under- 
stood his difficulty. 

"Why the dead man or the living!" 

They had gone on again; Horton had, with a 
quickened pace, disappeared; and she had be- 
fore answering cast about over the fair face of 
the great house, paler now in the ebb of day, 
yet with dressing-time glimmers from upper 
windows flushing it here and there like touches 
of pink paint in an elegant evening complexion. 
"Oh I care for the dead man, I'm afraid, only 
because it's the living who appeals. I don't 
want him to like it." 

"To like ?" Davey was again at a loss. 

"What on earth ?" 

"Why all that ugliness and bareness, that 
poverty of form." 

He had nothing but derision for her here. "It 
didn't occur to me at all to associate him with the 
idea of poverty." 

"The place must all the same be hideous," she 
said, " and the conditions mean — for him to prowl 
about in alone. It comes to me," she further 
risked, "that if Rosanna isn't there, as you say, 
she quite ought to be — and that in her place I 
should feel it no more than decent to go over and 
sit with him." 

This appeared to strike Davey in a splendid 
186 



 

number of lights — which, however, though col- 
lectively dazzling, allowed discriminations. "It 
perhaps bears a little on the point that she has 
herself just sustained a grave bereavement — with 
her offices to her own dead to think of first. That 
was present to me in your talk a moment since 
of Haughty's finding her." 

"Very true" — it was Cissy's practice, once 
struck, ever amusedly to play with the missile: 
"it is of course extraordinary that those bloated 
old richards, at one time so associated, should 
have flickered out almost at the same hour. 
What it comes to then," she went on, "is that 
Mr. Gray might be, or perhaps even ought to 
be, condoling over at the other house with her. 
However, it's their own business, and all I really 
care for is that he should be so keen as you say 
about seeing Haughty. I just delight," she said, 
"in his being keen about Haughty." 

"I'm glad it satisfies you then," Davey re- 
turned — "for I was on the point of suggesting 
that with the sense of his desolation you just 
expressed you might judge your own place to 
be at once at his side." 

"That would have been helpful of you — -but 
I'm content, dear Davey," she smiled. "We're 
all devoted to Haughty — but," she added after 
an instant, "there's just this. Did Mr. Graham 
while you were there say by chance a word about 
the likes ofmeV 

187 



 

"Well, really, no — our short talk didn't take 
your direction. That would have been for me, I 
confess," Davey frankly made bold to add, "a 
trifle unexpected." 

"I see" — Cissy did him the justice. "But 
that's a little, I think, because you don't know 

!" It was more, however, than with her 

sigh she could tell him. 

"Don't know by this time, my dear, and after 
all I've been through," he nevertheless supplied, 
"what the American girl always so sublimely 
takes for granted ? " 

She looked at him on this with intensity — but 
that of compassion rather than of the conscious 
wound. "Dear old Davey, il n'y a que vous for 
not knowing, by this time, as you say, that I've 
notoriously nothing in common with the creature 
you mention. I loathe," she said with her purest 
gentleness, "the American girl." 

He faced her an instant more as for a view of 
the whole incongruity; then he fetched, on his 
side, a sigh which might have signified, at her- 
choice, either that he was wrong or that he was 
finally bored. "Well, you do of course brilliantly 
misrepresent her. But we're all" — he hastened 
to patch it up — "unspeakably corrupt." 

"That would be a fine lookout for Mr. Fielder 
if it were true," she judiciously threw off. 

"But as you're a judge you know it isn't?" 
'It's not as a judge I know it, but as a vic- 



«i 



 

tim. I don't say we don't do our best," she add- 
ed; "but we're still of an innocence, an inno- 
cence !" 

"Then perhaps," Davey offered, "Mr. Fielder 
will help us; unless he proves, by your measure, 
worse than ourselves ! " 

"The worse he may be the better; for it's not 
possible, as I see him," she said, "that he doesn't 
know." 

"Know, you mean," Davey blandly wondered, 
"how wrong we are — to be so right ?" 

"Know more on every subject than all of us 
put together!" she called back at him as she 
now hurried off to dress. 



189 



IV 



Horton Vint, on being admitted that evening 
at the late Mr. Betterman's, walked about the 
room to which he had been directed and awaited 
there the friend of his younger time very much 
as we have seen that friend himself wait under 
stress of an extraordinary crisis. Horton's sense 
of a crisis might have been almost equally sharp; 
he was alone for some minutes during which he 
shifted his place and circled, indulged in wide 
vague movements and vacuous stares at incon- 
gruous objects — the place being at once so spacious 
and so thickly provided — quite after the fashion 
in which Gray Fielder's nerves and imagination 
had on the same general scene sought and found 
relief at the hour of the finest suspense up to that 
moment possessing him. Haughty too, it would 
thus have appeared for the furtherance of our 
interest, had imagination and nerves — had in 
his way as much to reflect upon as we have al- 
lowed ourselves to impute to the dying Mr. Bet- 
terman's nephew. No one was dying now, all 
that was ended, or would be after the funeral, 
and the nephew himself was surely to be sup- 
posed alive, in face of great sequels, including 
preparations for those obsequies, with an intensity 
beyond all former experience. This in fact Hor- 

190 



 

ton had all the air of recognising under proof as 
soon as Gray advanced upon him with both 
hands out; he couldn't not have taken in the 
highly quickened state of the young black-clad 
figure so presented, even though soon and un- 
mistakably invited to note that his own yisit 
and his own presence had much to do with the 
quickening. Gray was in complete mourning, 
which had the effect of making his face show, 
pale, as compared with old aspects of it remem- 
bered by his friend-r-who was, it may be men- 
tioned, afterwards to describe him to Cissy Foy 
as looking, in the conditions, these including the 
air of the big bedimmed palace room, for all the 
world like a sort of "happy Hamlet." For so 
happy indeed our young man at once proclaimed 
himself at sight of his visitor, for so much the 
most interesting thing that had befallen or been 
offered him within the week did he take, by his 
immediate testimony, his reunion with this char- 
acter and every element of the latter's aspect 
and tone, that the pitch of his acclamation clearly 
had, with no small delay, to drop a little under 
some unavoidable reminder that they met almost 
in the nearest presence of death. Was the re- 
minder Horton's own, some pull, for decorum, 
of a longer face, some expression of his having 
feared to act in undue haste on the message 
brought him by Davey? — which might have 
been, we may say, in view of the appearance 

191 



 

after a little that it was Horton rather than Gray 
who began to suggest a shyness, momentary, 
without doubt, and determined by the very 
plenitude of his friend's welcome, yet so far in- 
congruous as that it was not his adoption of a 
manner and betrayal of a cheer that ran the risk 
of seeming a trifle gross, but quite these indica- 
tions on the part of the fortunate heir of the old 
person awaiting interment somewhere above. 
He could only have seen with the lapse of the 
moments that Gray was going to be simple — ad- 
mirably, splendidly simple, one would probably 
have pronounced it, in estimating and comparing 
the various possible dangers; but the simplicity 
of subjects tremendously educated, tremendously 
"cultivated" and cosmopolitised, as Horton would 
have called it, especially when such persons were 
naturally rather extra-refined and ultra-percep- 
tive, was a different affair from the crude can- 
dour of the common sort; the consequence of 
which apprehensions and reflections must have 
been, in fine, that he presently recognised in the 
product of "exceptional advantages" now already 
more and more revealed to him such a pliability 
of accent as would easily keep judgment, or at 
least observation, suspended. Gray wasn't going 
to be at a loss for any shade of decency that didn't 
depend, to its inconvenience, on some uncertainty 
about a guest's prejudice; so that once the air 
was cleared of awkwardness by that perception, 

192 



 

exactly, in Horton's ready mind that he and his 
traditions, his susceptibilities, in fact (of all the 
queer things!) his own very simplicities and, 
practically, stupidities were being superfluously 
allowed for and deferred to, and that this, only 
this, was the matter, he should have been able to 
surrender without a reserve to the proposed 
measure of their common rejoicing. Beautiful 
might it have been to him to find his friend so 
considerately glad of him that the spirit of it 
could consort to the last point with any, with 
every, other felt weight in the consciousness so 
attested; in accordance with which we may re- 
mark that continued embarrassment for our 
gallant caller would have implied on his own side, 
or in other words deep within his own spirit, 
some obscure source of confusion. 

What distinguishably happened was thus that 
he first took Graham for exuberant and then for 
repentant, with the reflection accompanying this 
that he mustn't, to increase of subsequent shame, 
have been too open an accomplice in mere jubila- 
tion. Then the simple sense of his restored com- 
rade's holding at his disposal a general confidence 
in which they might absolutely breathe together 
would have superseded everything else hadn't his 
individual self-consciousness been perhaps a trifle 
worried by the very pitch of so much openness. 
Open, not less generously so, was what he could 
himself have but wanted to be — in proof of which 

193 



 

we may conceive him insist to the happy utmost, 
for promotion of his comfort, on those sides of 
their relation the working of which would cast 
no shadow. They had within five minutes got 
over much ground — all of which, however, must 
be said to have represented, and only in part, 
the extent of Gray's requisition of what he called 
just elementary human help. He was in a situa- 
tion at which, as he assured his friend, he had 
found himself able, those several days, but blankly 
and inanely to stare. He didn't suppose it had 
been his uncle's definite design to make an idiot 
of him, but that seemed to threaten as the prac- 
tical effect of the dear man's extraordinary course. 
"You see," he explained, bringing it almost piti- 
fully out, "he appears to have left me a most 
monstrous fortune. I mean"— for under his ap- 
peal Haughty had still waited a little — " a really 
tremendous lot of money." 

The effect of the tone of it was to determine 
in Haughty a peal of laughter quickly repressed 
— or reduced at least to the intention of decent 
cheer. "He 'appears,' my dear man? Do you 
mean there's an ambiguity about his will ? " 

Gray^ justified his claim of vagueness by hav- 
ing, with his animated eyes on his visitor's, to 
take an instant or two to grasp so technical an 
expression. "No^— not an ambiguity. Mr. Crick 
tells me that he has never in all his experience 
seen such an amount of property disposed of in 

194 



 

terms so few and simple and clear. It would 
seem a kind of masterpiece of a will." 

"Then what's the matter with it?" Horton 
smiled. "Or at least what's the matter with 
you ? — who are so remarkably intelligent and 
clever ? " 

"Oh no, I'm not the least little bit clever!" 
Gray in his earnestness quite excitedly protested. 
"I haven't a single ray of the intelligence that 
among you all here clearly passes for rudimen- 
tary. But the luxury of you, Haughty," he broke 
out on a still higher note, "the luxury, the pure 
luxury of you!" 

Something of beauty in the very tone of which, 
some confounding force in the very clearness, 
might it have been that made Horton himself 
gape for a moment even as Gray had just de- 
scribed his own wit as gaping. They had first 
sat down, for hospitality offered and accepted 
— though with no production of the smokable or 
the drinkable to profane the general reference; 
but the agitation of all that was latent in this 
itself had presently broken through, and by the 
end of a few moments we might perhaps scarce 
have been able to say whether the host had more 
set the guest or the guest more the host in mo- 
tion. Horton Vint had everywhere so the air 
of a prime social element that it took in any case, 
and above all in any case of the spacious provision 
or the sumptuous setting, a good deal of practically 

195 



 

combative proof to reduce the implications of his 
presence to the minor right. He might inveterately 
have been master or, in quantitative terms, owner 
— so could he have been taken for the most part 
as offering you the enjoyment of anything fine 
that surrounded him: this in proportion to the 
scale of such matters and to any glimpse of that 
sense of them in you which was what came nearest 
to putting you on his level. All of which sprang 
doubtless but from the fact that his relation to 
things of expensive interest was so much at the 
mercy of his appearance; representing as it might 
be said to do a contradiction of the law under 
which it is mostly to be observed, in our mod- 
ernest conditions, that the figure least congruous 
with scenic splendour is the figure awaiting the 
reference. More references than may here be 
detailed, at any rate, would Horton have seemed 
ready to gather up during the turns he had re- 
sumed his indulgence in after the original arrest 
and the measurements of the whole place prac- 
tically determined for him by Gray's own so 
suggestive revolutions. It was positively now as 
if these last had all met, in their imperfect ex- 
pression, what that young man's emotion was in 
the act of more sharply attaining to — the plain 
conveyance that if Horton had in his friendliness, 
not to say his fidelity, presumed to care to know, 
this disposition was as naught beside the knowl- 
edge apparently about to drench him. They 

196 



 

were there, the companions, in their second brief 
arrest, with everything good in the world that 
he might have conceived or coveted just taking 
for him the radiant form of precious knowledges 
that he must be so obliging as to submit to. Let 
it be fairly inspiring to us to imagine the acute- 
ness of his perception during these minutes of 
the possibilities of good involved; the refinement 
of pleasure in his seeing how the advantage thrust 
upon him would wear the dignity and grace of 
his consenting unselfishly to learn — inasmuch as, 
quite evidently, the more he learnt, and though 
it should be ostensibly and exclusively about Mr. 
Betterman's heir, the more vividly it all would 
stare at him as a marked course of his own. Won- 
derful thus the little space of his feeling the great 
wave set in motion by that quiet worthy break 
upon him out of Gray's face, Gray's voice, Gray's 
contact of hands laid all appealingly and affirm- 
ingly on his shoulders, and then as it retreated, 
washing him warmly down, expose to him, off 
in the intenser light and the uncovered prospect, 
something like his entire personal future. Some- 
thing extraordinarily like, yes, could he but keep 
steady to recognise it through a deepening con- 
sciousness, at the same time, of how he was more 
than matching the growth of his friend's need 
of him by growing there at once, and to rankness, 
under the friend's nose, all the values to which 
this need supplied a soil. 

197 



 

"Well, I won't pretend Fm not glad you don't 
adopt me as pure ornament — glad you see, I 
mean, a few connections in which one may per- 
haps be able, as well as certainly desirous, to be 
of service to you. Only one should honestly tell 
you," Horton went on, "that people wanting to 
help you will spring up round you like mush- 
rooms, and that you'll be able to pick and choose 
as even a king on his throne can't. Therefore, 
my boy,", Haughty said, "don't exaggerate my 
modest worth." 

Gray, though releasing him, still looked at him 
hard — so hard perhaps that, having imagination, 
he might in an instant more have felt it go down 
too deep. It hadn't done that, however, when 
"What I want of you above all is exactly that 
you shall pick and choose" was merely what at 
first came of it. And the case was still all of the 
rightest as Graham at once added: "You see 
'people' are exactly my difficulty — I'm so mor- 
tally afraid of them, and so equally sure that 
it's the last thing you are. If I want you for my- 
self I want you still more for others — by which 
you may judge," said Gray, "that I've cut you 
out work." 

"That you're mortally afraid of people is, I 
confess," Haughty answered, "news to me. I 
seem to remember you, on the contrary, as so 
remarkably and — what was it we used to call it ? 
— so critico-analytically interested in 'em." 

198 



 

"That's just it — I am so beastly interested ! 
Don't you therefore see," Gray asked, "how I 
may dread the complication?" 

"Dread it so that you seek to work it off on 
another?" — and Haughty looked about as if he 
would after all have rather relished a cigarette. 

Clearly, none the less, this awkwardness was 
lost on his friend. "I want to work off on you, 
Vinty, every blest thing that you'll let me; and 
when you've seen into my case a little further 
my reasons will so jump at your eyes that I'm 
convinced you'll have patience with them." 

"I'm not then, you think, too beastly inter- 
ested myself ? I've got such a free mind, 

you mean, and such a hard heart, and such a 
record of failure to have been any use at all to 
myself, that I must be just the person, it strikes 
you, to save you all the trouble and secure you 
all the enjoyment?" That inquiry Horton pres- 
ently made, but with an addition ere Gray could 
answer. "My difficulty for myself, you see, has 
always been that I also am by my nature too 
beastly interested." 

"Yes" — Gray promptly met it — "but you like 
it, take that easily, immensely enjoy it and are 
not a bit afraid of it. You carry it off and you 
don't pay for it." 

"Don't you make anything," Horton simply 
went on, "of my being for instance so uncannily 
interested in yourself?" 

199 



 

Gray's eyes again sounded him. "Are you 
really and truly ? — to the extent of its not boring 
you?" But with all he had even at the worst 
to take for granted he waited for no reassurance. 
"You'll be so sorry for me that I shall wring your 
heart and you'll assist me for common pity." 

"Well," Horton returned, a natural gaiety of 
response not wholly kept under, "how can I 
absurdly make believe that pitying you, if it 
comes to that, won't be enough against nature 
to have some fascination ? Endowed with every 
advantage, personal, physical, material, moral, 
in other words, brilliantly clever, inordinately 
rich, strikingly handsome and incredibly good, 
your state yet insists on being such as to nip in 
the bud the hardy flower of envy. What's the 
matter with you to bring that about would seem, 
I quite agree, well worth one's looking into — 
even if it proves, by its perversity or its folly, 
something of a trial to one's practical philosophy. 
When I pressed you some minutes ago for the 
reason of your not facing the future with a cer- 
tain ease you gave as that reason your want 
of education and wit. But please understand," 
Horton added, "that I've no time to waste with 
you on sophistry that isn't so much as plausible." 
He stopped a moment, his hands in his pockets, 
his head thrown all but extravagantly back, so 
that his considering look might have seemed for 
the time to descend from a height designed a 

200 



 

little to emphasise Gray's comparative want of 
stature. That young man's own eyes remained 
the while, none the less, unresentfully raised; to 
such an effect indeed that, after some duration 
of this exchange, the bigger man's fine irony 
quite visibly shaded into a still finer, and withal 
frankly kinder, curiosity. Poor Gray, with a 
strained face and an agitation but half controlled, 
breathed quick and hard, as from inward pres- 
sure, and then, renouncing choice — there were 
so many things to say — shook his head, slowly 
and repeatedly, after a fashion that discouraged 
levity. "My dear boy," said his friend under 
this sharper impression, "you do take it hard." 
Which made Graham turn away, move about 
in vagueness of impatience and, still panting and 
still hesitating for other expression, approach 
again, as from a blind impulse, the big chimney- 
piece, reach for a box that raised a presumption 
of cigarettes and, the next instant, thrust it out 
in silence at his visitor. The latter's welcome 
of the motion, his prompt appropriation of relief, 
was also mute; with which he found matches in 
advance of Gray's own notice of them and had 
a light ready, of which our young man himself 
partook, before the box went back to its shelf. 
Odd again might have been for a protected wit- 
ness of this scene — which of course is exactly 
what you are invited to be — the lapse of speech 
that marked it for the several minutes. Horton, 

201 



 

truly touched now, and to the finer issue we have 
glanced at, waited unmistakably for the sign of 
something more important than his imagination, 
even at its best, could give him, and which, not 
less conceivably, would be the sort of thing he 
himself hadn't signs, either actual or possible, for. 
He waited while they did the place at last the 
inevitable small violence — this being long enough 
to make him finally say: "Do you mean, on 
your honour, that you don't like what has hap- 
pened to you?" 

This unloosed then for Gray the gate of pos- 
sible expression. "Of course I like it — that is 
of course I try to. I've been trying here, day 
after day, as hard as ever a decent man can have 
tried for anything; and yet I remain, don't you 
see ? a wretched little worm." 

"Deary, deary me," stared Horton, "that you 
should have to bring up your appreciation of it 
from such depths ! You go in for it as you would 
for the electric light or the telephone, and then 
find half-way that you can't stand the expense 
and want the next-door man somehow to com- 
bine with you?" 

"That's exactly it, Vinty, and you're the next- 
door man!" — Gray embraced the analogy with 
glee. "I can't stand the expense, and yet I don't 
for a moment deny I should immensely enjoy the 
convenience. I want" he asseverated, "to like 
my luck. I want to go in for it, as you say, with 

202 



 

every inch of any such capacity as I have. And 
I want to believe in my capacity; I want to work 
it up and develop it — I assure you on my honour 
I do. I've lashed myself up into feeling that if 
I don't I shall be a base creature, a worm of 
worms, as I say, and fit only to be utterly ashamed. 
But that's where you come in. You'll help me 
to develop. To develop my capacity I mean," 
he explained with a wondrous candour. 

Horton was now, small marvel, all clear faith; 
even, the cigarettes helping, to the verge again of 
hilarity. "Your capacity — I see. Not so much 
your property itself." 

"Well" — Gray considered of it — "what will 
my property be except my capacity ?" He spoke 
really as for the pleasure of seeing very finely and 
very far. "It won't if I don't like it, that is if I 
don't understand it, don't you see? enough to 
make it count. Yes, yes, don't revile me," he 
almost feverishly insisted: "I do want it to 
count for all it's worth, and to get everything 
out of it, to the very last drop of interest, plea- 
sure, experience, whatever you may call it, that 
such a possession can yield. And I'm going to 
keep myself up to it, to the top of the pitch, by 
every art and prop, by every helpful dodge, that 
I can put my hand on. You see if I don't. I 
breathe defiance," he continued, with his rare 
radiance, "at any suspicion or doubt. But I 
come back," he had to add, "to my point 

203 



 

that it's you that I essentially most depend 
on." 

Horton again looked at him long and frankly; 
this subject of appeal might indeed for the mo- 
ment have been as embarrassed between the vari- 
ous requisitions of response as Gray had just 
before shown himself. But as the tide could 
surge for one of the pair so it could surge for the 
other, and the large truth of what Horton most 
grasped appeared as soon as he had spoken. 
"The name of your complaint, you poor dear 
delightful person, or the name at least of your 
necessity, your predicament and your solution, is 
marriage to a wife at short order. I mean of 
course to an amiable one. There, so obviously, 
is your aid and your prop, there are the sources 
of success for interest in your fortune, and for 
the whole experience and enjoyment of it, as you 
can't find them elsewhere. What are you but 
just 'fixed' to marry, and what is the sense of 
your remarks but a more or less intelligent clam- 
our for it?" 

Triumphant indeed, as we have said, for lucid- 
ity and ease, was this question, and yet it had 
filled the air, for its moment, but to drop at once 
by the practical puncture of Gray's perfect recog- 
nition. ''Oh of course I've thought of that — but 
it doesn't meet my case at all." Had he been 
capable of disappointment in his friend he might 
almost have been showing it now. 

204 



 

Horton had, however, no heat about it. "You 
mean you absolutely don't want a wife — in con- 
nection, so to speak, with your difficulties; or with 
the idea, that is, of their being resolved into 
blessings ?" 

"Well" — Gray was here at least all prompt 
and clear— "I keep down, in that matter, so much 
as I can any a priori or mere theoretic want. 
I see my possibly marrying as an effect, I mean 
— I somehow don't see it at all as a cause. A 
cause, that is" — he easily worked it out — "of 
my getting other things right. It may be, in 
conditions, the greatest Tightness of all; but I 
want to be sure of the conditions." 

"The first of which is, I understand then" — 
for this at least had been too logical for Haughty 
not to have to match it — "that you should fall 
so tremendously in love that you won't be able 
to help yourself." 

Graham just debated; he was all intelligence 
here. "Falling tremendously in love — the way 
you grands amoureux talk of such things !" 

"Where do you find, my boy," Horton asked, 
"that I'm a grand amoureux?" 

Well, Gray had but to consult his memory of 
their young days together; there was the admis- 
sion, under pressure, that he might have confused 
the appearances. "They were at any rate always 
up and at you— -which seems to have left me with 
the impression that your life is full of them." 

205 



 

"Every man's life is full of them that has a 
door or a window they can come in by. But the 
question's of yourself," said Haughty, " and just 
exactly of the number of such that you'll have 
to keep open or shut in the immense facade you'll 
now present." 

Our young man mfght well have struck him 
as before all else inconsequent. "I shall present 
an immense facade ? "— Gray, from his tone of 
surprise, to call it nothing more, would have 
thought of this for the first time. 

But Horton just hesitated. "You've great 
ideas if you see it yourself as a small one." 

"I don't see it as any. I decline," Gray re- 
marked, "to have a facade. And if I don't I 
shan't have the windows and doors." 

"You've got 'em already, fifty in a row" — 
Haughty was remorseless — "and it isn't a 
question of 'having': you are a facade; stretch- 
ing a mile right and left. How can you not 
be when I'm walking up and down in front of 
you?" 

"Oh you walk up and down, you make the 
things you pass, and you can behave of course 
if you want like one of the giants in uniform, 
outside the big shops, who attend the ladies in 
and out. In fact," Gray went on, "I don't in 
the least judge that I am, or can be at all ad- 
vertised as, one of the really big. You seem all 
here so hideously rich that I needn't fear to count 

206 



 

as extraordinary; indeed I'm very competently 
assured I'm by all your standards a very mod- 
erate affair. And even if I were a much greater 
one" — he gathered force — "my appearance of it 
would depend only on myself. You can have 
means and not be blatant; you can take up, by 
the very fact itself, if you happen to be decent, 
no more room than may suit your taste. I'll be 
hanged if I consent to take up an inch more than 
suits mine. Even though not of the truly bloated 
I've at least means to be quiet. Every one among 
us — I mean among the moneyed — isn't a monster 
on exhibition." In proof of which he abounded. 
"I know people myself who aren't." 

Horton considered him with amusement, as 
well apparently as the people that he knew! 
"Of course you may dig the biggest hole in the 
ground that ever was dug — spade-work comes 
high, but you'll have the means — and get down 
into it and sit at the very bottom. Only your 
hole will become then the feature of the scene, 
and we shall crowd a thousand deep all round 
the edge of it." 

Gray stood for a moment looking down, then 
faced his guest as with a slight effort. "Do you 
know about Rosanna Gaw?" And then while 
Horton, for reasons of his own, failed at once to 
answer: "She has come in for millions " 

"Twenty-two and a fraction," Haughty said 
at once. "Do you mean that she sits, like Truth, 

207 



 

at the bottom of a well?" he asked still more 
divertedly. 

Gray had a sharp gesture. "If there's a person 
in the world whom I don't call a facade !" 

"You don't call her one?" — Haughty took it 
right up. And he added as for very compassion : 
"My poor man, my poor man !" 

"She loathes self-exhibition; she loathes being 
noticed; she loathes every form of publicity." 
Gray quite flushed for it. 

Horton went to the mantel for another cigar- 
ette, and there was that in the calm way of it 
that made his friend, even though helping him 
this time to a light, wait in silence for his word. 
"She does more than that" — it was brought quite 
dryly out. "She loathes every separate dollar 
she possesses." 

Gray's sense of the matter, strenuous though 
it was, could just stare at this extravagance of 
assent; seeing however, on second thoughts, what 
there might be in it. "Well then if what I have 
is a molehill beside her mountain, I can the more 
easily emulate her in standing back." 

"What you have is a molehill?" Horton was 
concerned to inquire. 

Gray showed a shade of guilt, but faced his 
judge. "Well — so I gather." 

The judge at this lost patience. "Am I to 
understand that you positively cultivate vague- 
ness and water it with your tears?" 

208 



 

"Yes" — the culprit was at least honest — "I 
should rather say I do. And I want you to let 
me. Do let me." 

"It's apparently more then than Miss Gaw 
does!" 

"Yes" — Gray again considered; "she seems 
to know more or less what she's worth, and she 
tells me that I can't even begin to approach it." 

"Very crushing of her!" his friend laughed. 
"You 'make the pair', as they say, and you 
must help each other much. Her 'loathing' it 
exactly is — since we know all about it ! — that 
gives her a frontage as wide as the Capitol at 
Washington. Therefore your comparison proves 
little — though I confess it would rather help 
us," Horton pursued, "if you could seem, as you 
say, to have asked one or two of the questions 
that I should suppose would have been open to 
you." 

"Asked them of Mr. Crick, you mean ?" 

"Well, yes — if you've nobody else, and as you 
appear not to have been able to have cared to 
look at the will yourself." 

Something like a light of hope, at this, kindled 
in Gray's face. "Would you care to look at it, 
Vinty?" 

The inquiry gave Horton pause. "Look at it 
now, you mean ? " 

"Well — whenever you like. I think," said 
Gray, "it must be in the house." 

209 



 

"You're not sure even of that ?" his companion 
wailed. 

"Oh I know there are two" — our young man 
had coloured. "I don't mean different ones, but 
copies of the same," he explained; "one of which 
Mr. Crick must have." 

"And the other of which" — Horton pieced 
it together — "is the one you offer to show me?" 

"Unless, unless !" and Gray, casting about, 

bethought himself. "Unless that one !" 

With his eyes on his friend's he still shamelessly 
wondered. 

"Unless that one has happened to get lost," 
Horton tenderly suggested, "so that you can't 
after all produce it ? " 

"No, but it may be upstairs, upstairs " 

Gray continued to turn this over. "I think it 
is" he then recognised, "where I had perhaps 
better not just now disturb it." 

His recognition was nothing, apparently, how- 
ever, to the clear quickness of Horton's. "It's 
in your uncle's own room ?" 

"The room," Gray, assented, "where he lies 
in death while we talk here." This, his tone 
suggested, sufficiently enjoined delay. 

Horton's concurrence was immediately such 
that, once more turning off, he measured, for 
the intensity of it, half the room. "I can't ad- 
vise you without the facts that you're unable to 
give," he said as he came back, "but I don't' 

210 



 

indeed invite you to go and rummage in that 
presence." He might have exhaled the faintest 
irony, save that verily by this time, between these 
friends — by which I mean of course as from one 
of them only, the more generally assured, to the 
other — irony would, to an at all exhaustive analy- 
sis, have been felt to flicker in their medium. 
Gray might in fact, on the evidence of his next 
words, have found it just distinguishable. 



211 



"We do talk here while he lies in death" — 
they had in fine all serenity for it. "But the 
extraordinary thing is that my putting myself 
this way at my ease — and for that matter putting 
you at yours — is exactly what the dear man 
made to me the greatest point of. I haven't the 
shade of a sense, and don't think I ever shall 
have, of not doing what he wanted of me; for 
what he wanted of me," our particular friend 
continued, "is — well, so utterly unconventional. 
He would like my being the right sort of well- 
meaning idiot that you catch me in the very 
fact of. I warned him, I sincerely, passionately 
warned him, that I'm not fit, in the smallest de- 
gree, for the use, for the care, for even the most 
rudimentary comprehension, of a fortune; and 
that exactly it was which seemed most to settle 
him. He wanted me clear, to the last degree, 
not only of the financial brain, but of any sort 
of faint germ of the money-sense whatever — 
down to the very lack of power, if he might be 
so happy (or if / might!) to count up to ten on 
my fingers. Satisfied of the limits of my arith- 
metic he passed away in bliss." 

To this, as fairly lucid, Horton had applied 
his understanding. "You can't count up to ten ?" 

212 



 

"Not all the way. Still," our young man 
smiled, "the greater inspiration may now give 
me the lift." 

His guest looked as if one might by that time 
almost have doubted. But it was indeed an ex- 
traordinary matter. "How comes it then that 
your want of arithmetic hasn't given you a want 
of order? — unless indeed I'm mistaken and you 
were perhaps at sixes and sevens?" 

"Well, I think I was at sixes — though I never 
got up to sevens ! I've never had the least rule 
or method; but that has been a sort of thing I 
could more or less cover up — from others, I mean, 
not from myself, who have always been help- 
lessly ashamed of it. It hasn't been the disorder 
of extravagance," Gray explained, "but the 
much more ignoble kind, the wasteful thrift that 
doesn't really save, that simply misses, and that 
neither enjoys things themselves nor enjoys their 
horrid little equivalent of hoarded pence. I 
haven't needed to count far, the fingers of one 
hand serving for my four or five possessions; 
and also I've kept straight not by taking no 
liberties with my means, but by taking none 
with my understanding of them. From fear of 
counting wrong, and from loathing of the act 
of numerical calculation, and of the humiliation 
of having to give it up after so few steps from 
the start, I've never counted at all — and that, 
you see, is what has saved me. That has been 

213 



 

my sort of disorder — which you'll agree is the 
most pitiful of all." 

Horton once more turned away from him, but 
slowly this time, not in impatience, rather with 
something of the preoccupation of a cup-bearer 
whose bowl has been filled to the brim and who 
must carry it a distance with a steady hand. So 
for a minute or two might he have been taking 
this care; at the end of which, however, Gray 
saw him stop in apparent admiration before a 
tall inlaid and brass-bound French bahut; with 
the effect, after a further moment, of a sharp 
break of their thread of talk. "You've got some 
things here at least to enjoy and that you ought 
to know how to keep hold of; though I don't 
so much mean," he explained, "this expensive 
piece of furniture as the object of interest perched 
on top." 

"Oh the ivory tower! — yes, isn't that, Vinty, 
a prize piece and worthy of the lovely name?" 

Vinty remained for the time all admiration, 
having, as you would easily have seen, lights 
enough to judge by. "It appears to have been 
your uncle's only treasure — as everything else 
about you here is of a newness ! And it isn't so 
much too small, Gray," he laughed, "for you 
to get into it yourself, when you want to get 
rid of us, and draw the doors to. If it's a 
symbol of any retreat you really have an eye on 
I much congratulate you; I don't know what 

214 



 

I wouldn't give myself for the 'run' of an ivory 
tower." 

"Well, I can't ask you to share mine," Gray 
returned; "for the situation to have a sense, I 
take it, one must sit in one's tower alone. And 
I should properly say," he added after an hesi- 
tation, "that mine is the one object, all round 
me here, that I don't owe my uncle: it has been 
placed at my disposition, in the handsomest way 
in the world, by Rosanna Gaw." 

"Ah that does increase the interest — even if 
susceptible of seeming to mean, to one's bewilder- 
ment, that it's the sort of thing she would like 
to thrust you away into; which I hope, however, 
is far from the case. Does she then keep ivory 
towers, a choice assortment ? " Horton quite 
gaily continued; "in the sense of having a row 
of them ready for occupation, and with tenants 
to match perchable in each and signalling along 
the line from summit to summit ? Because" — 
and, facing about from his contemplation, he 
piled up his image even as the type of object 
represented by it might have risen in the air — 
"you give me exactly, you see, the formula of 
that young lady herself: perched aloft in an ivory 
tower is what she is, and I'll be hanged if this 
isn't a hint to you to mount, yourself, into just 
such another; under the same provocation, I 
fancy her pleading, as she has in her own case 
taken for sufficient." Thus it was that, suddenly 

215 



 

more brilliant than ever yet, to Graham's ap- 
prehension, you might well have guessed, his 
friend stood nearer again — stood verily quite 
irradiating responsive ingenuity. Markedly would 
it have struck you that at such instants as this, 
most of all, the general hush that was so thick 
about them pushed upward and still further 
upward the fine flower of the inferential. Follow- 
ing the pair closely from the first, and beginning 
perhaps with your idea that this life of the in- 
telligence had its greatest fineness in Gray Fielder, 
you would by now, I dare say, have been brought 
to a more or less apprehensive foretaste of its 
possibilities in our other odd agent. For how 
couldn't it have been to the full stretch of his 
elastic imagination that Haughty was drawn out 
by the time of his putting a certain matter beau- 
tifully to his companion ? " Don't I, 'gad, take 
the thing straight over from you — all of it you've 
been trying to convey to me here ! — when I see 
, you, up in the blue, behind your parapet, just 
gracefully lean over and call down to where I 
mount guard at your door in the dust and com- 
parative darkness ? It's well to understand" — 
his thumbs now in his waistcoat-holes he measured 
his idea as if Gray's own face fairly reflected it : 
"you want me to take all the trouble for you 
simply, in order that you may have all the fun. 
And you want me at the same time, in order that 
things shall be for you at their ideal of the easiest, 

216 



 

to make you believe, as a salve to your conscience, 
that the fun isn't so mixed with the trouble as 
that you can't have it, on the right arrangement 
made with me, quite by itself. This is most in- 
genious of you," Horton added, "but it doesn't 
in the least show me, don't you see ? where my 
fun comes in." 

"I wonder if I can do that," Gray returned, 
"without making you understand first some- 
thing of the nature of mine — or for that mat- 
ter without my first understanding myself 
perhaps what my queer kind of it is most likely 
to be." 

His companion showed withal for more and 
more ready to risk amused recognitions. "You 
are 'rum' with your queer kinds, and might make 
my flesh creep, in these conditions, if it weren't 
for something in me of rude pluck." Gray, in 
speaking, had moved towards the great French 
meuble with some design upon it or upon the 
charge it carried; which Horton's eyes just won- 
deringly noted — and to the effect of an exaggera- 
tion of tone in his next remark. "However, there 
are assurances one doesn't keep repeating: it's 
so little in me, I feel, to refuse you any service 
I'm capable of, no matter how clumsily, that if 
you take me but confidently enough for the agent 
even of your unholiest pleasures, you'll find me 
still putting them through for you when you've 
broken down in horror yourself." 

217 



 

"Of course it's my idea that whatever I ask 
you shall be of interest to you, and of the liveliest, 
in itself — quite apart from any virtue of my con- 
nection with it. If it speaks to you that way so 
much the better," Gray went on, standing now 
before the big bahut with both hands raised and 
resting on the marble top. This lifted his face 
almost to the level of the base of his perched 
treasure — so that he stared at the ivory tower 
without as yet touching it. He only continued 
to talk, though with his thought, as he brought 
out the rest of it, almost superseded by the new 
preoccupation. "I shall absolutely decline any 
good of anything that isn't attended by some 
equivalent or — what do you call it ? — propor- 
tionate good for you. I shall propose to you a 
percentage, if that's the right expression, on 
every blest benefit I get from you in the way of 
the sense of safety." Gray now moved his hands, 
laying them as in finer fondness to either smoothly- 
plated side of the tall repository, against which 
a finger or two caressingly rubbed. His back 
turned therefore to Horton, he was divided be- 
tween the growth of his response to him and 
that of this more sensible beauty. "Don't I 
kind of insure my life, my moral consciousness, 
I mean, for your advantage ? — or with you, as 
it were, taking you for the ofiiceman or actuary, 
if I'm not muddling: to whom I pay a handsome 
premium for the certainty of there being to my 

218 



 

credit, on my demise, a sufficient sum to clear 
off my debts and bury me." 

"You propose to me a handsome premium ? 
Catch me," Horton laughed, "not jumping at 
thatV 

"Yes, and you'll of course fix the premium 
yourself." But Gray was now quite detached, 
occupied only in opening his ivory doors with 
light fingers and then playing these a little, whether 
for hesitation or for the intenser pointing of in- 
quiry, up and down the row of drawers so exposed. 
Against the topmost they then rested a moment 
— drawing out this one, however, with scant 
further delay and enabling themselves to feel 
within and so become possessed of an article con- 
tained. It was with this article in his hand that 
he presently faced about again, turning it over, 
resting his eyes on it and then raising them to 
his visitor, who perceived in it a heavy letter, 
duly addressed, to all appearance, but not stamped 
and as yet unopened. "The distinguished re- 
treat, you see, has its tenant." 

"Do you mean by its tenant the author of 
those evidently numerous pages ? — unless you 
rather mean," Horton asked, "that you seal up 
in packets the love-letters addressed to you and 
find that charming receptacle a congruous place 
to keep them ? Is there a packet in every drawer, 
and do you take them out this way to remind 
yourself fondly that you have them and that it 

219 



 

mayn't be amiss for me to feel your conquests 
and their fine old fragrance dangled under my 
nose ? " 

Our young man, at these words, had but re- 
turned to the consideration of his odd property, 
attaching it first again to the superscription and 
then to the large firm seal. "I haven't the least 
idea what this is; and I'm divided in, respect of 
it, I don't mind telling you, between curiosity 
and repulsion." 

Horton then also eyed the ambiguity, but at 
his discreet distance and reaching out for it as 
little as his friend surrendered it. "Do you ap- 
peal to me by chance to help you to decide either 
way?" 

Poor Gray, still wondering and fingering, had 
a long demur. "No — I don't think I want to 
decide." With which he again faced criticism. 
"The extent, Vinty, to which I think I must 
just like to drift !" 

Vinty seemed for a moment tp give this in- 
dicated quantity the attention invited to it, but 
without more action for the case than was rep- 
resented by his next saying: "Why then do you 
produce your question — apparently so much for 
my benefit?" 

"Because in the first place you noticed the 
place it lurks in, and because in the second I like 
to tell you things." 

This might have struck us as making the strained 
220 



 

note in Vinty's smile more marked. "But that's 
exactly, confound you, what you don't do ! Here 
have I been with you half an hour without your 
practically telling me anything!" 

Graham, very serious, stood a minute looking 
at him hard; succeeding also quite it would seem 
in taking his words not in the least for a reproach 
but for a piece of information of the greatest 
relevance, and thus at once dismissing any minor 
importance. He turned back with his minor 
importance to his small open drawer, laid it with- 
in again and, pushing the drawer to, closed the 
doors of the cabinet. The act disposed of the 
letter, but had the air of introducing as definite 
a statement as Horton could have dreamt of. 
"It's a bequest from Mr. Gaw." 

"A bequest" — Horton wondered — "of bank- 
notes?" 

"No — it's a letter addressed to me just before 
his death, handed me by his daughter, to whom 
he intrusted it, and not likely, I think, to contain 
money. He was then sure, apparently, of my 
coming in for money; and even if he hadn't been 
would have had no ground on earth for leaving 
me anything." 

Horton's visible interest was yet consonant 
with its waiting a little for expression. "He 
leaves you the great Rosanna." 

Graham, at this, had a stare, followed by a flush 
as the largest possible sense of it came out. "You 

221 



 

suppose it perhaps the expression of a wish ? " 

And then as Horton forbore at first as to what 
he supposed: "A wish that I may find confidence 
to apply to his daughter for her hand ?" 

"That hasn't occurred to you before ?" Horton 
asked — "nor the measure of the confidence sug- 
gested been given you by the fact of your receiv- 
ing the document from Rosanna herself? You 
do give me, you extraordinary person," he gaily 
proceeded, "as good opportunities as I could pos- 
sibly desire to 'help' you !" 

Graham, for all the felicity of this, needed but 
an instant to think. "I have it from Miss Gaw 
herself that she hasn't an idea of what the letter 
contains — any more than she has the least desire 
that I shall for the present open it." 

"Well, mayn't that very attitude in her rather 
point to a suspicion ? " was his guest's ingenious 
reply. "Nothing could be less like her certainly 
than to appear in such a case to want to force 
your hand. It makes her position — with exqui- 
site filial piety, you see — extraordinarily delicate." 

Prompt as that might be, Gray appeared to 
show, no sportive sophistry, however charming, 
could work upon him. "Why should Mr. Gaw 
want me to marry his daughter ? " 

Horton again hung about a little. "Why 
should you be so afraid of ascertaining his idea 
that you don't so much as peep into what he 
writes on the subject ? " 

222 



 



««, 



'Afraid? Am I afraid?" Gray fairly spoke 
with a shade of the hopeful, as if even that would 
be richer somehow than drifting. 

"Well, you looked at your affair just now as 
you might at some small dangerous, some biting 
or scratching, animal whom you're not at all sure 
of." 

"And yet you see I keep him about." 

"Yes — you keep him in his cage, for which I 
suppose you have a key." 

"I have indeed a key, a charming little golden 
key." With which Gray took another turn; once 
more facing criticism, however, to say with force: 
"He hated him most awfully!" 

Horton appeared to wonder. "Your uncle 
hated old Gaw?" 

"No — I don't think he cared. I speak of Mr. 
Gaw's own animus. He disliked so mortally his 
old associate, the man who lies dead upstairs — 
and in spite of my consideration for him I still 
preserve his record." 

"How do you know about his hate," Horton 
asked, "or if your letter, since you haven't read 
it, is a record?" 

"Well, I don't trust it — I mean not to be. I 
don't see what else he could have written me 
about. Besides," Gray added, "I've my per- 
sonal impression." 

"Of old Gaw ? You have seen him then ?" 

"I saw him out there on this verandah, where 
223 



 

he was hovering in the most extraordinary fashion, 
a few hours before his death. It was only for a 
few minutes," Gray said — "but they were minutes 
I shall never forget." 

Horton's interest, though so deeply engaged, 
was not unattended with perplexity. "You mean 
he expressed to you such a feeling at such an 
hour?" 

"He expressed to me in about three minutes, 
without speech, to which it seemed he couldn't 
trust himself, as much as it might have taken 
him, or taken anyone else, to express in three 
months at another time and on another subject. 
If you ever yourself saw him," Gray went on, 
"perhaps you'll understand." 

"Oh I often saw him — and should indeed in 
your place perhaps have understood. I never 
heard him accused of not making people do so. 
But you hold," said Horton, "that he must have 
backed up for you further the mystic revelation ? " 

"He had written before he saw me — written 
on the chance of my being a person to be affected 
by it; and after seeing me he didn't destroy or 
keep back his message, but emphasised his wish 
for a punctual delivery." 

"By which it is evident," Horton concluded, 
"that you struck him exactly as such a person." 

"He saw me, by my idea, as giving my atten- 
tion to what he had there ready for me." Gray 
clearly had talked himself into possession of his 

224 



 

case. "That's the sort of person I succeeded in 
seeming to him — though I can assure you without 
my the least wanting to." 

"What you feel is then that he thought he 
might attack with some sort of shock for you the 
character of your uncle?" Vinty's question had 
a special straightness. 

"What I feel is that he has so attacked it, 
shock or no shock, and that that thing in my 
cabinet, which I haven't examined, can only be 
the proof." 

It gave Horton much to turn over. " But your 
conviction has an extraordinary bearing. Do 
I understand that the thing was handed you 
by your friend with a knowledge of its con- 
tents?" 

"Don't, please," Gray said at once, "under- 
stand anything either so hideous or so impossible. 
She but carried out a wish uttered on her father's 
deathbed, and hasn't so much as suggested that 
I break the portentous seal. I think in fact," 
he assured himself, "that she greatly prefers I 
shouldn't." 

"Which fact," Horton observed, "but adds 
of course to your curiosity." 

Gray's look at him betrayed on this a still finer 
interest in his interest. "You see the limits in 
me of that passion." 

"Well, my dear chap, I've seen greater limits 
to many things than your having your little secret 

225 



 

tucked away under your thumb. Do you mind 
my asking," Horton risked, "whether what deters 
you from action — and by action I mean opening 
your letter — is just a real apprehension of the 
effect designed by the good gentleman ? Do you 
feel yourself exposed, by the nature of your mind 
or any presumption on Gaw's behalf, to give 
credit, vulgarly speaking, to whatever charge or 
charges he may bring ? " 

Gray weighed the question, his wide dark eyes 
would have told us, in his choicest silver scales. 
"Neither the nature of my mind, bless it, nor the 
utmost force of any presumption to the contrary, 
prevents my having found my uncle, in his won- 
derful latest development, the very most charm- 
ing person that I've ever seen in my life. Why 
he impressed me as a model of every virtue." 

"I confess I don't see," said Horton, "how a 
relative so behaving could have failed to endear 
himself. With such convictions why don't you 
risk looking ? " 

Gray was but for a moment at a loss — he quite 
undertook to know. "Because the whole thing 
would be so horrible. I mean the question itself 
is — and even our here and at such a time dis- 
cussing it." 

"Nothing is horrible — to the point of making 
one quake," Horton opined, "that falls to the 
ground with a smash from the moment one drops 
it. The sense of your document is exactly what's 

226 



 

to be appreciated. It would have no sense at all 
if you didn't believe." 

Gray considered, but still differed. "Yes, to 
find it merely vindictive and base, and thereby 
to have to take it for false, that would still be 
an odious experience." 

"Then why the devil don't you simply destroy 
the thing?" Horton at last quite impatiently 
inquired. 

Gray showed perhaps he had scarce a reason, 
but had, to the very brightest effect, an answer. 
"That's just what I want you to help me to. To 
help me, that is," he explained, "after a little to 
decide for." 

"After a little?" wondered Horton. "After 
how long?" 

"Well, after long enough for me to feel sure 
I don't aet in fear. I don't want," he went on 
as in fresh illustration of the pleasure taken by 
him, to the point, as it were, of luxury, in feeling 
no limit to his companion's comprehension, or 
to the patience involved in it either, amusedly 
as Horton might at moments attempt to belie 
that, adding thereby to the whole service some- 
thing still more spacious — "I don't want to act 
in fear of anything or of anyone whatever; I 
said to myself at home three weeks ago, or when- 
ever, that it wasn't for that I was going to come 
over; and I propose therefore, you see, to know 
so far as possible where I am and what I'm 

227 



 

about: morally speaking at least, if not finan- 
cially." 

His friend but looked at him again on this in 
rather desperate diversion. "I don't see how 
you're to know where you are, I confess, if you 
take no means to find out." 

"Well, my acquisition of property seems by 
itself to promise me information, and for the 
understanding of the lesson I shall have to take 
a certain time. What I want," Gray finely ar- 
gued, "is to act but in the light of that." 

"In the light of time ? Then why do you begin 
by so oddly wasting it ? " 

"Because I think it may be the only way for 
me not to waste understanding. Don't be afraid," 
he went on, moving as by the effect of Horton's 
motion, which had brought that subject of appeal 
a few steps nearer the rare repository, "that I 
shall commit the extravagance of at all wasting 
you." 

Horton, from where he had paused, looked up 
at the ivory tower; though as Gray was placed 
in the straight course of approach to it he had 
after a fashion to catch and meet his eyes by the 
way. "What you really want of me, it's clear, 
is to help you to fidget and fumble — or in other 
words to prolong the most absurd situation; and 
what I ought to do, if you'd believe it of me, is 
to take that stuff out of your hands and just 
deal with it myself." 

228 



 

"And what do you mean by dealing with it 
yourself?" 

"Why destroying it unread by either of us — 
which," said Horton, looking about, "I'd do in 
a jiffy, on the spot, if there were only a fire in 
that grate. The place is clear, however, and 
we've matches; let me chuck your letter in and 
enjoy the blaze with you." 

"Ah, my dear man, don't! Don't!" Gray 
repeated, putting it rather as a plea for indul- 
gence than as any ghost of a defiance, but in- 
stinctively stepping backward in defence of his 
treasure. 

His companion, for a little, gazed at the- cabi- 
net, in speculation, it might really have seemed, 
as to an extraordinary reach of arm. "You posi- 
tively prefer to hug the beastly thing?" 

"Let me alone," Gray presently returned, "and 
you'll probably find I've hugged it to death." 

Horton took, however, on his side, a moment 
for further reflection. "I thought what you 
wanted of me to be exactly not that I should let 
you alone, but that I should give you on the con- 
trary my very best attention!" 

"Well," Gray found felicity to answer, "I feel 
that you'll see how your very best attention will 
sometimes consist in your not at all minding me." 

So then for the minute Horton looked as if he 
took it. The great clock on the mantel appeared 
to have stopped with the stop of its late owner's 

229 



 

life; so that he eyed his watch and startled at 
the hour to which they, had talked. He put out 
his hand for good-night, and this returned grasp 
held them together in silence a minute. Some- 
thing then in his sense of the situation determined 
his breaking out with an intensity not yet pro- 
duced in him. "Yes — you're really prodigious. 
I mean for trust in a fellow. For upon my hon- 
our you know nothing whatever about me." 

"That's quite what I mean," said Gray — "that 
I suffer from my ignorance of so much that's im- 
portant, and want naturally to correct it." 

"'Naturally'?" his visitor gloomed. 

"Why, I do know this about you, that when 
we were together with old Roulet at Neuchatel 
and, off on our cours that summer, had strayed 
into a high place, in the Oberland, where I was 
ass enough to have slid down to a scrap of a dizzy 
ledge, and so hung helpless over the void, unable 
to get back, in horror of staying and in greater 
horror of not, you got near enough to me, at the 
risk of your life, to lower to me the rope we so 
luckily had with us and that made an effort of 
my own possible by my managing to pass it under 
my arms. You helped that effort from a place 
of vantage above that nobody but you, in your 
capacity for playing up, would for a moment have 
taken for one, and you so hauled and steadied 
and supported me, in spite of your almost equal 
exposure, that little by little I climbed, I scram- 

230 



 

bled, my absolute confidence in you helping, for 
it amounted to inspiration, and got near to where 
you were." 

"From which point," said Horton, whom this 
reminiscence had kept gravely attentive, "you 
in your turn rendered me such assistance, I re- 
member, though I can't for the life of me imagine 
how you contrived, that the tables were quite 
turned and I shouldn't in the least have got out 
of my fix without you." He now pulled up short 
however; he stood a moment looking down. "It 
isn't pleasant to remember." 

"It wouldn't," Gray judged, "be pleasant to 
forget. You gave proof of extraordinary cool- 
ness." 

Horton still had his eyes on the ground. "We 
both kept our heads. I grant it's a decent note 
for us." 

"If you mean we were associated in keeping 
our heads, you kept mine," Gray remarked, 
"much more than I kept yours. I should be 
without a head to-day if you hadn't seen so to 
my future, just as I should be without a heart, 
you must really let me remark, if I didn't look 
now to your past. I consider that to know that 
fact in it takes me of itself well-nigh far enough 
in appreciation of you for my curiosity, even at 
its most exasperated, to rest on a bed of roses. 
However, my imagination itself," Gray still more 
beautifully went on, "insists on making additions 

231, 



 

— since how can't it, for that matter, picture again 
the rate at which it made them then ? I hadn't 
even at the time waited for you to save my life 
in order to think you a swell. If I thought you 
the biggest kind of one, and if in your presence 
now I see just as much as ever why I did, what 
does that amount to but that my mind isn't a 
blank about you ?" 

"Well, if mine had ever been one about you," 
said Horton, once more facing it, "our so inter- 
esting conversation here would have sufficed to 
cram it full. The least I can make of you, 
whether for your protection or my profit, is just 
that you're insanely romantic." 

"Romantic — yes," Gray smiled; "but oh, but 
oh, so systematically!" 

"It's your system that's exactly your madness. 
How can you take me, without a stroke of suc- 
cess, without a single fact of performance, to my 
credit, for anything but an abject failure ? You're 
in possession of no faintest sign, kindly note, that 
I'm not a mere impudent ass." 

Gray accepted this reminder, for all he showed 
to the contrary, in the admiring spirit in which 
he might have regarded a splendid somersault or 
an elegant trick with cards; indulging, that is, 
by his appearance, in the forward bend of atten- 
tion to it, but then falling back to more serious 
ground. "It's my romance that's itself my rea- 
son; by which I mean that I'm never so reason- 

232 



 

able, so deliberate, so lucid and so capable- J -to 
call myself capable at any hour! — as when I'm 
most romantic. I'm methodically and consist- 
ently so, and nothing could make and keep me, 
for any dealings with me, I hold, more conve- 
niently safe and quiet. You see that you can 
lead me about by a string if you'll only tie it to 
my appropriate finger — which you'll find out, if 
you don't mind the trouble, by experience of the 
wrong ones, those where the attachment won't 
'act.'" He drew breath to give his friend the 
benefit of this illustration, but another connection 
quickly caught him up. "How can you pretend 
to suggest that you're in these parts the faintest 
approach to an insignificant person? How can 
you pretend that you're not as clever as you can 
stick together, and with the cleverness of the 
right kind ? For there are odious kinds, I know 
— the kind that redresses other people's stupidity 
instead of sitting upon it." 

"I'll answer you those questions," Horton 
goodhumouredly said, "as soon as you tell me 
how you've come by your wonderful ground for 
them. Till you're able to do that I shall resent 
your torrent of abuse. The appalling creature 
you appear to wish to depict !" 

"Well, you're simply a figure — what I call — 
in all the force of the term; one has only to look 
at you to see it, and I shall give up drawing con- 
clusions from it only when I give up looking. 

233 



 

You can make out that there's nothing in a preju- 
dice," Gray developed, "for a prejudice may be, 
or must be, so to speak, single-handed; but you 
can't not count with a relation — I mean one 
you're a party to, because a relation is exactly 
a fact of reciprocity. Our reciprocity, which 
exists and which makes me a party to it by 
existing for my benefit, just as it makes you 
one by existing for yours, can't possibly result 
in your not 'figuring' to me, don't you see? with 
the most admirable intensity. And I simply de- 
cline," our young man wound up, "not to believe 
tremendous things of any subject of a relation of 
mine." 

"'Any' subject?" Vinty echoed in a tone that 
showed how intelligently he had followed. "That 
condition, Fm afraid," he smiled, "will cut down 
not a little your general possibilities of relation." 
And then as if this were cheap talk, but a point 
none the less remained: "In this country one's a 
figure (whatever you may mean by that !) on easy 
terms; and if I correspond to your idea of the 
phenomenon you'll have much to do — I won't 
say for my simple self, but for the comfort of your 
mind — to make your fond imagination fit the 
funny facts. You pronounce me an awful swell 
— which, like everything else over here, has less 
weight of sense in it for the saying than it could 
have anywhere else; but what barest evidence 
have you of any positive trust in me shown on 

234 



 

any occasion or in any connection by one creature 
you can name?" 

"Trust?" — Gray looked at the red tip of the 
cigarette between his fingers. 

"Trust, trust, trust!" 

Well, it didn't take long to say. "What do 
you call it but trust that such people as the Brad- 
hams, and all the people here, as he tells me, 
receive you with open arms ?" 

"Such people as the Bradhams and as 'all the 
people here'!" — Horton beamed on him for the 
beauty of that. "Such authorities and such 
'figures,' such allegations, such perfections and 
such proofs! Oh," he said, "I'm going to have 
great larks with you !" 

"You give me then the evidence I want in 
the very act of challenging me for it. What bet- 
ter proof of your situation and your character 
than your possession exactly of such a field for 
whatever you like, of such a dish for serving me 
up ? Mr. Bradham, as you know," Gray con- 
tinued, "was this morning so good as to pay me 
a visit, and the form in which he put your glory 
to me — because we talked of you ever so pleas- 
antly — was that, by his appreciation, you know 
your way about the place better than all the rest 
of the knowing put together." 

Horton smiled, smoked, kept his hands in his 
pockets. "Dear deep old Davey !" 

"Yes," said Gray consistently, "isn't he a 
235 



 

wise old specimen ? It's rather horrid for me 
having thus to mention, as if you had applied 
to me for a place, that I've picked up a good 
'character' of you, but since you insist on it he 
assured me that I couldn't possibly have a better 
friend." 

"Well, he's a most unscrupulous old person 
and ought really to be ashamed. What it comes 
to," Haughty added, "is that though I've re- 
peatedly stayed with them they've to the best 
of his belief never missed one 6£ the spoons. The 
fact is that even if they had poor Davey wouldn't 
know it." 

"He doesn't take care of the spoons?" Gray 
asked in a tone that made his friend at once swing 
round and away. He appeared to note an un- 
expectedness in this, yet, "out" as he was for 
unexpectedness, it could grow, on the whole, 
clearly, but to the raising of his spirits. "Well, 
I shall take care of my loose valuables and, un- 
warned by the Bradhams and likely to have such 
things to all appearance in greater number than 
ever before, what can I do but persist in my 
notion of asking you to keep with me, at your 
convenience, some proper count of them ? " After 
which as Horton's movement had carried him 
quite to the far end of the room, where the force 
of it even detained him a little, Gray had him 
again well in view for his return, and was prompted 
thereby to a larger form of pressure. "How can 

236 



 

you pretend to palm off on me that women mustn't 
in prodigious numbers 'trust' you?" 

Haughty made of his shoulders the most pro- 
digious hunch. "What importance, under the 
sun, has the trust of women — in numbers how- 
ever prodigious ? It's never what's best in a man 
they trust — it's exactly what's worst, what's most 
irrelevant to anything or to any class but them- 
selves. Their kind of confidence," he further 
elucidated, "is concerned only with the effect of 
their own operations or with those to which they 
are subject; it has no light either for a man's 
other friends or for his enemies : it proves nothing 
about him but in that particular and wholly de- 
tached relation. So neither hate me nor like me, 
please, for anything any woman may tell you." 

Horton's hand had on this renewed and em- 
phasised its proposal of good-night; to which his 
host acceded with the remark: "What superfluous 
precautions you take!" 

"How can you call them superfluous," he asked 
in answer to this, "when you've been taking them 
at such a rate yourself? — in the interest, I mean, 
of trying to persuade me that you can't stand on 
your feet?" 

"It hasn't been to show you that I'm silly about 
life — which is what you've just been talking of. 
It has only been to show you that I'm silly about 
affairs," Gray said as they went at last through 
the big bedimmed hall to the house doors, which 

237 



 

stood open to the warm summer night under the 
protection of the sufficient outward reaches. 

"Well, what are affairs but life?" Vinty, at 
the top of the steps, sought to know. 

"You'll make me feel, no doubt, how much 
they are — which would be very good for me. 
Only life isn't affairs — that's my subtle distinc- 
tion," Gray went on. 

"I'm not sure, I'm not sure!" said Horton 
while he looked at the stars. 

"Oh rot — / am!" Gray happily declared; to 
which he the next moment added: "What it 
makes you contend for, you see, is the fact of my 
silliness." 

"Well, what is that but the most splendid fact 
about you, you jolly old sage ?" — and his visitor, 
getting off, fairly sprang into the shade of the 
shrubberies. 



238 



BOOK FOURTH 
I 

Again and again, during the fortnight that fol- 
lowed his uncle's death, were his present and his 
future to strike our young man as an extraordi- 
nary blank cheque signed by Mr. Betterman and 
which, from the moment he accepted it at all, he 
must fill out, according to his judgment, his cour- 
age and his faith, with figures, monstrous, fan- 
tastic, almost cabalistic, that it seemed to him 
he should never learn to believe in. It was not 
so much the wonder of there being in various New 
York institutions strange deposits of money, to 
amounts that, like familiar mountain masses, ap- 
peared to begin at the blue horizon and, sloping 
up and up toward him, grew bigger and bigger 
the nearer he or they got, till they fairly overhung 
him with their purple power to meet whatever 
drafts upon them he should make; it was not the 
tone, the climax of dryness, of that dryest of men 
Mr. Crick, whose answering remark as to any 
and every particular presumption of credit was 
"Well, I guess I've fixed it so as you'll find some- 
thing there"; that sort of thing was of course 
fairy-tale enough in itself, was all the while and in 

239 



 

a hundred connections a sweet assault on his 
credulity, but was at the same time a phase of 
experience comparatively vulgar and that tended 
to lose its edge with repetition. The real, the 
overwhelming sense of his adventure was much 
less in the fact that he could lisp in dollars, as it 
were, and see the dollars come, than in those vast 
vague quantities, those spreading tracts, of his 
own consciousness itself on which his kinsman's 
prodigious perversity had imposed, as for his ex- 
ploration, the aspect of a boundless capital. This 
trust of the dead man in his having a nature that 
would show to advantage under a bigger strain 
than it had ever dreamed of meeting, and the 
corresponding desolate freedom on his own part 
to read back into the mystery such refinements 
either, or such crude candours, of meaning and 
motive as might seem best to fit it, that was the 
huge vague inscribable sum which ran up into 
the millions and for which the signature that let- 
tered itself to the last neatness wherever his mind's 
eye rested was "good" enough to reduce any 
more casual sign in the scheme of nature or of 
art to the state of a negligible blur. Mr. Crick's 
want of colour, as Gray qualified this gentleman's 
idiosyncrasy from the moment he saw how it 
would be their one point of contact, became, by 
the extreme rarity and clarity with which it 
couldn't but affect him, the very most gorgeous 
gem, of the ruby or topaz order, that the smooth 

240 



 

forehead of the actual was for the present to 
flash upon him. 

For dry did it appear inevitable to take the fact 
of a person's turning up, from New York, with no 
other retinue than an attendant scribe in a straw 
hat, a few hours before his uncle's last one, and 
being beholden to mere Miss Mumby for simple 
introduction to Gray as Mr. Betterman's lawyer. 
So had such sparenesses and barenesses of form to 
register themselves for a mind beset with the 
tradition that consequences were always somehow 
voluminous things; and yet the dryness was of a 
sort, Gray soon apprehended, that he might take 
up in handfuls, as if it had been the very sand of 
the Sahara, and thereby find in it, at the least 
exposure to light, the collective shimmer of 
myriads of fine particles. It was with the sub- 
stance of the desert taken as monotonously spar- 
kling under any motion to dig in it that the abyss 
of Mr. Crick's functional efficiency was filled. 
That efficiency, in respect to the things to be done, 
would clearly so answer to any demand upon it 
within the compass of our young man's subtlety, 
that the result for him could only be a couple of 
days of inexpressible hesitation as to the outward 
air he himself should be best advised to aim at 
wearing. He reminded himself at this crisis of 
the proprietor of a garden, newly acquired, who 
might walk about with his gardener and try to 
combine, in presence of abounding plants and the 

241 



 

vast range of luxuriant nature, an ascertainment 
of names and properties and processes with a dis- 
simulation, for decent appearance, of the positive 
side of his cockneyism. By no imagination of a 
state of mind so unfurnished would the gardener 
ever have been visited; such gaping seams in the 
garment of knowledge must affect him at the 
worst as mere proprietary languor, the offhand- 
ness of repletion; and no effective circumvention 
of traditional takings for granted could late-born 
curiosity therefore achieve. Gray's hesitation 
ceased only when he had decided that he needn't 
care, comparatively speaking, for what Mr. Crick 
might think of him. He was going to care for 
what others might — this at least he seemed rest- 
lessly to apprehend; he was going to care tremen- 
dously, he felt himself make out, for what Ro- 
sanna Gaw might, for what Horton Vint might — 
even, it struck him, for what Davey Bradham 
might. But in presence of Mr. Crick, who in- 
sisted on having no more personal identity than 
the omnibus conductor stopping before you but 
just long enough to bite into a piece of paste- 
board with a pair of small steel jaws, the ques- 
tion of his having a character either to keep or 
to lose declined all relevance — and for the reason 
in especial that whichever way it might turn for 
him would remain perhaps, so to speak, the most 
unexpressed thing that should ever have happened 
in the world. 

242 



 

The effect producible by him on the persons 
just named, and extending possibly to whole 
groups of which these were members, would be 
an effect because somehow expressed and en- 
countered as expression: when had he in all his 
life, for example, so lived in the air of expression 
and so depended on the help of it, as in that so 
thrilling night-hour just spent with the mystify- 
ing and apparently mystified, yet also apparently 
attached and, with whatever else, attaching, 
Vinty ? It wasn't that Mr. Crick, whose analogue 
he had met on every occasion of his paying his 
fare in the public conveyances — where the per- 
sons to whom he paid it, without perhaps in their 
particulars resembling each other, all managed 
nevertheless to be felt as gathered into this ref- 
erence — wasn't in a high degree conversible; it 
was that the more he conversed the less Gray 
found out what he thought not only of Mr. Bet- 
terman's heir but of any other subject on which 
they touched. The gentleman who would, by 
Gray's imagination, have been acting for the 
executors of his uncle's will had not that precious 
document appeared to dispense with every super- 
fluity, could state a fact, under any rash invita- 
tion, and endow it, as a fact, with the greatest 
conceivable amplitude — this too moreover not 
because he was garrulous or gossiping, but be- 
cause those facts with which he was acquainted, 
the only ones on which you would have dreamed 

243 



 

of appealing to him, seemed all perfect nests or 
bags of other facts, bristling or bulging thus with 
every intensity of the positive and leaving no 
room in their interstices for mere appreciation to 
so much as turn round. They were themselves 
appreciation — they became so by the simple 
force of their existing for Mr. Crick's arid men- 
tion, and they so covered the ground of his con- 
sciousness to the remotest edge that no breath 
of the air either of his own mind or of anyone's 
else could have pretended to circulate about them. 
Gray made the reflection — tending as he now felt 
himself to waste rather more than less time in 
this idle trick — that the different matters of con- 
tent in some misunderstandings have so glued 
themselves together that separation has quite 
broken down and one continuous block, sugges- 
tive of dimensional squareness, with mechanical 
perforations and other aids to use subsequently 
introduced, comes to represent the whole life of 
the subject. What it amounted to, he might 
have gathered, was that Mr. Crick was of such a 
common commonness as he had never up to now 
seen so efficiently embodied, so completely or- 
ganised, so securely and protectedly active, in 
a word — not to say so garnished and adorned 
with strange refinements of its own: he had 
somehow been used to thinking of the extreme 
of that quality as a note of defeated application, 
just as the extreme of rarity would have to be. 

244 



 

His domestic companion of these days again and 
again struck him as most touching the point at 
issue, and that point alone, when most proclaim- 
ing at every pore that there wasn't a difference, 
in all the world, between one thing and another. 
The refusal of his whole person to figure as a 
fact invidiously distinguishable, that of his aspect 
to have an identity, of his eyes to have a con- 
sciousness, of his hair to have a colour, of his 
nose to have a form, of his mouth to have a mo- 
tion, of his voice to consent to any separation of 
sounds, made intercourse with him at once ex- 
tremely easy and extraordinarily empty; it was 
deprived of the flicker of anything by the way 
and resembled the act of moving forward in a 
perfectly-rolling carriage with the blind of each 
window neatly drawn down. 

Gray sometimes advanced to the edge of trying 
him, so to call it, as to the impression made on 
him by lack of recognitions assuredly without 
precedent in any experience, any, least of all, of 
the ways of beneficiaries; but under the necessity 
on each occasion of our young man's falling back 
from the vanity of supposing himself really pre- 
sentable or apprehensible. For a grasp of him 
on such ground to take place he should have had 
first to show himself and to catch his image some- 
how reflected; simply walking up and down and 
shedding bland gratitude didn't convey or ex- 
hibit or express him in this case, as he was sure 

2 45 



 

these things had on the other hand truly done 
where everyone else, where his uncle and Ro- 
sanna, where Mr. Gaw and even Miss Mumby, 
where splendid Vinty, whom he so looked to, 
and awfully nice Davey Bradham, whom he so 
took to, were concerned. It all came back to 
the question of terms and to the perception, in 
varying degrees, on the part of these persons, of 
his own; for there were somehow none by which 
Mr. Crick was penetrable that would really tell 
anything about him, and he could wonder in free- 
dom if he wasn't then to know too that last im- 
munity from any tax on his fortune which would 
consist in his having never to wince. Against 
wincing in other relations than this one he was 
prepared, he only desired, to take his precautions 
— visionary precautions in those connections truly 
swarming upon him; but apparently he was 
during these first days of the mere grossness of 
his reality to learn something of the clear state 
of seeing every fond sacrifice to superstition that 
he could think of thrust back at him. If he could 
but have brought his visitor to say after twenty- 
four hours of him "Well, you're the damnedest 
little idiot I've ever had to pretend to hold com- 
merce with !" that would on the spot have pressed 
the spring of his rich sacrificial "Oh I must be, 
I must be! — how can I not abjectly and grate- 
fully be?" Something at least would so have 
been done to placate the jealous gods. But in- 

246 



 

stead of that the grossness of his reality just 
flatly included this supremely useful friend's per- 
haps supposing him a vulgar voluptuary, or at 
least a mere gaping maw, cynically, which 
amounted to say frivolously, indifferent to every- 
thing but the general fact of his windfall. Strange 
that it should be impossible in any particular 
whatever to inform or to correct Mr. Crick, who 
sat unapproachable in the midst of the only 
knowledge that concerned him. 

He couldn't help feeling it conveyed in the 
very breath of the summer airs that played about 
him, to his fancy, in a spirit of frolic still lighter 
and quicker than they had breathed in other 
climes, he couldn't help almost seeing it as the 
spray of sea-nymphs, or hearing it as the sounded 
horn of tritons, emerging, to cast their spell, 
from the foam-flecked tides around, that he was 
regarded as a creature rather unnaturally "quiet" 
there on his averted verandahs and in his darkened 
halls, even at moments when quite immense 
things, by his own measure, were happening to 
him. Everything, simply, seemed to be happen- 
ing, and happening all at once — as he could say 
to himself, for instance, by the fact of such a 
mere matter as his pulling up at some turn of his 
now renewedly ceaseless pacing to take in he 
could scarce have said what huge though soft 
collective rumble, what thick though dispersed 
exhalation, of the equipped and appointed life, 

247 



 

the life that phrased itself with sufficient as- 
surance as the multitudinous throb of Newport, 
borne toward him from vague regions, from be- 
hind and beyond his temporary blest barriers, 
and representing for the first time in his experience 
an appeal directed at him from a source not some- 
what shabbily single. An impression like that 
was in itself an event — so repeatedly in his other 
existence (it was already his quite unconnectedly 
other) had the rumour of the world, the voice of 
society, the harmonies of possession, been charged, 
for his sensibility, with reminders which, so far 
from suggesting association, positively waved 
him off from it. Mr. Betterman's funeral, for 
all the rigour of simplicity imposed on it by his 
preliminary care, had enacted itself in a pon- 
derous, numerous, in fact altogether swarming 
and resounding way; the old local cemetery on 
the seaward-looking hillside, as Gray seemed to 
identify it, had served for the final scene, and 
our young man's sense of the whole thing reached 
its finest point in an unanswered question as to 
whether the New York business world or the New 
York newspaper interest were the more copiously 
present. The business world broke upon him 
during the recent rites in large smooth tepid 
waves — he was conscious of a kind of generalised 
or, as they seemed to be calling it, standardised 
face, as of sharpness without edge, save when 
edge was unexpectedly improvised, bent upon 

248 



 

him for a hint of what might have been better 
expressed could it but have been expressed hu- 
morously; while the newspaper interest only fed 
the more full, he felt even at the time, from the 
perfectly bare plate offered its flocking young 
emissaries by the most recognising eye at once 
and the most deprecating dumbness that he 
could command. 

He had asked Vinty, on the morrow of Vinty's 
evening visit, to "act" for him in so far as this 
might be; upon which Vinty had said gaily — he 
was unexceptionally gay now — "Do you mean 
as your best man at your marriage to the bride 
who is so little like St. Francis's ? much as you 
yourself strike me, you know, as resembling the 
man of Assisi." Vinty, at his great present ease, 
. constantly put things in such wonderful ways; 
which were nothing, however, to the way he 
mostly did them during the days he was able 
to spare before going off again to other calls, 
other performances in other places, braver and 
breezier places on the bolder northern coast, it 
mostly seemed: his allusions to which excited 
absolutely the more curious interest in his friend, 
by an odd law, in proportion as he sketched them, 
under pressure, as probably altogether alien to 
the friend's sympathies. That was to be for the 
time, by every indication, his amusing "line" — 
his taking so confident and insistent a view of 
what it must be in Gray's nature and tradition 

249 



 

to like or not to like that, as our young man for 
that matter himself assured him, he couldn't 
have invented a more successfully insidious way 
of creating an appetite than by passing under a 
fellow's nose every sort of whiff of the indigestible. 
One thing at least was clear, namely: that, let 
his presumption of a comrade's susceptibilities, 
his possible reactions, under general or particular 
exposure, approve itself or not, the extent to 
which this free interpreter was going personally 
to signify for the savour of the whole stretched 
there as a bright assurance. Thus he was all the 
while acting indeed — acting so that fond formula- 
tions of it could only become in the promptest 
way mere redundancies of reference; he acted 
because his approach, his look, his touch made 
somehow, by their simply projecting themselves, 
a definite difference for any question, great or 
small, in the least subject to them; and this, 
after the most extraordinary fashion, not in the 
least through his pressing or interfering or even 
so much as intending, but just as a consequence 
of his having a sense and an intelligence of the 
given affair, such as it might be, to which, once 
he" was present at it, he was truly ashamed not 
to conform. That concentrated passage between 
the two men while the author of their situation 
was still unburied would of course always hover 
to memory's eye like a votive object in the rich 
gloom of a chapel; but it was now disconnected, 

250 



 

attached to its hook once for all, its whole mean- 
ing converted with such small delay into work- 
ing, playing force and multiplied tasteable fruit. 
Quiet as he passed for keeping himself, by the 
impression I have noted, how could Gray have 
felt more plunged in history, how could he by his 
own sense more have waked up to it each morn- 
ing and gone to bed with it each night, sat down 
to it whenever he did sit down, which was never 
for long, whether at a meal, at a book, at a letter, 
or at the wasted endeavour to become, by way of 
a change, really aware of his consciousness, than 
through positively missing as he did the hint of 
anything in particular to do ? — missing and miss- 
ing it all the while and yet at no hour paying the 
least of the penalties that are supposed to attend 
the drop of responsibility and the substituted 
rule of fatuity. How couldn't it be agitation of 
a really sublime order to have it come over one 
that the personage in the world one must most 
resemble at such a pitch would be simply, at 
one's choice, the Kaiser or the Czar, potentates 
who only know their situation is carried on by 
attestation of the fact that push it wherever they 
will they never find it isn't ? Thus they are re- 
ferred to the existence of machinery, the working 
of which machinery is answered for, they may 
feel, whenever their eyes rest on one of those 
figures, ministerial or ceremonial, who may be, 
as it is called, in waiting. Mr. Crick was in wait- 

2SI 



 

ing, Horton Vint was in waiting, Rosanna Gaw 
even, at this moment a hundred miles away, was 
in waiting, and so was Davey Bradham, though 
with but a single appearance at the palace as yet 
to his credit. Neither Horton nor Mr. Crick, it 
was true, were more materially, more recurrently 
present than a fellow's nerves, for the wonder of 
it all, could bear; but what was it but just being 
Czar or Kaiser to keep thrilling on one's own 
side before the fact that this made no difference ? 
■Vulgar reassurance was the greatest of vulgari- 
ties; monarchs could still be irresponsible, thanks 
to their ministers' not being, and Gray repeatedly 
asked himself how he should ever have felt as 
he generally did if it hadn't been so absolutely 
exciting that while the scattered moments of 
Horton's presence and the fitful snatches of tele- 
phonic talk with him lasted the gage of protec- 
tion, perfectly certain patronising protection, 
added a still pleasanter light to his eye and ring 
to his voice, casual and trivial as he clearly might 
have liked to keep these things. Great mon- 
archies might be "run," but great monarchs 
weren't — unless of course often by the favourite 
or the mistress; and one hadn't a mistress yet, 
goodness knew, and if one was threatened with a 
favourite it would be but with a favourite of the 
people too. 

History and the great life surged in upon our 
hero through such images as these at their fullest 

252 



 

tide, finding him out however he might have 
tried to hide from them, and shaking him perhaps 
even with no livelier question than when it oc- 
curred to him for the first time within the week, 
oddly enough, that the guest of the Bradhams 
never happened, while his own momentary guest, 
to meet Mr. Crick, in his counsels, by so much 
as an instant's overlapping, any more than it 
would chance on a single occasion that he should 
name his friend to that gentleman or otherwise 
hint at his existence, still less his importance. 
Was it just that the king was usually shy of men- 
tioning the favourite to the head of the treasury 
and that various decencies attached, by tradi- 
tion, to keeping public and private advisers 
separate? "Oh I absolutely decline to come in, 
at any point whatever, between you and him; 
as if there were any sort of help I can give you 
that he won't ever so much better!" — those 
words had embodied, on the morrow, Vinty's 
sole allusion to the main sense of their first talk, 
which he had gone on with in no direct fashion. 
He had thrown a ludicrous light on his committing 
himself to any such atrocity of taste while the 
empowered person and quite ideally right man 
was about; but points would come up more and 
more, did come up, in fact already had, that they 
doubtless might work out together happily enough; 
and it took Horton in fine the very fewest hours 
to give example after example of his familiar and 

253 



 

immediate wit. Nothing could have better il- 
lustrated this than the interest thrown by him 
for Gray over a couple of subjects that, with 
many others indeed, beguiled three or four rides 
taken by the friends along the indented shores 
and other seaside stretches and reaches of their 
low-lying promontory in the freshness of the 
early morning and when the scene might figure 
for themselves alone. Gray, clinging as yet to 
his own premises very much even as a stripped 
swimmer might loiter to enjoy an air-bath be- 
fore his dive, had yet mentioned that he missed 
exercise and had at once found Vinty full of re- 
source for his taking it in that pleasantest way. 
Everything, by his assurance, was going to be 
delightful but the generality of the people; thus, 
accordingly, was the generality of the people not 
yet in evidence, thus at the sweet hour following 
the cool dawn could the world he had become 
possessed of spread about him unspoiled. 

It was perhaps in Gray to wonder a little in 
these conditions what was then in evidence, with 
decks so invidiously cleared; this being, however, 
a remark he forbore to make, mystified as he 
had several times been, and somehow didn't like 
too much being, by having had to note that to 
differ at all from Vinty on occasions apparently 
offered was to provoke in him at once a positive 
excess of agreement. He always went further, 
as it were, and Gray himself, as he might say, 

254 



 

didn't want to go those lengths, which were out 
of the range of practical politics altogether. Hor- 
ton's habit, as it seemed to show itself, was to 
make out of saving sociability or wanton in- 
genuity or whatever, a distinction for which a 
companion might care, but for which he himself 
didn't with any sincerity, and then to give his 
own side of it away, from the moment doubt 
had been determined, with an almost desolating 
sweep of surrender. His own side of it was by 
that logic no better a side, in a beastly vulgar 
world, than any other, and if anyone wanted to 
mean that such a mundane basis was deficient 
why he himself had but meant it from the first 
and pretended something else only not to be too 
shocking. He was ready to mean the worst — 
was ready for anything, that is, in the interest 
of ceasing from humbug. And if Gray was pre- 
pared for that then il ne s'agissait que de s'enten- 
dre. What Gray was prepared for would really 
take, this young man frankly opined, some thresh- 
ing out; but it wasn't at all in readiness for the 
worst that he had come to America — he had 
come on the contrary to indulge, by God's help, 
in appreciations, comparisons, observations, re- 
flections and other luxuries, that were to minister, 
fond old prejudice aiding, to life at the high pitch, 
the pitch, as who should say, of immortality. 
If on occasion, under the dazzle of Horton's 
facility, he might ask himself how he tracked 

255 



 

through it the silver thread of sincerity — con- 
sistency" wasn't pretended to — something at once 
supervened that was better than any answer, 
some benefit of information that the circumstance 
required, of judgment that assisted or supported 
or even amused, by felicity of contradiction^ and 
that above all pushed the question so much further, 
multiplying its relations and so giving it air and 
colour and the slap of the brush, that it straight- 
way became a picture and, for the kind of atten- 
tion Gray could best render, a conclusive settled 
matter. He hated somehow to detract from his 
friend, wanting so much more to keep adding to 
him; but it was after a little as if he had felt 
that his loyalty, or whatever he might call it, 
could yet not be mean in deciding that Horton's 
generalisations, his opinions as distinguished from 
his perceptions and direct energies and images, 
signified little enough: if he would only go on 
bristling as he promised with instances and items, 
would only consent to consist at the same rate 
and in his very self of material for history, one 
might propose to gather from it all at one's own 
hours and without troubling him the occasional 
big inference. 

How good he could be on the particular case 
appeared for example after Gray had expressed 
to him, just subsequently to their first encounter, 
a certain light ' and measured wonderment at 
Rosanna Gaw's appearing not to intend to ab- 

256 



 

sent herself long enough from her cares in the 
other State, immense though these conceivably 
were, to do what the rest of them were doing 
roundabout Mr. Betterman's grave. Our young 
man had half taken for granted that she would 
have liked, expressing it simply, to assist with 
him at the last attentions to a memory that had 
meant, in the current phrase, so much for them 
both — though of course he withal quite remem- 
bered that her interest in it had but rested on 
his own and that since his own, as promoted by 
her, had now taken such effect there was gross- 
ness perhaps in looking to her for further demon- 
strations: this at least in view of her being un- 
der her filial stress not unimaginably sated with 
ritual. He had caught himself at any rate in 
the act of dreaming that Rosanna's return for 
the funeral would be one of the inevitabilities of 
her sympathy with his fortune — every element 
of which (that was overwhelmingly certain) he 
owed to her; and even the due sense that, put 
her jubilation or whatever at its highest, it could 
scarce be expected to dance the same jig as his, 
didn't prevent his remarking to his friend that 
clearly Miss Gaw would come, since he himself 
was still in the stage of supposing that when you 
had the consciousness of a lot of money you sort 
of did violent things. He played with the idea 
that her arrival for the interment would partake 
of this element, proceeding as it might from the 

257 



 

exhilaration of her monstrous advantages, her 
now assured state. "Look at the violent things 
I'm doing," he seemed to observe with this, "and 
see how natural I must feel it that any violence 
should meet me. Yours, for example" — Gray 
really went so far — "recognises how I want, or 
at least how I enjoy, a harmony; though at the 
same time, I assure you, I'm already prepared 
for any disgusted snub to the attitude of unlimited 
concern about me, gracious goodness, that I may 
seem to go about taking for granted." Unlimited 
concern about him on the part of the people who 
weren't up at the cool of dawn save in so far as 
they here and there hadn't yet gone to bed — 
this, in combination with something like it on 
the part of numberless others too, had indeed 
to be faced as the inveterate essence of Vinty's 
forecast, and formed perhaps the hardest nut 
handed to Gray's vice of cogitation to crack; it 
was the thing that he just now most found him- 
self, as they said, up against — involving as it 
did some conception of reasons other than ugly 
for so much patience with the boring side of him. 
An interest founded on the mere beastly fact 
of his pecuniary luck, what was that but an ugly 
thing to see, from the moment his circle, since a 
circle he was apparently to have, shouldn't soon 
be moved to some decent reaction from it ? How 
was he going himself to like breathing an air in 
which the reaction didn't break out, how was he 

258 



 

going not to get sick of finding so large a part 
played, over the place, by the mere constatation, 
in a single voice, a huge monotone restlessly and 
untiringly directed, but otherwise without appli- 
cation, of the state of being worth dollars to in- 
ordinate amounts ? Was he really going to want 
to live with many specimens of the sort of person 
who wouldn't presently rather loathe him than 
know him blindedly on such terms ? would it 
be possible, for that matter, that he should feel 
people unashamed of not providing for their at- 
tention to him any better account of it than his 
uncle's form of it had happened to supply, with- 
out his by that token coming to regard them either 
as very "interested," according to the good old 
word, or as themselves much too foredoomed 
bores to merit tolerance ? When it reached the 
pitch of his asking himself whether it could be 
possible Vinty wouldn't at once see what he 
meant by that reservation, he patched the ques- 
tion up but a bit provisionally perhaps by falling 
back on a remark about this confidant that was 
almost always equally in order. They weren't 
on the basis yet of any treatable reality, any that 
could be directly handled and measured, other 
than such as were, so to speak, the very children 
of accident, those the old man's still unexplained 
whim had with its own special shade of grimness 
let him in for. Naturally must it come to pass 
with time that the better of the set among whom 

259 



 

this easy genius was the best would stop thinking 
money about him to the point that prevented 
their thinking anything else — so that he should 
only break off and not go in further after giving 
them a chance to show in a less flurried way to 
what their range of imagination might reach in- 
vited and encouraged. Should they markedly 
fail to take that chance it would be all up with 
them so far as any entertainment that he should 
care to offer them was concerned. How could 
it stick out more disconcertingly — so his appeal 
might have run — that a fuss about him was as 
yet absolutely a fuss on a vulgar basis ? having 
begun, by what he gathered, quite before the 
growth even of such independent rumours as 
Horton's testimony, once he was on the spot, 
or as Mr. Bradham's range of anecdote, conse- 
quent on Mr. Bradham's call, might give warrant 
for: it couldn't have behind it, he felt sure, so 
much as a word of Rosanna's, of the heralding 
or promising sort — he would so have staked his 
right hand on the last impossibility of the least 
rash overflow on that young woman's part. 

There was this other young woman,' of course, 
whom he heard of at these hours for the first time 
from Haughty and whom he remembered well 
enough to have heard praise of from his adopted 
father, three or four years previous, on his re- 
joining the dear man after a summer's separa- 
tion. She would be, "Gussy's" charming friend, 

260 



 

Haughty's charming friend, no end of other 
people's charming friend, as appeared, the hero- 
ine of the charming friendship his own admirable 
friend had formed, in a characteristically head- 
long manner (some exceptional cluster of graces, 
in her case, clearly much aiding) with a young 
American girl, the very nicest anyone had ever 
seen, met at the waters of Ragatz during one of 
several seasons there and afterwards described 
in such extravagant terms as were to make her 
remain, between himself and his elder, a subject 
of humorous reference and retort. It had had to 
do with Gray's liking his companion of those 
years always better and better that persons in- 
trinsically distinguished inveterately took to him 
so naturally — even if the number of the admirers 
rallying was kept down a little by the rarity, of 
course, of intrinsic distinction. It wasn't, either, 
as if this blest associate had been by constitution 
an elderly flirt, or some such sorry type, addicted 
to vain philanderings with young persons he 
might have fathered: he liked young persons, 
small blame to him, but they had never, under 
Gray's observation, made a fool of him, and he 
was only as much of one about the young lady 
in question, Cecilia Foy, yes, of New York, as 
served to keep all later inquiry and pleasantry 
at the proper satiric pitch. She would have been 
a fine little creature, by our friend's beguiled 
conclusion, to have at once so quickened and 

261 



 

so appreciated the accidental relation; for was 
anything truly quite so charming in a clever girl 
as the capacity for admiring disinterestedly a 
brave gentleman even to the point of willingness 
to take every trouble about him ? — when the dis- 
interestedness dwelt, that is, in the very pleasure 
she could seek and find, so much more creditable 
a matter to her than any she could give and be 
complimented for giving, involved as this could 
be with whatever vanity, vulgarity or other per- 
sonal pretence. 

Gray remembered even his not having missed 
by any measure of his own need or play of his 
own curiosity the gain of Miss Foy's acquaintance 
— so might the felicity of the quaint affair, given 
the actual parties, have been too sacred to be 
breathed on; he in fact recalled, and could still 
recall, every aspect of their so excellent time 
together reviving now in a thick rich light, how 
he had inwardly closed down the cover on his 
stepfather's accession of fortune — which the pretty 
episode really seemed to amount to; extracting 
from it himself a particular relief of conscience. 
He could let him alone, by this showing, without 
black cruelty — so little had the day come for his 
ceasing to attract admirers, as they said, at pub- 
lic places or being handed over to the sense of 
desertion. That left Gray as little as possible 
haunted with the young Cecilia's image, so com- 
pletely was his interest in her, in her photograph 

262 



 

and in her letters, one of the incidents of his vir- 
tually filial solicitude; all the less in fact no 
doubt that she had written during the aftermonths 
frequently and very advertisedly, though perhaps, 
in spite of Mr. Northover's gay exhibition of it, 
not so very remarkably. She was apparently one 
of the bright persons who are not at their bright- 
est with the pen — which question indeed would 
perhaps come to the proof for him, thanks to his 
having it ever so vividly, not to say derisively, 
from Horton that this observer didn't really know 
what had stayed her hand, for the past week, 
from an outpouring to the one person within her 
reach who would constitute a link with the de- 
lightful old hero of her European adventure. That 
so close a representative of the party to her ro- 
mance was there in the flesh and but a mile or 
two off, was a fact so extraordinary as to have 
waked up the romance again in her and produced 
a state of fancy from which she couldn't rest — 
for some shred of the story that might be still 
afloat. Gray therefore needn't be surprised to 
receive some sign of this commotion, and that 
he hadn't yet done so was to be explained, Haughty 
guessed, by the very intensity of the passions 
involved. 

One of them, it thus appeared, burnt also in 
Gussy's breast; devoted as she was to Cissy, she 
had taken the fond anecdote that so occupied 
them as much under her protection as she had 

263 



 

from far back taken the girl's every other in- 
terest, and what for the hour paralysed their 
action, that of the excited pair, must simply 
have been that Mrs. Bradham couldn't on the 
one hand listen to anything so horrid as that 
her young friend should make an advance un- 
prepared and unaccompanied, and that the ar- 
dent girl, on the other, had for the occasion, as 
for all occasions, her ideal of independence. Gray 
was not himself impatient — he felt no jump in 
him at the chance to discuss so dear a memory 
in an air still incongruous; it depended on who 
might propose to him the delicate business, let 
alone its not making for a view of the great Gussy's 
fine tact that she should even possibly put herself 
forward as a proposer. However, he didn't mind 
thinking that if Cissy should prove all that was 
likely enough their having a subject in common 
couldn't but practically conduce; though the 
moral of it all amounted rather to a portent, the 
one that Haughty, by the same token, had done 
least to reassure him against, of the extent to 
which the native jungle harboured the female 
specimen and to which its ostensible cover, the 
vast level of mixed growths stirred wavingly in 
whatever breeze, was apt to be identifiable but 
as an agitation of the latest redundant thing in 
ladies' hats. It was true that when Rosanna had 
perfectly failed to rally, merely writing a kind 
short note to the effect that she should have to 

264 



 

give herself wholly, for she didn't know how 
long, to the huge assault of her own questions, 
that might have seemed to him to make such a 
clearance as would count against any number 
of positively hovering shades. Horton had an- 
swered for her not turning up, and nothing per- 
haps had made him feel so right as this did for 
a faith in those general undertakings of assurance; 
only, when at the end of some days he saw that 
vessel of light obscured by its swing back to New 
York and other ranges of action, the sense of ex- 
posure — even as exposure to nothing worse than 
the lurking or pouncing ladies — became sharper 
through contrast with the late guarded interval; 
this to the extent positively of a particular hour 
at which it seemed to him he had better turn 
tail and simply flee, stepping from under the too 
vast orb of his fate. 

He was alone with that quantity on the Sep- 
tember morning after breakfast as he had not 
felt himself up to now; he had taken to pacing 
the great verandah that had become his own as 
he had paced it when it was still his uncle's, and 
it might truly have been a rush of nervous appre- 
hension, a sudden determination of terror, that 
quickened and yet somehow refused to direct his 
steps. He had turned out there for the company 
of sea and sky and garden, less conscious than 
within doors, for some reason, that Horton was 
a lost luxury; but that impression was presently 

265 , 



 

to pass with a return of a queer force in his view 
of Rosanna as above all somehow wanting, off 
and withdrawn verily to the pitch of her having 
played him some trick, merely let him in where 
she was to have seen him through, failed in fine 
of a sociability implied in all her preliminaries. 
He found his attention caught, in one of his revo- 
lutions, by the chair in which Abel Gaw had sat 
that first afternoon, pulling him up for their so 
unexpectedly intense mutual scrutiny, and when 
he turned away a moment after, quitting the 
spot almost as if the strange little man's death 
that very night had already made him appari- 
tional, which was unpleasant, it was to drop upon 
the lawn and renew his motion there. He circled 
round the house altogether at last, looking at it 
more critically than had hitherto seemed relevant, 
taking the measure, disconcertedly, of its un- 
abashed ugliness, and at the end coming to regard 
it very much as he might have eyed some mon- 
strous modern machine, one of those his generation 
was going to be expected to master, to fly in, to 
fight in, to take the terrible women of the future 
out for airings in, and that mocked at his incom- 
petence in such matters while he walked round 
and round it and gave it, as for dread of what it 
might do to him, the widest berth his enclosure 
allowed. In the midst of all of whujh, quite won- 
derfully, everything changed; he wasn't alone 
with his monster, he was inj by this reminder, 

266 



 

for connections, nervous ass as he had just missed 
writing himself, and connections fairly glittered, 
swarming out at him, in the person of Mr. Brad- 
ham, who stood at the top of a flight of steps from 
the gallery, which he had been ushered through 
the house to reach, and there at once, by some 
odd felicity of friendliness, some pertinence of 
presence, of promise, appeared to make up for 
whatever was wrong and supply whatever was 
absent. It came over him with extraordinary 
quickness that the way not to fear the massed 
ambiguity was to trust it, and this florid, solid, 
smiling person, who waved a prodigious gold- 
coloured straw hat as if in sign of ancient amity, 
had come exactly at that moment to show him 
how. 1 

1 This ends the first chapter of Book IV. The MS. breaks off with 
an unfinished sentence opening the next chapter: "Not the least 
pointed of the reflections Gray was to indulge in a fortnight later 
and as by a result of Davey Bradham's intervention in the very 
nick was that if he had turned tail that afternoon, at the very oddest 
of all his hours, if he had prematurely taken to his heels and missed 
the emissary from the wonderful place of his fresh domestication, 
the article on which he would most irretrievably have dished him- 
self . . ." 



267 



NOTES FOR 
 



NOTES FOR  

Augusta Bradham, "Gussie" Bradham, for the 
big social woman. Basil Hunn I think on the 
whole for Hero. Graham Rising, which becomes 
familiarly Gray Rising, I have considered but 
incline to keep for another occasion. 

Horton Crimper, among his friends Haughty 
Crimper, seems to me right and best, on the 
whole, for my second young man. I don't want 
for him a surname intrinsically pleasing; and 
this seems to me of about the good nuance. My 
Third Man hereby becomes, I seem to see, Davey 
Bradham; on which, I think, for the purpose and 
association, I can't improve. 

My Girl, in the relinquished thing, was Cissy 
Foy; and this was all right for the figure there 
intended, but the girl here is a very different 
one, and everything is altered. I want her name 
moreover, her Christian one, to be Moyra, and 
must have some bright combination with that; 
the essence of which is a surname of two syllables 
and ending in a consonant — also beginning with 
one. I am thinking of Moyra Grabham, the 
latter excellent thing was in the Times of two or 
three days ago; its only fault is a little too much 
meaning, but the sense here wouldn't be thrown 

271 



 

into undue relief, and I don't want anything 
pretty or conventionally "pleasing." Everything 
of the shade of the real. Remain thus important 
the big, the heavy Daughter of the billionaire, 
with her father; in connection with whom I 
think I give up Betterman. That must stand 
over, and I want, above all, a single syllable. 
All the other names have two or three; and this 
makes an objection to the Shimple, which I orig- 
inally thought of as about odd and ugly enough 
without being more so than I want it. But that 
also will keep, while I see that I have the mono- 
syllable Hench put down; only put down for 
another connection. I see I thought of "Wenty " 
Hench, short for Wentworth, as originally good 
for Second Young Man. If I balance that against 
Haughty Crimper, I incline still to the latter, 
for the small amusement of the Haughty. On 
the other hand I am not content with Hench, 
though a monosyllable, for the dear Billionaire 
girl, in the light of whom it is alone important 
to consider the question, her Father so little 
mattering after she becomes by his death the 
great Heiress of the time. And I kind of want 
to make her Moyra; with which I just spy in 
the Times a wonderful and admirable "Chown"; 
which makes me think that Moyra Chown may 
do. Besides which if I- keep Grabham for my 
"heroine" I feel the Christian name should there 
be of one syllable. All my others are of two; 

272 



 

and I shall presently make the case right for this, 
finding the good thing. The above provides for 
the time for the essential. Yet suddenly I am 
pulled up — Grabham, after all, won't at all do 
if I keep Bradham for the other connection; 
which I distinctly prefer: I want nothing with 
any shade of a special sense there. Accordingly, 
I don't know but what I may go in for a different 
note altogether and lavish on her the fine Can- 
tupher; which I don't want however really to 
waste. When Cantupher is used there ought to 
be several of it, and above all men : no, I see it 
won't do, and besides I don't want anything 
positively fine. I like Wither, and I like Augurer, 
and I like, in another note, Damper, and I even 
see a little Bessie as a combination with it, though 
I don't on the whole want a Bessie. At any rate 
I now get on. 

1 What I want the first Book to do is to present 
the Gaws, the Bradhams and Cissy Foy, in Three 
Chapters or Scenes, call them Scenes of the Acts, 
in such a way that I thus present with them the 
first immediate facts involved; or in other words 
present the first essence of the Situation. What 
I see is, as I further reflect, that it is better to 
get Graham Fielder there within the Act, to have 
him on the premises already, and learnt so to be, 

1 From this point the names of the characters, most of which were 
still uncertain, are given in accordance with Henry James' final 
choice; though it may be noted that he was to the end dissatisfied 
with the name of Cissy Foy and meant to choose another. 

273 



 

before it has progressed beyond the first Scene^ 
though he be not seen' till the Second Book. 
When Rosanna goes over to her Father it befals 
before she has had more than twenty words with 
him that one of the Nurses who is most sympa- 
thetic to her appears in the long window that 
opens from the house on to the verandah, and it 
is thus at once disclosed that he has come. Ro- 
sanna has taken for granted from the quiet air 
of the place that this event hasn't yet occurred; 
but Gray has in fact arrived with the early morn- 
ing, has come on the boat from New York, the 
night one, and is there above with, or ready to 
be with, the dying man. Perfectly natural and 
plausible I make it that he doesn't begin at once 
to pervade the place; delicacy, discretion, anxiety 
naturally operating with him; so that we know 
only he is there, and that matters are more or less 
taking place above, during the rest of the Book. 
But the fact in question immediately determines, 
for proprieties' and discretions' sake, the with- 
drawal of Rosanna and her Father; they return 
to their own abode; and I see the rest of the busi- 
ness of the act as taking place partly there and 
partly, by what I make but, on the Bradhams' 
own premises, the field of the Third Scene. Here 
is the passage between the two young women 
that I require, and my Heroine, I think, must be 
on a visit of a number of days to Gussie. I want 
Davey first with Rosanna, and think I get some- 

274 



 

thing like his having walked over, along the cliff, 
to their house, to bring her, at his wife's request, 
over to tea. Yes, I have Davey's walk back 
with Rosanna, and her Father's declining to come, 
or saying that he will follow afterward; his real 
design being to sneak over again, as I may call 
it, to the other house, in the exercise of his in- 
tense curiosity. That special founded and mo- 
tived condition is what we sufficiently know him 
by and what he is for the time (which is all the 
time we have of him) identified by. I get thus 
for Book 2 that Gray, latish in the afternoon, 
coming down from his uncle's quarter, finds him, 
has a passage or scene with him, above all an im- 
pression of him; and this before he has had any 
other: we learn that he hasn't seen his uncle yet; 
the judgment of the doctors about this being 
operative and they wishing a further wait. I 
want Rosanna's Father for his first very sharp 
impression; this really making, I think, Scene 
First of Book 2. It gives me Scene 2 for what 
I shall then want without further delay of his 
first introduction to his Uncle's room and his 
half hour, or whatever, there; with the fact de- 
termined of the non-collapse of the latter, his 
good effect from the meeting quite rather, and 
the duration of him determined to end of Book 2. 
After Book 2 he is no more. Scene 3 of Book 2 
then can only be, for Gray, with Rosanna; that 
scene having functions to be exercised with no 

275 



 

more delay at all, by what I make out, and being 
put in, straight, then and there, that we may 
have the support of it. I by the same token see 
Book 3 now as functional entirely for the en- 
counter of Gray with the two other women and, 
for the first time, with Davey; and also as pre- 
paring the appearance of Horton Vint, though not 
producing it. I see him, in fact, I think, as intro- 
duced independently of his first appearance to 
Gray, see it as a matter of his relation with Cissy, 
and as lighting up what I immediately want of 
their situation. In fact don't I see this as Hor- 
ton's "Act" altogether, as I shall have seen and 
treated Book i as Rosanna's, and Book 2 as 
Gray's. By the blest operation this time of my 
Dramatic principle, my law of successive Aspects, 
each treated from its own centre, as, though with 
qualifications, The Awkward Age, I have the 
great help of flexibility and variety; my persons 
in turn, or at least the three or four foremost, 
having control, as it were, of the Act and Aspect, 
and so making it his or making it hers. This of 
course with the great inevitable and desirable 
preponderance, in the Series, of Gray's particular 
weight. But I seem to make out, to a certainty, 
at least another "Act" for Rosanna and prob- 
ably another for Horton; though perhaps not more 
than one, all to herself, for Cissy. I say at least 
another for Horton on account of my desire to 
give Gray as affecting Horton, only less than I 

276 



 

want to give Horton as affecting Gray. It is true 
that I get Gray as affecting Horton more or less 
in Book 3, but as the situation developes it will 
make new needs, determinations and possibili- 
ties. All this for feeling my way and making 
things come, more and more come. I want an 
Aspect under control of Davey, at all events — 
this I seem pretty definitely to feel; but things 
will only come too much. At all events, to re- 
treat, remount, a little there are my 3 first Books 
sufficiently started without my having as yet 
exactly noted the absolutely fundamental ante- 
cedents. But before I do this, even, I memorise 
that Gray's Scene with Rosanna for 3 of Book 2 
shall be by her coming over to Mr. Betterman's 
house herself that evening, all frankly and di- 
rectly, to see him there; not by his going over to 
her. And I seem to want it evening; the sum- 
mer night outside, with their moving about on 
the Terrace and above the sea etc. Withal, by 
the same token, I want such interesting things 
between them from immediately after the pro- 
mulgation of Mr. Betterman's Will; I want that, 
but of course can easily get it, so far as anything 
is easy, in Book 4, the function of which is to 
present Gray as face to face with the situation 
so created for him. This is obviously, of course, 
one of Gray's Aspects, and the next will desirably 
be, I dare say too; can only be, so far as I can 
now tell, when I consider that the Book being my 

277 



 

Fourth, only Six of the Ten which I most devoutly 
desire to limit the thing to then remain for my 
full evolution on the momentum by that time 
imparted. Certainly, at all events, the Situation 
leaves Newport, to come to life, its full life, in 
New York, where I seem to see it as going on to 
the end, unless I manage to treat myself to some 
happy and helpful mise-en-scene or exploitation 
of my memory of (say) California. The action 
entirely of American localisation, as goes without 
saying, yet making me thus kind of hanker, for 
dear "amusement's" sake, to decorate the thing 
with a bit of a picture of some American Some- 
where that is not either Newport or N.Y. I even 
ask myself whether Boston wouldn't serve for 
this garniture, serve with a narrower economy 
than "dragging in" California. I kind of want 
to drag in Boston a little, feeling it as naturally 
and thriftily workable. But these are details 
which will only too much come; and I seem to 
see already how my action, however tightly 
packed down, will strain my Ten Books, most 
blessedly, to cracking. That is exactly what I 
want, the tight packing and the beautifully audi- 
ble cracking; the most magnificent masterly little 
vivid economy, with a beauty of its own equal 
to the beauty of the donnee itself, that ever was. 
However, what the devil are, exactly, the little 
fundamentals in the past ? Fix them, focus them 
hard; they need only be perfectly conceivable, 

278 



 

but they must be of the most lucid sharpness. I 
want to have it that for Gray, and essentially for 
Rosanna, it's a renewal of an early, almost, or 
even quite positively, childish beginning; and for 
Gray it's the same with Horton Vint — the im- 
pression of Horton already existing in him, a 
very strong and "dazzled" one, made in the 
quite young time, though in a short compass of 
days, weeks, possibly months, or whatever, and 
having lasted on (always for Gray) after a fashion 
that makes virtually a sort of relation already 
established, small as it ostensibly is. Such his 
relation with Rosanna, such his relation with 

Horton — but for his relation with Cissy ? 

Do I want that to be also a renewal, the residuum 
of an old impression, or a fresh thing altogether ? 
What strikes me prima facie is that it's better to 
have two such pre-established origins for the 
affair than three; the only question is does that 
sort of connection more complicate or more simr 
plify for that with Cissy? It more simplifies if 
I see myself wanting to give, by my plan, the full 
effect of a revolution in her, a revolution marked 
the more by the germ of the relation being thrown 
back, marked the more, that is, in the sense of; 
the shade of perfidy, treachery, the shade of the 
particular element and image that is of the es- 
sence, so far as she is concerned, of my action., 
How this exactly works I must in a moment go 
into — hammer it out clear; but meanwhile there 

279 



 

are these other fundamentals. Gray then is the 
son of his uncle's half-sister, not sister (on the 
whole, I think); whose dissociation from her rich 
brother, before he was anything like so rich, must 
have followed upon her marrying a man with 
whom he, Mr. Betterman, was on some peculiarly 
bad terms resulting from a business difference or 
quarrel of one of those rancorous kinds that such 
lives (as Mr. Betterman's) are plentifully be- 
strewn with. The husband has been his victim, 
and he hasn't hated him, or objected to him for 
a brother-in-law, any the less for that. The 
objected-to brother-in-law has at all events died 
early, and the young wife, with her boy, her scant 
means, her disconnection from any advantage 
to her represented by her half-brother, has be- 
taken herself to Europe; where the rest of that 
history has been enacted. I see the young hus- 
band, Gray's father, himself Graham Fielder the 
elder or whatever, as dying early, but probably 
dying in Europe, through some catastrophe to be 
determined, two or three years after their going 
there. This is better than his dying at home, 
for removal of everything from nearness to Mr. 
Betterman. Betterman has been married and has 
had children, a son and a daughter, this is indis- 
pensable, for diminution of the fact of paucity of 
children; but he has lost successively these be- 
longings — there is nothing over strange in it; the 
death of his son, at 1 6 or 1 8 or thereabouts, hav- 

280 



 

ing occurred a few years, neither too few nor too 
many, before my beginning, and having been the 
sorest fact of his life. Well then, young Mrs. 
Fielder or whoever, becomes thus in Europe an 
early widow, with her little boy, and there, after 
no long time, marries again, marries an alien, a 
European of some nationality to be determined, 
but probably an Englishman; which completes 
the effect of alienation from her brother — easily 
conceivable and representable as "in his way," 
disliking this union; and indeed as having made 
known to her, across the sea, that if she will for- 
bear from it (this when he first hears of it and 
before it has taken place) and will come back to 
America with her boy, he will "forgive" her and 
do for her over there what he can. The great fact 
is that she declines this condition, the giving up 
of her new fiance, and thereby declines an advan- 
tage that may, or might have, become great for 
her boy. Not so great then — Betterman not then 
so rich. But in fine — With which I cry Eureka, 
eureka; I have found what I want for Rosanna's 
connection, though it will have to make Rosanna 
a little older than Gray, 2 or 3 or 3 or 4 years, 
instead of same age. I see Gray's mother at any 
rate, with her small means, in one of the smaller 
foreign cities, Florence or Dresden, probably the 
latter, and also see there Rosanna and her mother, 
this preceding by no long time the latter's death. 
Mrs. Gaw has come abroad with her daughter, 

281 



 

for advantages, in the American way, while the 
husband and father is immersed in business cares 
at home; and when the two couples, mother and 
son, and mother and daughter, meet in a natural 
way, a connection is more or less prepared by the 
fact of Mr. Gaw having had the business associa- 
tion with Mrs. Fielder's half-brother, Mr. Better- 
man, at home, even though the considerably vio- 
lent rupture or split between the two men will 
have already taken place. Mrs. Gaw is a very 
good simple, a bewildered and pathetic rich 
woman, in delicate health, and is sympathetic to 
Gray's mother, on whom she more or less throws 
herself for comfort and support, and Gray and 
Rosanna, Rosanna with a governess and all the 
facilities and accessories natural to wealth, while 
the boy's conditions are much leaner and plainer 
— the two, I say, fraternise and are good friends; 
he figuring to Rosanna (say he is about 13, while 
she is 16) as a tremendously initiated and in- 
formed little polyglot European, knowing France, 
Germany, Italy etc. from the first. It is at this 
juncture that Mrs. Fielder's second marriage has 
come into view, or the question and the appear- 
ance of it; and that, very simultaneously, the 
proposal has come over from her half-brother on 
some rumour of it reaching him. As already 
mentioned, Betterman proposes to her that if she 
will come back to America with her boy, and not 
enter upon the union that threatens, and which 

282 



 

must have particular elements in it of a nature 
to displease and irritate him, he will look after 
them both, educate the boy at home, do some- 
thing substantial for them. Mrs. Fielder takes 
her American friend into her confidence in every 
way, introduces to her the man who desires to 
marry her, whom Rosanna sees and with whom 
the boy himself has made great friends, so that 
the dilemma of the poor lady becomes a great and 
lively interest to them all; the pretendant himself 
forming also a very good relation with the Ameri- 
can mother and daughter, the friends of his friend, 
and putting to Mrs. Gaw very eagerly the possi- 
bility of her throwing her weight into the scale in 
his favour. Her meeting, that is Mrs. Fielder's 
meeting, the proposition from New York involves 
absolutely her breaking off with him; and he is 
very much in love with her, likes the boy, and, 
though he doesn't want to stand in the latter's 
light, has hopes that he won't be quite thrown 
over. The engagement in fact, with the marriage 
near at hand, must be an existing reality. It is 
for Mrs. Fielder something of a dilemma; but she 
is very fond of her honourable suitor, and her in- 
clinations go strongly to sticking to him. She 
takes the boy himself into her confidence, young 
as he is, — perhaps I can afford him a year or two 
more — make him 15, say; in which case Rosanna 
becomes 18, and the subsequent chronology is 
thereby affected. It isn't, I must remember, as 

283 



 

a young man in his very first youth, at all, that I 
want Gray, or see him, with the opening of the 
story at Newport. On the contrary all the pro- 
prieties, elements of interest, convenience etc., 
are promoted by his being not less than 30. I 
don't see why I shouldn't make him 33, with 
Rosanna thus two years older, not three. If he 
is 15 in Dresden and she 17, it will be old enough 
for each, without being too old, I think, for Gray. 
18 years will thus have elapsed from the crisis at 
Florence or wherever to the arrival at Newport. 
I want that time, I think, I can do with it very 
well for what I see of elements operative for him; 
and a period of some length moreover is required 
for bringing the two old men at Newport to a 
proper pitch of antiquity. Mr. Betterman dies 
very much in the fulness of years, and as Rosan- 
na's parent is to pass away soon after Iwant him 
to have come to the end. If Gray is 15, however, 
I mustn't make his mother too mature to inspire 
the devotion of her friend; at the same time that 
there must have been years enough for her to 
have lived awhile with her first husband and lost 
him. Of course this first episode may have been 
very brief — there is nothing to prevent that. If 
she had married at 20 she will then be, say, about 
36 or so at the time of the crisis, and this will be 
quite all right for the question of her second mar- 
riage. Say she lives a considerable number of 
years after this, in great happiness, her marriage 

284 



 

having taken place; I in fact require her to do so, 
for I want Gray to have had reasons fairly strong 
for his not having been back to America in the 
interval. I may put it that he has, even, been 
back for a very short time, on some matter con- 
nected with his mother's interests, or his own, or 
whatever; but I complicate the case thereby and 
have to deal somehow with the question of whether 
or no he has then seen Mr. Betterman. No, I 
don't want him to have been back, and can't do 
with it; keep this simple and workable. All I am 
doing here is just to fix a little his chronology. 
Say he has been intending to go over at about 
25, when his mother's death takes place, about 10 
years after her second marriage. Say then, as is 
very conceivable, that his- stepfather, with whom 
he , has become great friends, then requires and 
appeals to his care and interest in a way that 
keeps him on arid on till the latter's death takes 
place just previous to Mr. Betterman's sending 
for him. This gives me quite sufficiently what I 
want of the previous order of things; but doesn't 
give me yet the fact about Rosanna's connec- 
tion in her young history which I require. I see 
accordingly what has happened in Florence or 
Dresden as something of this kind: that Mrs. 
Fielder, having put it to her boy that he shall 
decide, if he can, about what they shall do, she 
lets Mrs. Gaw, who was at this juncture in con- 
stant intercourse with her, know that she has 

285 



 

done so — Mrs. Gaw and Rosanna being, together, 
exceedingly interested about her, and Rosanna 
extremely interested, in a young dim friendly 
way, about Gray; very much as if he were the 
younger brother she hasn't got, and whom, or 
an older, she would have given anything to have. 
Rosanna hates Mr. Betterman, who has, as she 
understands and believes, in some iniquitous 
business way, wronged or swindled her father; 
and isn't at all for what he has proposed to the 
Fielders. In addition she is infatuated with 
Europe, makes everything of being there, dreams, 
or would dream, of staying on if she could, and 
has already in germ, in her mind, those feelings 
about the dreadful American money-world of 
which she figures as the embodiment or expres- 
sion in the eventual situation. She knows thus 
that 'the boy has had, practically, the decision 
laid upon him, and with the whole case with all 
its elements and possibilities before her she takes 
upon herself to act upon him, influence and de- 
termine him. She wouldn't have him accept 
Mr. Betterman's cruel proposition, as she de- 
clares she sees it, for the world. She proceeds 
with him as she would in fact with a younger 
brother: there is a passage to be alluded to with 
a later actuality, which figures for her in memory 
as her creation of a responsibility; her very con- 
siderably passionate, and thereby meddlesome, in- 
tervention. I see some long beautiful walk or 

286 



 

stroll, some visit to some charming old place or 
things — and Florence is here indicated — during 
which she puts it all to him, and from which he, 
much inspired and affected by her, comes back 
to say to his mother that he doesn't want what is 
offered — at any such price as she will have to 
pay. I see this occasion as really having settled 
it — and Rosanna's having always felt and known 
that it did. She and her mother separate then 
from the others; Mrs. Fielder communicates her 
refusal, sticks to her friend, marries him shortly 
afterwards, and her subsequent years take the 
form I have noted. The American mother and 
daughter go back across the sea; the mother in 
time dies etc. I see also how much better it is 
to have sufficient time for these various deaths 
to happen. But the point is that the sense of 
responsibility, begetting gradually a considerable, 
a deepening force of reflection, and even somewhat 
of remorse, as to all that it has meant, is what 
has taken place for Rosanna in proportion as, 
by the sequence of events and the happening of 
many things, Mr. Betterman has grown into an 
apparently very rich old man with no natural 
heir. His losses, his bereavements, I have al- 
ready alluded to, and a considerable relaxation 
of her original feeling about him in the light of 
more knowledge and of other things that have 
happened. In the light, for instance, of her now 
mature sense of what her father's career has been 

287 



 

and of all that his great ferocious fortune, as she 
believes it to be, represents of rapacity, of finan- 
cial cruelty, of consummate special ability etc. 
She has kept to some extent in touch with Gray, 
so far that is as knowing about his life and gen- 
eral situation are concerned; but the element of 
compunction in her itself, and the sense of what 
she may perhaps have deprived him of in the 
way of a great material advantage, may be very 
well seen, I think, as keeping her shy and back- 
ward in respect to following him up or remaining 
in intercourse. It isn't likely, for the American 
truth of things, that she hasn't been back to Eu- 
rope again, more than once, whether before or 
after her mother's death; but what I can easily 
and even interestingly see is that on whatever 
occasion of being there she has yet not tried to 
meet him again. She knows that neither he nor 
his stepfather are at all well off, she has a good 
many general impressions and has tried to get 
knowledge of them, without directly appealing 
for it to themselves, whenever she can. Thus it 
is, to state things very simply, that, on hearing 
of the stepfather's death, during the Newport 
summer, she has got at Mr. Betterman and spoken 
to him about Gray; she has found him accessible 
to what she wants to say, and has perceived 
above all what a pull it gives her to be able to 
work, in her appeal, the fact, quite vivid in the 
fulness of time to the old man himself indeed, 

288 



 

that the young man, so nearly, after all, related 
to him, and over there in Europe all these years, 
is about the only person, who could get at him 
in any way, who hasn't ever asked anything of 
him or tried to get something out of him. Not 
only this, but he and his mother, in the time, 
are the only ones who ever refused a proffered 
advantage. I think I must make it that Ro- 
sanna finds that she can really tell her story to 
Mr. Betterman, can make a confidant of him 
and so interest him only the more. She feels 
that he likes her, and this a good deal on account 
of her enormous difference from her father. But 
I need only put it here quite simply: she does 
interest him, she does move him, and it is as a 
consequence of her appeal that he sends for Gray 
and that Gray comes. What I must above all 
take care of is the fact that she has represented 
him to the old man as probably knowing less 
about money, having had less to do with it, having 
moved in a world entirely outside of it, in a de- 
gree utterly unlike anyone and everyone whom 
Mr. Betterman has ever seen. 

But I have got it all, I needn't develop; what 
I want now independently is the beginning, quite 
back in the early years, of some relation on Gray's 
part with Horton Vint, and some effect, which I 
think I really must find right, of Horton's having 
done something for him, in their boyish time, 
something important and gallant, rather showy, 

289 



 

but at all events really of moment, N which has 
always been present to Gray. This I must find 
— it need present no difficulty; with something 
in the general way of their having been at school 
together — in Switzerland, with the service ren- 
dered in Switzerland, say on a holiday cours 
among the mountains, when Horty has fished 
Gray out of a hole, I don't mean quite a crevasse, 
but something like, or come to his aid in a tight 
place of some sort, and at his own no small risk, 
to bring him to safety. In fine it's something 
like having saved his life, though that has a tire- 
some little old romantic and conventional note. 
However I will make the thing right and give it 
the right nuance; remember that it is all al- 
lusional only now and a matter of reference on 
Gray's part. What must have further happened, 
I think, is that Horty has been in Europe again, 
in much later years, after College, indeed only 
a very few years previous, and has met Gray 
again and they have renewed together; to the 
effect of his apprehension of Gray's (to him) 
utterly queer and helpless and unbusinesslike, 
unfinancial, type; and of Gray's great admiration 
of everything of the opposite sort in him — com- 
bined, that is, with other very attractive (as 
they appear) qualities. He has made Gray think 
a lot about the wonderful American world that 
he himself long ago cut so loose from, and of 
which Horty is all redolent and reverberant; 

290 



 

and I think must have told him, most naturally 
told him, of what happened in the far off time 
in Florence. Only when, then, was the passage 
of their being at school, or, better still, with the 
Swiss pasteur, or private tutor, together? If 
it was before the episode in Florence they were 
rather younger than I seem to see them; if it 
was after they were rather older. Yet I don't 
at all see why it should not have been just after 
— this perfectly natural at 16 for Gray, at 17 for 
Horty; both thoroughly natural ages for being 
with the pasteur, and for the incident afterwards; 
Gray going very naturally to the pasteur, whom 
in fact he may have been with already before, 
during the first year of his mother's new mar- 
riage. That provides for the matter well enough, 
and I've only to see it to possess it; and gives 
a basis for their taking up together somehow 
when they meet, wherever I may put it, in the 
aftertime. There are forms of life for Gray and 
his stepfather to be focussed as the right ones — 
•Horty sees this pair together somewhere; and 
nothing is more arrangeable, though I don't 
think I want to show the latter as having dangled 
and dawdled about Italy only; and on the other 
hand do see that Gray's occupation, and main 
interest, other than that of looking after his elder 
companions, must be conceived and presented 
for him. Again no difficulty, however, with the 
right imagination of it. Horty goes back to 

291 



 

America; the, 3 or 4, or at the most 4 or 5, years 
elapse, so that it is with that comparative fresh- 
ness of mutual remembrance that the two men 
meet again. What I do see as definite is that 
Horty has had up to the time of Gray's return 
no sort of relation whatever with Mr. Better- 
man or his affairs, or any point of the question 
with which the action begins at Newport. He 
is on the other hand in relation with Cissy; and 
there are things I have got to account for in his 
actual situation. Why is he without money, 
with his interest in the getting of it etc. ? But 
that is a question exactly of interest — I mean 
to which the answer may afford the greatest. 
And settle about the degree of his apprehension 
of, relation to, designs on, or general lively con- 
sciousness of Rosanna. Important the fact that 
the enormous extent of her father's fortune is 
known only after his death, and is larger even 
than was supposed; though it is to be remem- 
bered that in American financial conditions, with 
the immense public activity of money there taking 
place, these things are gauged in advance and by 
the general knowledge, or speculative measure, as 
the oldfashioned private fortune couldn't be. 
But I am here up against the very nodus of my 
history, the facts of Horty's connection with the 
affairs that come into being for Gray under his 
uncle's Will; the whole mechanism, in fine, of 
this part of the action, the situation so created 

292 



 

and its consequences. Enormous difficulty of 
pretending to show various things here as with 
a business vision, in my total absence of business 
initiation; so that of course my idea has been 
from the first not to show them with a business 
vision, but in some other way altogether; this 
will take much threshing out, but it is the very 
basis of the matter, the core of the subject, and 
I shall worry it through with patience. But I 
must get it, plan it, utterly right in advance, and 
this is what takes the doing. The other doing, 
the use of it when schemed, is comparatively 
easy. What strikes me first of all is that the 
amount of money that Gray comes in for must, 
for reasons I needn't waste time in stating, so 
obvious are they, be no such huge one, by the 
New York measure, as in many another case: 
it's a tremendous lot of money for Gray, from 
his point of view and in relation to his needs or 
experience. Thus the case is that if Mr. Gaw's 
accumulations or whatever have distinctly sur- 
passed expectation, the other old man's have 
fallen much below it — or at least have been known 
to be no such great affair anyhow. Various ques- 
tions come up for me here, though there is no 
impossibility of settling them if taken one by 
one. The whole point is of course that Mr. Bet- 
terman has been a ruthless operator or whatever, 
and with doings Davey Bradham is able to give 
Gray so dark an account of; therefore if the 

293 



 

mass of money of the acquisition of which such 
a picture can be made is not pretty big, the force 
of the picture falls a good deal to the ground. 
The difficulty in that event, in view of the big- 
ness, is that the conception of any act on Hor- 
ton's part that amounts to a swindle practised 
on Gray to such a tremendous tune is neither a 
desirable nor a possible one. As one presses and 
presses light breaks — there are so many ways in 
which one begins little by little to wonder if one 
may not turn it about. There is the way in the 
first place of lowering the pitch altogether of 
the quantities concerned for either men. I see 
that from the moment ill-gotten money is con- 
cerned the essence of my subject stands firm 
whatever the amount of the same — whatever the 
amounts in either case. I haven't proposed from 
the first at all to be definite, in the least, about 
financial details or mysteries — I need hardly say; 
and have even seen myself absolutely not stating 
or formulating at all the figure of the property 
accruing to Gray. I haven't the least need of 
that, and can make the absence of it in fact a 
positively good and happy effect. That is an 
immense gain for my freedom of conduct; and 
in fine there glimmers upon me, there glimmers 

upon me ! The idea, which was vaguely my 

first, of the absolute theft practised upon Gray 
by Horty, and which Gray's large appeal to his 
cleverness and knowledge, and large trust in his 

294 



 

competence, his own being nil-— this theft ac- 
cepted and condoned by Gray as a manner of 
washing his own hands of the use of the damnosa 
hereditas — this thinkable enough in respect to 
some limited, even if considerable, amount etc.', 
but losing its virtue of conceivability if applied 
to larger and more complicated things. Vulgar 
theft I don't want, but I want something to which 
Horty is led on and encouraged by Gray's whole 
attitude and state of mind face to face with the 
impression which he gets over there of so many 
of the black and merciless things that are behind 
the great possessions. I want Gray absolutely 
to inherit the money, to have it, to have had it, 
and to let it go; and it seems to me that a whole 
element of awkwardness will be greatly minimised 
for me if I never exactly express, or anything like 
it, what the money is. The difficulty is in seeing 
any one particular stroke by which Horty can 
do what he wants; it will have to be much rather 
a whole train of behaviour, a whole process of 
depredation and misrepresentation, which con- 
stitutes his delinquency. This, however, would 
be and could be only an affair of time; and my 
whole intention, a straight and compact action, 
would suffer from this. What I originally saw 
was the fact of Gray's detection of Horty in a 
piece of extremely ingenious and able malversa- 
tion of his funds, the care of which he has made 
over to him, and the then determination on his 

295 



 

part simply to show the other in silence that he 
understands, and on consideration will do nothing; 
this being, he feels in his wrought-up condition 
after what he has learnt about the history of the 
money, the most congruous way of his ceasing 
himself to be concerned with it and of resigning 
it to its natural associations. That was the es- 
sence of my subject, and I see as much in it as 
ever; only I see too that it is imaginable about 
a comparatively small pecuniary interest much 
more than about a great. It has to depend upon 
the kind of malpractice involved; and I am partly 
tempted to ask myself whether Horty's con- 
nection with the situation may not be thinkable 
as having begun somewhat further back. One 
thing is certain, however; I don't want any 
hocus-pocus about the Will itself — which an an- 
terior connection for H. would more or less amount 
to: I want it just as I have planned it up to the 
edge of the circle in which his misdeed is per- 
petrated. What glimmers upon me, as I said just 
now, is the conception of an extreme frankness 
of understanding between the two young men 
on the question of Gray's inaptitudes, which at 
first are not at all disgusts — because he doesn't 
know; but which makes them, the two, have it 
/out together at an early stage. Yes, there 
glimmers, there glimmers; something really more 
interesting, I think, than the mere nefarious act; 
something like a profoundly nefarious attitude, 

296 



 

or even genius: I see, I really think I see, the 
real fine truth of the matter in that. With which 
I keep present to me the whole significance and 
high dramatic value of the part played in the 
action by Cissy Foy; have distinct to me her 
active function as a wheel in the machine. How 
it isn't simply Gray and Horty at all, but Gray 
and Horty and her; how it isn't She and Gray, 
any more than it's She and Horty, simply, but 
is for her too herself and the two men: in which 
I see possibilities of the most interesting. But 
I must put her on her feet perfectly in order to 
see as I should. Without at all overstraining the 
point of previous contacts for Gray with these 
three or four others — than which even at the 
worst there is nothing in the world more veri- 
similitudinous — I want some sort of relation for 
him with her started; this being a distinct 
economy, purchased by no extravagance, and 
seeing me, to begin with, so much further on 
my Way. And who, when I bethink myself, 
have his contacts been with, after all, over there, 
but Horty and Rosanna — the relation to Mr. 
Betterman being but of the mere essence. Of 
the people who matter the Bradhams are new 
to him, and that is all right; Cissy may have 
been seen of him on some occasion over there 
that is quite recent, as recent as I like; all the 
more that I must remember how if I want her 
truly a Girl I must mind what I'm about with 

297 



 

the age I'm attributing to Gray. I want a dis- 
parity, but not too great, at the same time that 
though I want her a Girl, I want her not too 
young a one either. Everything about her, her 
intelligence, character,' sense of life and knowl- 
edge of it, imply a certain experience and a cer- 
tain time for that. The great fact is that she is 
the poor Girl, and the "exceptionally clever," in 
a society of the rich, living her life with them, 
and more or less by their bounty; being, I seem 
to see, already a friend and protegee of Rosanna's, 
though it isn't Rosanna but the Bradhams who 
put her in relation with Gray, whether designedly 
or not. I seem to run here the risk a bit of ex- 
posure to the charge of more or less repeating 
the figure of Charlotte in The Golden Bowl, with 
the Bradhams repeating even a little the Asr 
singhams in that fiction; but I shake this re- 
flection off, as having no weight beyond duly 
warning; the situation being such another affair 
and the real characteristics and exhibited pro- 
ceedings of these three persons being likewise so 
other. Say something shall have passed between 
Cissy at a then 25, or 24 at most, and Gray "on 
the other side"; this a matter of but two or three 
occasions, interesting to him, shortly before his 
stepfather's death — a person with whom she has 
then professed herself greatly struck, to whom 
she has been somehow very "nice": a circum- 
stance pleasing and touching at the time to Gray, 

298 



 

given his great attachment to that charming, or 
at any rate to Gray very attaching, though for 
us slightly mysterious, character. Say even if 
it doesn't take, or didn't, too much exhibition or 
insistence, that the meeting has been with the 
stepfather only, who has talked with her about 
Gray, made a point of Gray, wished she could 
know Gray, excited her interest and prepared 
her encounter for Gray, in some conditions in 
which Gray has been temporarily absent from 
him. Say this little intercourse has taken place 
at some "health resort", some sanatorium or 
other like scene of possibilities, where the step- 
father, for whom I haven't even yet a name, is 
established, making his cure, staving off the 
affection of which he dies, while this interesting 
young American creature is also there in at- 
tendance on some relative whom she also has 
since lost. I multiply my orphans rather, Char- 
lotte too having been an orphan; but I can keep 
this girl only a half-orphan perhaps if I like. I 
kind of wartt her, for the sake of the character- 
istic, to have a mother, without a father; in 
which case her mother, who hasn't died, but got 
better, will have been her companion at the 
health resort; though it breaks a little into my 
view of the girl's dependence, her isolation etc., 
her living so much with these other people, if 
her mother is about. On the other hand the 
mother may be as gently but a charge the more 

299 



 

for her, and so in a manner conducive; though 
it's a detail, at any rate, settling itself as I get 
in close — and she would be at the worst the only 
mother in the business. What I seem to like to 
have at all events is that Gray and Cissy, have 
not met, yet have been in this indirect relation 
— complicated further by the fact of her existing 
"friendship", say, as a temporary name for it, 
with Horton Vint. She arrives thus with her 
curiosity, her recollections, her intelligence — for, 
there's no doubt about it, I am, rather as usual, 
offering a group of the personally remarkable, 
in a high degree, all round. Augusta Bradham, 
really, is about the only stupid one, the only ap- 
proach to a fool, though she too in her way is 
a force, a driving one — that is the whole point; 
which happens to mark a difference also, so far 
good, from the Assinghams, where it was the 
wife who had the intelligence and the husband 
who was in a manner the fool. The fact of the 
personal values, so to call them, thus clustered, 
I of course not only accept, but cherish; that 
they are each the particular individual of the 
particular weight being of course of the essence 
of my donnee. They are interesting that way 
— I have no use for them here in any other. 

Horton has meanwhile become in a sort tied 
up with Cissy, as she has with him; through the 
particular conditions of their sentiment for each 
other — she in love with him, so far as she, by her 

300 



 

conviction and theory, has allowed herself to go 
in that direction for a man without money, though 
destined somehow to have it, as she feels; and he 
in love with her under the interdict of a parity 
of attitude on the whole "interested" question. 
The woman whom he would give truly one of his 
limbs to commend himself to is Rosanna, who 
perfectly knows it and for whom he serves as 
the very compendium and symbol of that danger 
of her being approached only on that ground, the 
ground of her wealth, which is, by all the mis- 
trusts and terrors it creates, the deep note of her 
character and situation; that he serves to her as 
the very type of what she most dreads, not only 
the victory, but the very approach of it, almost 
constituting thus a kind of frank relation, a kind 
of closeness of contact between them, that in- 
volves for her almost a sinister (or whatever) 
fascination. It is between him and my ambitious 
young woman (I call her ambitious to simplify) 
that they are in a manner allies in what may be 
called their "attitude to society"; the frankness 
of their recognition, on either side, that in a world 
of money they can't not go in for it, and that 
accordingly so long as neither has it, they can't 
go in for each other: though how each would — 
each makes the other feel — if it could all be only 
on a different basis ! Horty's attitude is that he's 
going to have it somehow, and he to a certain 
extent infects her with this conviction— but that 

301 



 

he doesn't wholly do so is exactly part of the evi- 
dence as to that latent limitation of the general 
trust in him which I must a good deal depend on 
to explain how it is that, with his ability, or the 
impression of this that he also produces, he hasn't 
come on further. Deep down in the girl is her 
element of participation in this mistrust too — 
which is part of the reason why she hangs back, 
in spite of the kind of attraction he has for her, 
from any consent to, say, marry him. He, for 
that matter, hasn't in the least urged the case 
either — it hasn't been in him up to now, in spite 
of a failure or two, in spite of the failure notably 
with Rosanna, to close by a positive act the al- 
ways possibly open door to his marrying money. 
I see the recognition of all this between them as 
of well-nigh the crudest and the most typical, 
the most "modern"; in fact I see their relation 
as of a highly exhibitional value and interest. 
What the Girl indeed doesn't, and doesn't want 
to (up to now) express, is exactly that limit, and 
the ground of it, of her faith in him as a financial 
conqueror. She is willing more or less to believe, 
to confide, in his own confidence — she sees him 
indeed as more probably than not marked for 
triumphant acquisition; but the latent, "deep 
down" thing is her wonderment as to the char- 
acter of his methods — if the so-called straight 
ones won't have served or sufficed. She sees him 
as a fine adventurer — which is a good deal too 

302 



 

how she sees herself; but almost crude though 
I have called their terms of mutual understanding 
it hasn't come up for them, and I think it is ab- 
solutely never to come up for them, that she so 
far faces this question of his "honour", or of 
any capacity in him for deviation from it, as 
even to conjure it away. There are depths within 
depths between them — and I think I understand 
what I mean if I say there are also shallows be- 
side shallows. They give each other rope and 
yet at the same time remain tied; that for the 
moment is a sufficient formula — once I keep the 
case lucid as to what their tie is. 

What accordingly does her situation in respect 
to Gray come to, and how do I see it work out ? 
The answer to that involves of course the ques- 
tion of what his, in respect to her, comes to, and 
what it gives me for interest. She has got her 
original impression about him over there as of 
the man without means to speak of; but it is as 
the heir to a fortune that she now first sees him, 
and as the person coming in virtue of that into 
the world she lives in, where her power to guide, 
introduce and generally help and aid and com- 
fort him, shows from the first as considerable. 
She strikes him at once as the creature, in all 
this world, the most European and the most 
capable of, as it were, understanding him in- 
tellectually, entering into his tastes etc. He recog- 
nises quickly that, putting Davey Bradham 

303 



 

perhaps somewhat aside, she is the being, up and 
down the place, with whom he is going to be able 
most to communicate. With Rosanna he isn't 
going to communicate "intellectually", aesthet- 
ically, and all the rest, the least little bit: Rosanna 
has no more taste than an elephant; Rosanna 
is only morally elephantine, or whatever it is 
that is morally most massive and magnificent. 
What I want is to get my right firm joints, each 
working on its own hinge, and forming together 
the play of my machine: they are the machine, 
and when each of them is settled and determined 
it will work as I want it. The first of these, def- 
initely, is that Gray does inherit, has inherited. 
The next is that he is face to face with what it 
means to have inherited. The next to that is 
that one of the things it means — though this 
isn't the light in which he first sees the fact — is 
that the world immensely opens to him, and that 
one of the things it seems most to give him, to of- 
fer and present to him, is this brilliant, or what- 
ever, and interesting young woman. He doesn't 
at first at all see her in the light of her making up 
to him on account of his money; she is too little 
of a crudely interested specimen for that, and 
too sincere in fact to herself — feeling very much 
about him that she would certainly have been 
drawn to him, after this making of acquaintance, 
even if no such advantages attached to him and 
he had remained what he had been up to then. 

304 



 

But all the same it is a Joint, and we see that it 
is by seeing her as we shall; I mean I make it 
and keep it one by showing "what goes on" be- 
tween herself and Horton. I have blessedly that 
view, that alternation of view, for my process 
throughout the action. The determination of 
her interest towards him — that then is a Joint. 
And let me make the point just here that at first 
he has nothing but terror, but horror, of seeing 
himself affected as Rosanna has been by her 
own situation — from the moment, that is, he 
begins to take in that she is so affected. He 
takes this in betimes from various signs — before 
that passes between them which gives him her 
case in the full and lucid way in which he comes 
to have it. She gives it to him presently — but 
at first as her own simply, holding her hand en- 
tirely from intimating that his need be at all 
like it; as she must do, for that matter, given 
the fact that it is really through her action that 
he was brought over to see his uncle. She thinks 
her feelings about her own case right and in- 
evitable for herself; but I want to make.it an 
interesting and touching inconsistency in her 
that she desires not to inspire him, in respect 
to his circumstances, with any correspondingly 
justified sense. Definite is it that what he learns, 
he learns not the least mite from herself, though 
after a while he comes quite to challenge her on 
it, but from Davey Bradham, so far as he learns 

3°5 



 

it, for the most part, concretely and directly — 
as many other impressions as I can suggest help- 
ing besides. I want him at all events to have a 
full large clear moment or season of exhilaration, 
of something like intoxication, over the change 
in his conditions, before questions begin to come 
up. An essential Joint is constituted by their 
beginning to come up, and the difference that this 
begins to make. What I want of Davey Brad- 
ham is that he is a determinant in this shift of 
Gray's point of view, though I want also (and 
my scenario has practically provided for that) 
that the immediate amusement of his contact 
with Davey shall be quite compatible with his 
not yet waking up, not yet seeing questions loom. 
I must keep it well before me too that his whole 
enlarged vision of the money-world, so much 
more than any other sort of world, that all these 
people constitute, operates inevitably by itself, 
promotes infinite reflection, makes a hundred 
queer and ugly things, a thousand, ten thousand, 
glare at him right and left. A Joint again is con- 
stituted by Gray's first consciousness of malaise, 
first determination of malaise, in the presence of 
more of a vision, and more and more impression 
of everything; which determination, as I call it, 
I want to proceed from some sense in him of 
Cissy's attitude as affected by his own reactions, 
exhibition of questions, wonderments and, to put 
it simply and strongly, rising disgusts. She has 

306 



 

appealed to him at the outset, on his first appre- 
hension of her, exactly as a poor girl who wasn't 
meant to be one, who has been formed by her 
nature and her experience to rise to big brilliant 
conditions, carry them, take them splendidly, in 
fine do all justice to them; this under all the first 
flush of what I have called his own exhilaration. 
He hasn't then committed himself, in the vulgar 
sense, at all — had onjy committed himself, that is, 
to the appearance of being interested and charmed : 
his imaginative expansion for that matter being 
naturally too great to permit for the moment of 
particular concentration or limitations. But 
isn't his incipient fear of beginning to be, of 
becoming, such another example, to put it com- 
prehensively, as Rosanna, doesn't this proceed 
precisely from the stir in him of certain discon- 
certing, complicating, in fact if they go a little 
further quite blighting, wonderments in respect to 
Cissy's possibilities ? She throws her weight with 
him into the happy view of his own; which is what 
he likes her, wants her, at first encourages her to 
do, lending himself to it while he feels himself, 
as it were, all over. Mrs. Bradham, all the while, 
backs her up and backs him up, and is in general 
as crude and hard and blatant, as vulgar is what 
it essentially comes to, in her exhibited desire 
to bring about their engagement, as is exactly 
required for producing on him just the wrong 
effect. Gray's tone to the girl becomes, again 

307 



 

to simplify: "Oh yes, it's all right that you should 
be rich, should have all the splendid things of 
this world; but I don't see, I'm not sure, of its 
being in the least right that / should — while I 
seem to be making out more and more, round 
me, how so many of them are come by." It is 
(the insistence on them, the way everyone, among 
/that lot at any rate, appears aware of no values 
(but those, that sets up more and more its effect 
on his nerves, his moral nerves as it were, and his 
reflective imagination. The girl counters to this 
of course — she isn't so crude a case as not to; 
she denies that she's the sort of existence that 
he thus imputes — all the while that she only 
sees in his attitude and his position a kind of 
distinction that would simply add to their situa- 
tion, simply gild and after a fashion decorate it, 
were she to marry him. I want to make another 
Joint with her beginning, all the same, to doubt 
of him, to think him really perhaps capable of 
strange and unnatural things, which she doesn't 
yet see at all clearly; but which take the form 
for her of his possibly handing over great chunks 
of his money to public services and interests, de- 
ciding to be munificent with it, after the fashion 
of Rockefellers and their like: though with the 
enormous difference that his resources are not 
in the slightest degree of that calibre. He's rich, 
yes, but not rich enough to remain rich if he goes 
in for that sort of overdone idealism. Some pas- 

308 



 

sage bearing on this takes place, I can see, about 
at the time when he has the so to call it momentous 
season, or scene, or whatever, of confidence or 
exchange with Rosanna in which she goes the 
whole "figure", as they say, and puts to him 
that exactly her misery is in having come in for 
resources that should enable her to do immense 
things, but that are so dishonoured and- stained 
and blackened at their very roots, that it seems 
to her that they carry their curse with them, and 
that she asks herself what application to "be- 
nevolence" as commonly understood, can purge 
them, can make them anything but continuators, 
somehow or other, of the wrongs in which they 
had their origin. This, dramatically speaking, is 
momentous for Gray, and it makes a sort of 
clearing up to realities between him and Ro- 
sanna which offers itself in its turn, distinctly, 
as a Joint. It makes its mark for value, has an 
effect, leaves things not as they were. 

But meanwhile what do I see about Horton, 
about the situation between them, so part and 
parcel of the situation between Gray and Cissy 
and between Horton and Cissy. Absolute the 
importance, I of course recognise, of such a pre- 
sentation of matters between her and Horton, 
and Horton and her, as shall stand behind and 
under everything that takes place from this point. 
In my adumbration of a scenario for these earlier 
aspects I have provided, I think, for this; at any 

309 



 

rate I do hereby provide. I want to give the 
effect, for all it's worth, of their being constantly, 
chronically, naturally and, for my drama, deter- 
minatively, in communication; with which it 
more and more comes to me that when the great 
coup of the action effects itself Gray shall have 
been brought to it as much by the forces deter- 
mining it on her behalf, in relation to her, in a 
word, as by those determining it in connection 
with Horton. She helps him to his solution about 
as much as Horton does, and, lucidly, logically, 
ever so interestingly, everything between them 
up to the verge is but a preparation for that. 
Enormous meanwhile the relation with Horton 
constituted by his making over to this dazzling 
person (by whom moreover he wants to be, con- 
sents to be, dazzled) the care or administration 
of his fortune; for which highly characteristic, 
but almost, in its freehandedness, abnormally, 
there must have been preparation, absolutely, 
and oh, as I can see, ever so interestingly, in Book 
2, the section containing his face to face parts 
with Mr. Betterman. It comes to me as awfully 
fine, given the way in which I represent the old 
dying man as affected and determined, to sweep 
away everything in the matter of precautions 
and usualisms, provisions for trusteeships and 
suchlike, and lump the whole thing straight on 
to the young man, without his having a condi- 
tion or a proviso to consider. What I have wanted 

310 



 

is that he should at a stroke, as it were, in those 
last enshrouded, but perfectly possessed hours, 
make over his testament utterly and entirely, 
in the most simplified way possible; in short by 
a sweeping codicil that annihilates what he has 
done before and puts Gray in what I want practi- 
cally to count as unconditioned possession. Thank 
the Lord I have only to give the effect of this, for 
which I can trust myself, without going into the 
ghost of a technicality, any specialising demon- 
stration. I need scarcely tell myself that I don't 
by this mean that Gray makes over matters def- 
initely and explicitly to Horton at once, with 
attention called to the tightness with which his 
eyes are shut and all his senses stopped or averted; 
but that naturally and inevitably, also interest- 
ingly, this result proceeds, in fact very directly 
and promptly springs, from his viewing and 
treating his friend as his best and cleverest and 
vividest adviser — whom he only doesn't rather 
abjectly beg to take complete and irresponsible 
charge because he is ashamed of doing so. Two 
things very definite here; one being that Gray 
isn't in the least blatant or glorious about his 
want, absolutely phenomenal in that world, of 
any faint shade of business comprehension or 
imagination, but is on the contrary so rather 
helplessly ashamed of it that he keeps any atti- 
tude imputable to him as much as possible out 
of the question — and in fact proceeds in the way 

3" 



 

I know. He has moments of confidence — he 
tells Rosanna, makes a clean breast to her and 
with Horton doesn't need to be explicit, beyond 
a point, since all his conduct expresses it. What 
happens is that little by little, inevitably, as a 
consequence of first doing this for him and then 
doing that and then the other, Horton more and 
more gets control, gets a kind of unlimited play 
of hand in the matter which practically amounts 
to a sort of general power of attorney; as Gray 
falls into the position, under a feeling insur- 
mountably directing him, of signing anything, 
everything, that Horton brings to him for the 
purpose — but only what Horton brings. The 
state of mind and vision and feeling, the state 
of dazzlement with reserves and reflections, the 
play of reserves and reflections with dazzlement 
(which is my convenient word covering here all 
that I intend and prefigure) is a part of the very 
essence of my subject — which in fine I perfectly 
possess. What happens is, further, that, even 
with the rapidity which is of the remarkable 
nature of the case, Horton shows for a more and 
more monied, or call it at first a less and less non- 
monied individual; with an undisguisedness in 
this respect which of itself imposes and, vulgarly 
speaking, succeeds. I express these things here 
crudely and summarily, by rude signs and hints, 
in order to express them at all; but what is of so 
high an interest, and so bright and characteristic, 

312 



 

is that Horton is "splendid", plausible, delight- 
ful, because exactly so logical and happily sug- 
gestive, about all this; he puts it to Gray that 
of course he is helping himself by helping Gray, 
that of course his connection with Gray does him 
good in the business world and gives him such 
help to do things for himself as he has never be- 
fore had. I needn't abound in this sense here, 
I am too well possessed of what I see — as I find 
myself in general more and more. A tremendous 
Joint is formed, in all this connection, when the 
first definite question begins to glimmer upon 
Gray, under some intimation, suggestion, im- 
pression, springing up as dramatically as I can 
make it, as to what Horton is really doing with 
him, and as to whether or no he shall really try 
to find out. That question of whether or no he 
shall becomes the question; just as the way he 
answers it, not all at once, but under further 
impressions invoked, becomes a thing of the 
liveliest interest for us; becomes a consideration 
the climax of which represents exactly the Joint 
that is in a sense the climax of the Joints. He 
sees — well what I see him see, and it is of course 
not at all this act of vision in itself, but what 
takes place in consequence of it, and the process 
of confrontation, reflection, resolution, that en- 
sues — it is this that brings me up to my high 
point of beautiful difficulty and clarity. An ex- 
quisite quality of representation here of course 

313 



 

comes in, with everything that is involved to 
make it rich and interesting. A Joint here, a 
Joint of the Joint, for perfect flexible working, is 
Horton's vision of his vision, and Horton's ex- 
hibited mental, moral audacity of certainty as 
to what that may mean for himself. There is 
a scene of course in which, between them, this 
is what it can only be provisionally gross and 
approximate to call settled : as to which I needn't 
insist further, it's there; what I want is there; 
I've only to pull it out: it's all there, heaped up 
and pressed together and awaiting the properest 
hand. So much just now for that. 

As to Cissy Foy meanwhile, the case seems to 
me to clear up and clear up to the last perfection; 
or to be destined and committed so to do, at any 
rate, as one presses it with the right pressure. 
How shall I put it for the moment, her case, in 
the very simplest and most rudimentary terms ? 
She sees the improvement in Horton's situation, 
she assists at it, it gives her pleasure, it even to 
a certain extent causes her wonder, but a wonder 
which the pleasure only perches on, so to speak, 
and converts to its use; so does the vision ap- 
peal to her and hold her of the exercise on his 
part, the more vivid exercise than any she has 
yet been able to enjoy an exhibition of, of the 
ability and force, the doing and man-of-action 
quality, as to the show of which he has up to now 
been so hampered. She likes his success at last, 

3H 



 

plainly, and he has it from her that she likes it; 
she likes to let him know that she likes it, and 
we have her for the time in contemplation, as 
it were, of these two beautiful cases of possession 
and acquisition, out of which indeed poor little 
impecunious she gets as yet no direct advantage, 
but which are somehow together there for her 
with a kind of glimmering looming option well 
before her as to how they shall come yet to con- 
cern her. Awfully interesting and attractive, as 
one says, to mark the point (such a Joint this !) 
at which the case begins to glimmer for Gray 
about her, as it has begun to glimmer for him 
about Horton. I make out here, so far as I catch 
the tip of the tail of it, such an interesting con- 
nection and dependence, for what I may roughly 
call Gray's state of mind, as to what is taking 
place within Cissy, so to speak. Since I speak 
of the most primitive statement of it possible he 
catches the moment at which she begins to say 
to herself "But if Horton, if he, is going to be 

rich ?" as a positive arrest, say significant 

warning or omen, in his own nearer approach to 
her; which takes on thereby a portentous, a 
kind of ominous and yet enjoyable air of evidence 
as to his own likelihood, at this rate, of getting 
poor. He catches her not asking herself withal, 
at least then, "How is Horton going to be rich, 
how, at such a rate, has it come on, and what 
does it mean?" — it is only the "If Horton, oh 

3tf 



 

if ?" that he comes up against; it's as if he 

comes up against, as well, some wondrous im- 
plication in it of "If, if, if Mr. Gray is, 'in such 

a funny way,' going to be poor ?" He sees 

her there, seeing at the same time that it's as near 
as she yet gets; as near perhaps even — for this 
splendid apprehension sort of begins to take place 
in him — as she's going to allow herself to get; 
and after the first chill of it, shock of it, pain of 
it (because I want him to be at the point at which 
he has that) fades a little away for him, he emerg- 
ing or shaking himself out of it, the beautiful 
way in which it falls into the general ironic ap- 
prehension, imagination, appropriation, of the 
Whole, becomes for him the fact about it. She 
has them, each on his side, there in her balance 
— and this is between them, between him and 
her; I must have prepared everything right for 
its being oh such a fine moment. What I want 
to do of course is to get out of this particular 
situation all it can give; what it most gives being, 
to the last point, the dramatic quality, intensity, 
force, current or whatever, of Gray's apprehen- 
sion of it, once this is determined, and of course 
wondering interest in it — as a light, so to speak, 
on both of the persons concerned. What I see 
is that she gives him the measure, as it were, 
of Horton's successful proceeding — and does so, 
in a sort, without positively having it herself, 
or truly wanting to have it beyond the fact that 

316 



 

it is success, is promise and prospect of acquisi- 
tion on a big scale. What it comes to is that 
he finds her believing in Horton just at the time 
and in proportion as he has found himself ceasing 
to believe, so far as the latter's disinterestedness 
is concerned. No better, no more vivid illus- 
tration of the force of the money-power and 
money-prestige rises there before him, innumerably 
as other examples assault him from all round. 
The effect on her is there for him to "study," 
even, if he will; and in fact he does study it, 
studies it in a way that (as he also sees) makes 
her think that this closer consideration of her, 
approach to her, as it were, is the expression of 
an increased sympathy, faith and good will, 
increased desire, in fine, to make her like him. 
All the while it is, for Gray himself, something 
other; yet something at the\same time wellnigh 
as absorbing as if it were what she takes it for. 
The fascination of seeing what will come of it — 
that is of the situation, the state of vigilance, 
the wavering equilibrium, at work, or at play, 
in the young woman — this "fascination" very 
"amusing" to show, with everything that t:lus- 
ters about it. He really enjoys getting so de- 
tached from it as to be able to have it before him 
for observation and wonder as he does, and I 
must make the point very much of how this 
fairly soothes and relieves him, begins to glimmer 
upon him exactly through that consciousness as 

317 



 

something like the sort of issue he has been worry- 
ing about and longing for. Just so something 
that he makes out as distinguishable there in 
Horton, a ' confidence more or less dissimulated 
but also, deeply within, more or less determined, 
operates in its way as a measure for him of Hor- 
ton's intimate sense of how things will go for 
him; the confidence referring, I mustn't omit, 
to his possibility of Cissy, after all, whom his 
sentiment for makes his most disinterested in- 
terest, so to call it: all this in a manner corre- 
sponding to that apprehension in Gray of her 
confidence, which I have just been sketchily 
noting. The one disinterested thing in Horton, 
that is, consists of his being so attached to her 
that he really cares for her freedom, cares for 
her doing what on the Whole she most wants to, 
if it will but come as she wants it, by the opera- 
tion, the evolution, so to say, of her clear prefer- 
ence. He has somehow within him a sense that 
anyway, whatever happens, they shall not fail 

/of being "friends" after all. I see myself want- 
ing to have Gray come up against some con- 
clusive sign of how things are at last between 
them — though I say "at last" as if he has had 

/ much other light as to how such things have been, 
precedently. I don't want him to have had 
much other light, though he needs of course to 
have had some; there being people enough to 
tell him, he being so in the circle of talk, reference, 

3i8 



 

gossip; but with his own estimate of the truth 
of ever so much of the chatter in general, and 
of that chatter in particular, taking its course. 
What I seem to see just in this connection is 
that he has "believed" so far as to take it that 
she has "cared" for his friend in the previous 
time, but that Horton hasn't really at all cared 
for her, keeping himself in reserve as it is of his 
essence to do, and in particular (this absolutely 
known to Gray) never having wholly given up 
his views on Rosanna. Gray believes that he 
hasn't, at any rate, and this helps him not to fit 
the fact of the younger girl's renounced, quenched, 
outlived, passion, or whatever one may call it, 
to any game of patience or calculation, rooted 
in a like state of feeling, on Horton's part. I 
want the full effect of what I can only call for 
convenience Gray's Discovery, his full discovery 
of them "together", in some situation, and its 
illuminating and signifying, its in a high degree, 
to repeat again my cherished word, determinant 
character. This effect requires exactly what I 
have been roughly marking; — the line of argu- 
ment in which appearances, as interpreted for 
himself, have been supporting Gray. "She has 
been in love with him, yes — but nothing has come 
of it — nothing could come of it; because, though 
he has been aware, and has been nice and kind 
to her, he isn't affected in the same way — is, 
in these matters, too cool and calculating a bird. 

319 



 

He likes women, yes; and has had lots to do with 
them; but in the way of what a real relation with 
her would have meant — not ! She has given him 
up, she has given it up — whereby one is free not 
to worry, not to have scruples, not to fear to cut 
across the possibility of one's friend." That's 
a little compendium of what I see. But it comes 
to me that I also want something more — for the 
full effect and the exact particular and most 
pointed bearing of what I dub Gray's discovery. 
He must have put it to Horton, as their relations 
have permitted at some suggested hour, or in 
some relevant connection: "Do you mind telling 
me if it's true — what I've heard a good deal af- 
firmed — that there has been a question Of an 
engagement between you and Miss Foy? — or 
that you are so interested in her that to see some- 
body else making up to her would be to you as 
a pang, an affront, a ground of contention or 
challenge or whatever?" I seem to see that, 
very much indeed; and by the same token to 
see Horton's straight denegation. I see Horton 
say emphatically No — and this for reasons quite 
conceivable in him, once one apprehends their 
connection with his wishing above all, beyond 
anything else that he at this moment wishes, to 
keep well with Gray. His denegation is plausible; 
Gray believes it and accepts it — all the more 
that at the moment in question he wants to, in 
the interest of his own freedom of action. Ac- 

320 



 

cordingly the point I make is that when he in 
particular conditions finds them all unexpectedly 
and unmistakably "together", the discovery be- 
comes for him doubly illuminating. I might even 
better say trebly; showing him in the very first 
place that Horton has lied to him, and thereby 
that Horton can lie. This very interesting and 
important — but also, in a strange way, "fascinat- 
ing" to him. It shows in the second way how 
much Cissy is "thinking" of Horton, as well as 
he of her; and it shows in the last place, which 
makes it triple, how well Horton must think of 
the way his affairs are getting on that he can 
now consider the possibility of a marriage — that 
he can feel, I mean, he can afford to marry; not 
having need of one of the Rosannas to make up 
for his own destitution. This clinches enormously, 
as by a flash of vision, Gray's perception of what 
he is about; and is thus very intensely a Joint 
of the first water! What I want to be carried 
on to is the point at which all that he sees and 
feels and puts together in this connection eventu- 
ates in a decision or attitude, in a clearing-up of 
all the troubled questions, obscurities and diffi- 
culties that have hung for him about what I 
call his Solution, about what he shall be most 
at ease, most clear and consistent for himself, in 
making up his mind to. The process here and 
the position on his part, with all the implications 
and consequences of the same in which it results, 

321 



 

is difficult and delicate to formulate, but I see 
with the last intensity the sense of it, and feel 
how it will all come and come as I get nearer to 
it. What is a big and beautiful challenge to a 
whole fine handling of these connections in partic- 
ular is the making conceivable and clear, or in 
other words credible, consistent, vivid and in- 
teresting, the particular extraordinary relation 
thus constituted between the two men. That 
one may make it these things for Gray is more 
or less calculable, and, as I seem to make out, 
workable; but the greatest beauty of the dif- 
ficulty is in getting it and keeping it in the right 
note and at the right pitch for Horton. Horton's 
"acceptance" — on what prodigious basis save 
the straight and practical view of Gray's exalted 
queerness and constitutional, or whatever, per- 
versity, can that be shown as resting? Two fine 
things — that is one of them strikes me as very 
fine — here come to me; one of these my seeing 
{don't I see it ?) how it will fall in, not to say fall 
out, as of the essence of the true workability, that 
the extent to which i's are not dotted between 
them, are left consciously undotted, to which, 
to the most extraordinary tune, and yet with the 
logic of it all straight, they stand off, or rather 
Gray does, the other all demonstrably thus taking 
his cue — the way, I say, in which the standing- 
off from sharp or supreme clearances is, and con- 
firms itself as being, a note of my hero's action 

322 



 

in the matter, throws upon one the most in- 
teresting work. Horton accepts it as exactly 
part of the prodigious queerness which he humours 
and humours in proportion as Gray will have it 
that he shall; the "fine thing", the second of 
the two, just spoken of, being that Horton never 
flinches from his perfectly splendid theory that 
he is "taking care", consummately, of his friend, 
and that he is arranging, by my exhibition of 
him, just as consummately to show for so doing. 
No end, I think, to be got out of this wondrous 
fact of Gray's sparing Horton, or saving him, the 
putting of anything to a real and direct Test; 
such a Test as would reside in his asking straight 
for a large sum of money, a big amount, really 
consonant with his theoretically intact resources 
arid such as he with the highest propriety in the 
world might simply say that he has an imme- 
diate use for, or can make some important ap- 
plication of. No end, no end, as I say, to what 
I see as given me by this — this huge constituted 
and accepted eccentricity of Gray's holdings-off. 
I have the image of the relation between them 
made by it in my vision thus of the way 4 or the 
ways, they look at each other even while talking 
together to a tune which would logically or con- 
sistently make these ways other; the sort of edu- 
cation of the look that it breeds in Horton on 
the whole ground of "how far he may go." The 
things that pass between them after this fashion 

3 2 3 



 



.,- 



quite beautiful to do if kept from an overdoing; 
with Horton's formula of his "looking after" 
Gray completely interwoven with his whole 
ostensibility. It is with this formula that Hor- 
ton meets the world all the while — the world 
that at a given moment can only find itself so 
full of wonderment and comment. It is with it 
above all that he meets Cissy, who takes it from 
him in a way that absolutely helps him to keep 
it up; and it would be with it that he should 
meet Rosanna if, after a given' day or season, he 
might find it in him to dare, as it were, to "meet" 
Rosanna at all. It is with Horton's formula, 
which I think I finally show him as quite publicly 
delighting in, that Gray himself meets Rosanna, 
whom he meets a great deal all this time; with 
such passages between them as are only matched 
in another sense, and with all the other values 
with which they swell, so to speak, by his pas- 
sages with the consummate Horton. Charming, 
by which I mean such interesting, things resident 
in what I there touch on; with the way they look 
at each other, Rosanna and Gray, if one is talk- 
ing about looks. Gray keeps it in comedy, so 
far as he can — making a tone, a spell, that Ro- 
sanna doesn't break into, as she breaks, anything 
to call really breaks, into' nothing as yet: I seem 
to see the final, from-far-back-prepared moment 
when she does, for the first and last time, break 
as of a big and beautiful value. That will be a 

3H 



 

Joint of Joints; but meanwhile what is Between 
them is the sombre confidence, tenderness, fas- 
cination, anxiety, a dozen admirable things, with 
which she waits on Gray's tone, not playing up 
to it at all (playings-up and suchlike not being 
verily in her) but taking it from him, accom- 
modating herself to it with all her anxiety and 
her confidence somehow mixed together, as if to 
see how far it will carry her. Such a lot to be 
done with Gussie Bradham, portentous woman, 
even to the very cracking or bursting of the mould 
meanwhile — so functional do I see her, in spite 
of the crowding and pressing together of func- 
tions, as to the production of those (after all 
early-determined) reactions in Gray by the simple 
complete exhibition of her type and pressure 
and aggressive mass. She is really worth a book 
by herself, or would be should I look that way; 
and I just here squeeze what I most want about 
her into a sort of nutshell by saying that it marks 
for Gray just where and how his Solution, or at 
any rate some of its significant and attendant 
aspects, swims into his ken, with the very first 
scene she makes him about the meanness then 
of his conception of his opportunity. Then it is 
he feels he must be getting a bit into the truth of 
things — if that's the way he strikes her. His 
very measure of taste and delicacy and the sym- 
pathetic and the nice and the what he wants, 
becomes after a fashion what she will want most 

32S 



 

to make him a scene about. I have it at first 
that he lends himself, that her great driving tone 
and pressure, her would-be act of possession of 
him, Cissy and the question of Cissy being the 
link, have amounted to a sort of trouble-saving 
thing which he has let himself "go to", which he 
has suffered as his convenient push or handy 
determinant, for the hour (sceptical even then 
as to its lasting) — but which has inordinately 
overdosed him, overhustled him, almost, as he 
feels in his old habit of financial contraction, 
overspent and overruined him. He does the 
things, the social things, for the moment, that 
she prescribes, that she foists upon him as the 
least ones he can decently do; does them even 
with a certain bewildered amusement — while 
Rosanna, brooding apart, so to speak, out of 
the circle and on her own ground, but ever so 
attentive, draws his eye to the effect of what 
one might almost call the intelligent, the patience- 
invitingj wink! Oh for the pity of scant space 
for specific illustration of Mrs. Bradham; where- 
with indeed of course I reflect on the degree to 
which my planned compactness, absolutely pre- 
cious and not to be compromised with, must 
restrict altogether the larger illustrational play. 
Intensities of foreshortening, with alternate vivid- 
nesses of extension: that is the rough label of 
the process. I keep it before me how mixed 
Cissy is with certain of the consequences of this 

326 



 

hustlement of Mrs. Bradham, and how bulby- 
ingly, so to call it almost, she has put the whole 
matter of what he ought to "do for them all," 
on the ground in particular of what it is so open 
to him, so indicated for him, to do for that poor 
dear exquisite thing in especial. Illustrational, 
illustrational, yes; but oh how every inch of it 
will have to count. I seem to want her to have 
made him do some one rather gross big thing 
above all, as against his own sense of fineness in 
these matters; and to have this thing count 
somehow very much in the matter of his relation 
with Cissy. I seem to want something like his 
having consented to be "put up" by her to the 
idea of offering Cissy something very handsome 
byway of a "kind" tribute to her mingled poverty 
and charm — jolly, jolly, I think I've exactly got 
it ! I keep in mind that Mrs. Bradham wants 
him to marry her — this amount of "disinterested- 
ness " giving the measure of Mrs. B. at her most 
exalted "best". Wherewith, to consolidate this, 
her delicacy being capable — well, of what we shall 
see, she works of course to exaggeration the idea 
of his "recognising" how nice Cissy was, over 
there in the other time, to his poor sick stepfather, 
who himself so recognised it, who wrote to her 
so charmingly a couple of times "about it", 
after her return to America and quite shortly 
before his death. Gray "knows about this", 
and of course will quite see what she means. 

327 



 

Therefore wouldn't it be nice for Gray to give 
her, Cissy, something really beautiful and val- 
uable and socially helpful to her — as of course 
he can't give her money, which is what would 
be most helpful. Under this hustlement, in fine, 
and with a sense, born of his goodnature, his 
imagination, and his own delicacy, such a very 
different affair, of what Gussie Bradham has 
done for him, by her showing, he finds himself 
in for having bought a very rare single row of 
pearls, such as a girl, in New York at least, may 
happily wear, and presenting it to our young 
person as the token of recognition that Mrs. 
Bradham has imagined for them. The beauty 
in which, I see, is that it may be illustrational 
in more ways than one — illustrational of the 
hustle, of the length Gray has "appreciatively" 
let himself go, and, above all, of Cissy's really 
interesting intelligence and "subtlety". She 
refuses the gift, very gently and pleadingly, but 
as it seems to him really pretty well finally — 
refuses it as not relevant or proportionate or 
congruous to any relation in which they yet 
stand to each other, and as oh ever so much over- 
expressing any niceness she may have shown in 
Europe. She does, in doing this, exactly what 
he has felt at the back of his head that she would 
really do, and what he likes her for doing; — the 
effect of which is that she has furthered her in- 
terest with him decidedly more (as she of course 

328 



 

says to herself) than if she had taken it. He is 
left with it for the moment on his hands, and 
what I want is that he shall the next thing find 
himself, in revulsion, in reaction, there being 
for him no question of selling it again etc., finds 
himself, I say, offering it to Mrs. Bradham her- 
self, who swallows it without winking. Yet, in 
a way, this little history of the pearls, of her not 
having had them, and of his after a fashion owing 
her a certain compensation for that, owing her 
something she can accept, is there between him 
and my young person. They figure again be- 
tween them, humorously, freely, ironically — the 
girl being of an irony! — in their appearances on 
Mrs. Bradham's person, to whose huge possession 
of ornament they none the less conspicuously 
add. 

But my point here is above all that Gray ex- 
actly doesn't put the question of what is becom- 
ing of his funds under Horty's care of them to 
the test by any cultivation of that courage for 
large drafts and big hauls, that nerve for be- 
lieving in the fairy-tale of his sudden fact of pos- 
session, which was briefly and in a manner amus- 
ingly possible to him at the first go off of his 
situation. He forbears, abstains, stands off, and 
finds himself, or in particular is found by others, 
to the extent of their observing, wondering and 
presently challenging him, to be living, to be 
drawing on his supposed income, with what might 

329 



 

pass for the most extraordinarily timorous and 
limited! imagination. He likes this arrest, en- 
joys it and feels a sort of wondrous refreshing 
decency, at any rate above all a refreshing in- 
terest and curiosity about it, or, rather, for it; 
but what his position involves is his explaining 
it to others, his making up his mind, his having 
to, for a line to take about it,, without his thereby 
giving Horton away. He isn't to give Horton 
away the least scrap from this point on; but at 
the same time he is to have to deal with the world, 
with society, with the entourage consisting for 
him, in its most pressing form, of, say, three 
representative persons- — he has to deal with this 
challenge,, as I have called it, in some way that 
will sort of meet it without givings-away. These 
three persons are in especial Rosanna and the 
two Bradhams;, and it is before me definitely, I 
think, that I want to express, and in the very 
vividest way, his sense of his situation here, of 
what it means, and of what he means, in it, through 
what takes place for him about it with Rosanna 
and with the Bradhams. It is by what he "says" 
to the Bradhams and to Rosanna (in the way, 
that is largely, of not. saying) that I seem to see 
my values here as best got, and the presentation 
of their different states most vivified and drama- 
tised. These are scenes, and the function of them 
to serve up for us exactly, and ever so lucidly, 
what I desire them to represent. If the greatest 

330 



 

interest of them, of sorts, belongs to them in so 
far as they are "with" Rosanna, there are yet 
particular values that belong to the relation with 
Davey, and the three relations, at any rate, work 
the thing for me. They are perfectly different, 
on this lively ground, though the "point" in- 
volved is the same in each; and the having each 
of them to do it with should enable me to do it 
beautifully; I mean to squeeze all the dramatic 
sense from it. The great beauty is of course for 
the aspects with Rosanna, between whom and 
him everything passes — and there is so much 
basis already in what has been between them — 
without his "explaining", as I have called it, 
anything. Even without explanations — or all 
the more by reason of their very absence — there 
is so much of it all; of the question and the dra- 
matic illumination. With Gussie Bradham — 
that aspect I needn't linger or insist on, here, so 
much as a scrap. I have that, see it all, it's then. 
But with Davey I want something very good, 
that is in other words very functional; and I 
think I even wonder if I don't want to see Davey 
as attempting to borrow money of him. This — - 
if I do see it — will take much putting on the right 
basis; and it seems to kind of glimmer upon me 
richly what the right basis is. My idea has been 
from the first that the Bradham money is all 
Gussie's; I have seen Davey, by the very type 
and aspect, by all his detached irony and humour 

331 



 

and indiscretion and general value as the un- 
monied young man who has married the heiress, 
as Horton would have been had he been able 
to marry, Rosanna. But no interfering analogy 
need trouble me here; Horton's not having done 
that, and the essential difference between the 
men, eases off any such question. Only don't I 
seem to want it that Gussie's fortune, besides 
not having been even remotely comparable to 
Rosanna's, is, though with a fair outward face, 
a dilapidated and undermined quantity, much 
ravaged by Gussie's violent strain upon it, and 
representing thus, through her general enormous 
habit and attitude, an association and connec- 
tion with the money world, but all the more 
characteristically so, for Gray as he begins to see, 
that almost everything but the pitch of Gussie's 
wants and arrangements and ideals has been 
chucked, as it were, out of its windows and doors. 
Don't I really see the Bradhams thus as preda- 
tory ? Predatory on the very rich, that is; with 
Gussie's insistence that Gray shall be and shall 
proceed as quite one of the very, oh the very, 
very, exactly in order that she may so prey ? 
Yes and so it is that Gray learns — so it is that a 
part of Davey's abysses of New York financial 
history, is his own, their own, but his in partic- 
ular, abyss of inconvenience, abyss of inability 
to keep it up combined with all the social impos- 
sibility of not doing so. I somehow want such 

332 



 

values of the supporting and functional and illus- 
trative sort in Davey that I really think I kind 
of want him to be the person, the person, to whom 
Gray gives — as a kind of recognition of the re- 
markable part, the precious part, don't I feel it 
as being? that Davey plays for him. He likes 
so the illuminating Davey, whom I'm quite sure 
I want to show in no malignant or vicious light, 
but just as a regular rag or sponge of saturation 
in the surrounding medium. He is beyond, he 
is outside of, all moral judgments, all scandalised 
states; he is amused at what he himself does, 
at his general and particular effect and effects 
on Gray, who is his luxury of a relation, as it 
were, and whom I somehow seem to want to show 
him feel as the only person in the whole medium 
appreciating his genius; in other words his de- 
tached play of mind and the deep "American 
humour" of it. Don't I seem to want him even 
as asking for something rather big? — a kind of 
a lump of a sum which Gray, always with amuse- 
ment, answers that he will have to see about. 
Gray's seeing about anything of this sort means, 
all notedly, absolutely all, as I think I have it, 
asking Horton whether he can, whether he may, 
whether Horton will give it to him, whether in 
short the thing will suit Horton; even without 
any disposition of the sum, any account of what 
he wants to do, indicated or reported or confessed 
to Horton ? Don't I see something like this ? — 

333 



 

that Gray, having put it to Horton, has precisely 
determined, for his vision, on Horton's part, just 
that first important plea of "Really you can't, 
you know, at this rate" — even after Gray has 
been for some time so "ascetic" — "It won't be 
convenient for you just now; and I must ask 
you really, you know,, to take my word for it 
that you'd much better not distract from what 
I am in the act of doing for you such a sum" — by 
which I mean, for I am probably using here not 
the terms Horton would use — "much better not 
make such a call (call is the word) when I am ex- 
actly doing for you etc." What I seem to see is 
that Davey does have money from him,, but has 
it only on a scale that falls short, considerably, 
of his appeal or proposal or whatever; in other 
words that Gray accommodates him to the third, 
or some other fraction, of the whole extent; and 
that this involves for him practically the need 
of his saying that Horton won't let him have 
more. I want that,, I see it as a value; I see 
Davey's aspect on it as a value, I see what is de- 
termined thus between them as a value; and I 
seem to see most this covering by Gray of Horton 
in answer to the insinuations, not indignant but 
amused, in answer to the humorously fantastic 
picture, on Davey's lips, of the rate at which 
Horton is cleaning him out or whatever, this 
taking of the line of so doing and of piling up 
plausibilities of defence, excuse etc., so far as 

334 



 

poor Gray can be plausible in these difficult 
"technical" connections, as the vivid image, the 
vividest, I am most concerned to give of what I 
show him as doing. The covering of Horton, the 
covering of Horton — this is much more than not 
giving him away; this active and positive pro- 
tection of him seems to me really what my sub- 
ject logically asks. Well then if that is it, is what 
it most of all, for the dramatic value, asks, how 
can this be consistently less than Gray's act of 
going all the way indeed ? I don't know why — 
as it has been hovering before me — I don't want 
the complete vivid sense of it to take the form 
of an awful, a horrible or hideous, crisis on Hor- 
ton's part which, under the stress of it, he "sud- 
denly" discloses to Gray, throwing himself upon 
him in the most fevered, the most desperate ap- 
peal for relief. What then constitutes the nature 
of the crisis, what then can, or constitute the 
urgency of the relief, unless the fact of his hav- 
ing something altogether dreadful to confess; so 
dreadful that it can only involve the very essence 
of his reputation, honour and decency, his safety 
in short before the law? He has been guilty of 
some huge irregularity, say — but which yet is a 
different thing from whatever irregularities he 
has been guilty of in respect to Gray himself; and 
which up to now, at the worst, have left a certain 
substantial part of Gray's funds intact. Say 
that, say that; turn it over, that is, to see if it's 

335 



 

really wanted. I think of it as wanted because 
I feel the need of the effect of some acute deter- 
mination play up as I consider all this — and yet 
also see objections; which probably will multiply 
as I look a little closer. I throw this off, at all 
events, for the moment, as I go, to be looked at 
straighter, to return to presently — after I've got 
away from it a bit, I mean from this special aspect 
a little, in order to come back to it fresher; pick- 
ing up meanwhile two or three different matters. 
The whole question of what my young man 
has been positively interested in, been all the 
while more or less definitely occupied with, I 
have found myself leaving, or at any rate have 
left, in abeyance, by reason of a certain sense of 
its comparative unimportance. That is I have 
felt my instinct to make him definitely and frankly 
as complete a case as possible of the sort of thing 
that will make him an anomaly and an outsider 
alike in the New York world of business, the N. 
Y. world of ferocious acquisition, and the world 
there of enormities of expenditure and extrav- 
agance, so that the real suppression for him of 
anything that shall count in the American air 
as a money-making, or even as a wage-earning, 
or as a pecuniarily picking-up character, strikes 
i me as wanted for my emphasis of his entire dif- 
I ference of sensibility and of association. I have 
always wanted to do an out and out non-producer, 
in the ordinary sense of non-accumulator of ma- 

336 



 

terial gain, from the moment one should be able 
to give him a positively interested aspect on an- 
other side or in another sense, or even definitely 
a generally responsive intelligence. I see my 
figure then in this case as an absolutely frank 
example of the tradition and superstition, the 
habit and rule so inveterate there, frankly and 
serenely deviated from — these things meaning 
there essentially some mode of sharp reaching 
out for money over a counter or sucking it up 
through a thousand contorted channels. Yet I 
want something as different as possible, no less 
different, I mean, from the people who are "idle" 
there than from the people who are what is called 
active; in short, as I say, an out and out case, 
and of course an avowedly, an exceptionally fine 
and special one, which antecedents and past 
history up to then may more or less vividly help 
to account for. A very special case indeed is 
of course our Young Man — without his being 
which my donnee wouldn't come off at all; his 
being so is just of the very core of the subject. 
It's a question therefore of the way to make him 
most special — but I so distinctly see this that I 

need scarce here waste words ! There are 

three or four definite facts and considerations, 
however; conditions to be seen clear. I want 
to steer clear of the tiresome "artistic" associa-*"" 
tions hanging about the usual type of young 
Anglo-Saxon "brought up abroad"; though only 

337 



 

indeed so far as they are tiresome. My idea in- 
volves absolutely Gray's taking his stand, a bit 
ruefully at first, but quite boldly when he more 
and more sees what the opposite of it over there 
is so much an implication of, on the acknowledg- 
ment that, no, absolutely, he hasn't anything at 
all to show in the way of work achieved — with 
such work as he has seen achieved, whether apolo- 
getically or pretentiously, as he has lived about; 
and yet has up to now not had at all the sense 
of a vacuous consciousness or a so-called wasted 
life. This however by reason of course of cer- 
tain things, certain ideas, possibilities, inclina- 
tions and dispositions, that he has cared about 
and felt, in his way, the fermentation of. Of 
course the trouble with him is a sort of excess 
of "culture", so far as the form taken by his 
existence up to then has represented the growth 
of that article. Again, however, I see that I 
really am in complete possession of him, and that 
no plotting of it as to any but one or two ma- 
terial particulars need here detain me. He isn't, 
N.B., big, personally, by which I mean physically; 
I see that I want him rather below than above 
the middling stature, and light and nervous and 
restless; extremely restless above all in presence 
of swarming new and more or less aggressive, in 
fact quite assaulting phenomena. Of course he 
has had some means — that he and his stepfather 
were able to live in a quiet "European" way 

338 



 

and on an income of an extreme New York de- 
plorability, is of course of the basis of what has 
been before; with which he must have come in 
for whatever his late companion has had to leave. 
So with what there was from his mother, very 
modest, and what there is from this other source, 
not less so, he can? he could, go back to Europe 
on a sufficient basis: this fact to be kept in mind 
both as mitigating the prodigy of his climax in 
N.Y., and yet at the same time as making what- 
ever there is of "appeal" to him over there con- 
ceivable enough. Note that the statement he 
makes, when we first know him, to his dying 
uncle, the comipletemess of the picture of detach- 
ment then and there drawn for him, and which> 
precisely, by such an extraordinary and interest- 
ing turn, is what most "refreshes" and works 
upon Mr. Betterman— note, I say, that I ab- 
solutely require the utterness of his difference 
to be a sort of virtual determinant in this rela- 
tion. He puts it so to Rosanna, tells her how 
extraordinarily he feels that this is what it has 
been. Heaven forbid he should "paint" — but 
there glimmers before me the sense of the con- 
nection in which I can see him as more or less 
covertly and waitingly, fastidiously and often 
too sceptically, conscious of possibilities of "writ- 
ing". Quke frankly accept for him the complica- 
tion or whatever of his fastidiousness, yet of his 
recognition withal of what makes for steriEty; 

339 



 

but again and again I have all this, I have it. 
His "culture", his initiations of intelligence and 
experience, his possibilities of imagination, if one 
will, to say nothing of other things, make for me 
a sort of figure of a floating island on which he 
drifts and bumps and coasts about, wanting to 
get alongside as much as possible, yet always 
with the gap of water, the little island fact, to be 
somehow bridged over. All of which makes him, 
I of course desperately recognise, another of the 
"intelligent", another exposed and assaulted, 
active and passive "mind" engaged in an ad- 
venture and interesting in itself by so being; but 
I rejoice in that aspect of my material as dra- 
matically and determinancy general. It isn't 
centrally a drama of fools or vulgarians; it's only 
circumferentially and surroundedly so — these 
being enormously implied and with the effect 
of their hovering and pressing upon the whole 
business from without, but seen and felt by us 
only with that rich indirectness. So far so good; 
but I come back for a moment to an issue left 
standing yesterday — and beyond which, for that 
matter, two or three other points raise their 
heads. Why did it appear to come up for me 
again — I having had it present to me before and 
then rather waved it away — that one might see 
Horton in the kind of crisis that I glanced at as 
throwing him upon Gray with what I called 
violence ? Is it because I feel "something more" 

340 



 

is wanted for the process by which my Young 
Man works off the distaste, his distaste, for the 
ugliness of his inheritance — something more than 
his just generally playing into Horton's hands? 
I am in presence there of a beautiful difficulty, 
beautiful to solve, yet which one must be to the 
last point crystal-clear about; and this difficulty 
is certainly added to if Gray sees Horton as "dis- 
honest" in relation to others over and above his 
being "queer" in the condoned way I have so 
to picture for his relation to Gray. Here are 
complexities not quite easily unravelled, yet 
manageable by getting sufficiently close to them; 
complexities, I mean, of the question of whether 

? Horton is abysmal, yes — but with the 

mixture in it that Gray sees. Ergo I want the 
mixture, and if I adopt what I threw off specu- 
latively yesterday I strike myself as letting the 
mixture more or less go and having the non-mix- 
ture, that is the "bad" in him, preponderate. 
It has been my idea that this "bad" figures in 
a degree to Gray as after a fashion his own crea- 
tion, the creation, that is, of the enormous and 
fantastic opportunity and temptation he has held 
out — even though these wouldn't have operated 
in the least, or couldn't, without predispositions 
in Horton's very genius. If Gray saw him as a 
mere vulgar practiser of what he does practise, 
the interest would by that fact exceedingly drop; 
there would be no interest indeed, and the beauty 

34i 



 

of my "psychological" picture wouldn't come 
off, would have no foot to stand on. The beau- 
ty is in the complexity of the question — which, 
stated in the simplest terms possible, reduces 
itself to Horton's practically saying to Gray, or 
seeing himself as saying to Gray should it come 
to the absolute touch: "You mind, in your ex- 
traordinary way, how this money was accumulated 
and faanky-pankied, you suffer, and cultivate a 
suffering, from the perpetrated wrong of which 
you feel it the embodied evidence, and with which 
the possession of it is thereby poisoned for you. 
But I don't mind one little scrap — and there is 
a great deal more to be said than you seem so 
much as able to understand, or so much as able 
to want to, about the whole question of how 
money comes to those Who know how to make 
it. Here you are then, if it's so disagreeable to 
you — and what can one really say, with the chances 
you give me to say it, but that if you are so bur- 
dened and afflicted, there are ways of relieving 
you which, upon my honour, I should perfectly 
undertake to work — given the facilities that you 
so morbidly, so fantastically, so all but incredibly 
save for the testimony of my senses, permit me 
to enjoy." That, yes; but that is very different 
from the wider range of application of the apti- 
tudes concerned. The confession, and the delin- 
quency preceding it, that played a bit up for 
me yesterday — what do they do but make Hor- 

342 



 

ton just as vulgar as I don't want him, and, as 
I immediately recognise, Gray wouldn't in the 
least be able to stomach seeing him under any 
continuance of relations. I have it, I have it, 
and it comes as an answer to why I worried ? Be- 
cause of felt want of a way of providing for some 
Big Haul, really big; which my situation ab- 
solutely requires. There must be at a given mo- 
ment a big haul in order to produce the big sacri- 
fice; the latter being of the absolute essence. I 
say I have it when I ask myself why the Big 
Haul shouldn't simply consist of the consequence 
of a confession made by Horton to Gray, yes; 
but made not about what he has lost, whether 
dishonestly or not, for somebody else, but what 
he has lost for Gray. Solutions here bristle, 
positively, for the case seems to clear up from 
the moment I make Horton put his matter as a 
mere disastrous loss, of unwisdom, of having 
been "done" by others and not as a thing in- 
volving his own obliquity. What I want is that 
he pleads the loss — whether loss to Gray, loss to 
another party, or loss to both, is a detail. I in- 
cline to think loss to Gray sufficient — loss that 
Gray accepts, which is different from his meet- 
ing the disaster inflicted on another by Horton. 
What I want a bit is all contained in Gray's 
question, afterwards determined, not absolutely 
present at the moment, of whether this fact has 
not been a feigned or simulated one, not a genuine 

343 



 

gulf of accident, but an appeal for relinquishment 
practised on Gray by the latter's liability to be- 
lieve that the cause is genuine. I clutch the idea 
of this determinant of Tightness of suspicion 
being one With the circumstance that Cissy in 
a sort of thereupon manner "takes up" with 
Horton, instead of not doing so, as figures to 
Gray as discernible if Horton were merely minus. 
Is it cleared up for Gray that the cause is not 
genuine? — does he get, or does he seek, any 
definite light on this ? Does he tell any one, 
that is does he tell Rosanna of the incident 
(though I want the thing of proportions bigger 
than those of a mere incident) — does he put it 
to her, in short does he take her into his con- 
fidence about it ? I think I see that he does to 
this extent, that she is the only person to whom 
he speaks, but that he then speaks with a kind 
of transparent and, as it were, (as it is in her 
sight) "sublime" dissimulation. Yes, I think 
that's the way I want it — that he tells her what 
has happened, tells it to her as having happened, 
as a statement of what he has done or means to 
do — perhaps his mind isn't even yet made up to 
it; whereby I seem to get a very interesting pas- 
sage of drama and another very fine "Joint." 
He doesn't, no, decidedly, communicate anything 
to Davey Bradham — his instinct has been against 
that — and I feel herewith how much I want this 
D.B. relation for him to have all its possibility 

344 



 

of irony, "comedy", humorous colour, so to 
speak. I want awfully to do D.B. to the full 
and give him all his value. However, it's of the 
situation here with Rosanna that the question 
is, and I seem to feel that still further clear up 
for me. There has been the passage, the big 
circumstance, with Horton — as to which, as to 
the sense of which and of what it involves for 
him, don't I after all see him as taking time? 
after all see him as a bit staggered quand meme, 
and, as it were, asking for time, though without 
any betrayal of "suspicion", any expression 
tantamount to "What a queer story!" Yes, 
yes, it seems to come to me that I want the de- 
termination of suspicion not to come at once; 
I want it to hang back and wait for a big "crystal- 
lisation," a falling together of many things, which 
now takes place, as it were, in Rosanna's presence 
and under her extraordinary tacit action, in that 
atmosphere of their relation which has already 
given me, or will have given, not to speak pre- 
sumptuously, so much. It kind of comes over 
me even that I don't want any articulation to 
himself of the "integrity" question in respect to 
Horton to have taken place at all — till it very 
momentously takes place all at once in the air, 
as I say, and on the ground, and in the course, 
of this present scene. Immensely interesting to 
have made Everything precedent to have con- 
sisted but in preparation for this momentousness, 

345 



 

so that the whole effect has been gathered there 
ready to break. At the same time, if I make it 
break not in the right way, unless I so rightly 
condition its breaking, I do what I was moved 
just above to bar, the giving away of Horton 
to Rosanna in the sense that fixing his behaviour 
upon him, or inviting or allowing her to fix it, 
is a thing I see my finer alternative to. The 
great thing, the great find, I really think, for 
the moment, is this fact of his having gone to 
her in a sort of still preserved uncertainty of light 
that amounts virtually to darkness, and then 
after a time with her coming away with the un- 
certainty dispelled and the remarkable light in- 
stead taking its place. That gives me my very 
form and climax — in respect to the "way" that 
has most perplexed me, and gathers my action 
up to the fulness so proposed and desired; to 
the point after which I want to make it workable 
that there shall be but two Books left. In other 
words the ideal will be that this whole passage, 
using the word in the largest sense, with all the 
accompanying aspects, shall constitute Book 8, 
"Act" 8, as I call it, of my drama, with the de- 
noument occupying the space to the end — for 
the foregoing is of course not in the least the 
denotement, but only prepares it, just as what is 
thus involved is the occupancy of Book 7 by the 
history with Horton. Of course I can but reflect 
that to bring this splendid economy off it must 

346 



 

have been practised up to VII with the most 
intense and immense art: the scheme I have al- 
ready sketched for I and II leaving me therewith 
but III, IV, V, and VI to arrive at the complete- 
ness of preparation for VII, which carries in its 
bosom the completeness of preparation for VIII 
— this last, by a like grand law, carrying in its 
pocket the completeness of preparation for IX 
and X. But why not ? Who's afraid ? and what 
has the very essence of my design been but the 
most magnificent packed and calculated close- 
ness ? Keep this closeness up to the notch while 
admirably animating it, and I do what I should 
simply be sickened to death not to ! Of course 
it means the absolute exclusively economic exist- 
ence and situation of every sentence and every 
letter; but again what is that but the most de- 
sirable of beauties in itself? The chapters of 
history with Rosanna leave me then 'to show, 
speaking simply, its effect with regard to (I as- 
sume I put first) Gray and Horton, to Gray and 
Cissy, to Cissy and Horton, to Gray and Mrs. 
Bradham on the one hand and to Gray and Davey 
on the other and finally and supremely to Gray 
and Rosanna herself. It is of course definitely 
on that note the thing closes — but wait a little 
before I come to it. Let me state as "plainly" 
as may be what "happens" as the next step in 
my drama, the next Joint in the action after the 
climax of the "scene" with Rosanna. Obviously 

347 



 

the first thing is a passage with Horton, the pas- 
sage after, which shall be a pendant to the passage 
before. But don't I want some episode to inter- 
pose here on the momentous ground of the Girl ? 
These sequences to be absolutely planned and 
fitted together, of course, up to their last point 
of relation; to work such complexity into such 
compass can only be a difficulty of the most in- 
spiring; — the prize being, naturally, to achieve 
the lucidity with the complexity. What then is 
the lucidity for us about my heroine, and exactly 
what is it that I want and don't want to show ? 
I want something to take plape here between 
Gray and her that crowns his vision and his ac- 
tion in respect to Horton. As I of course want 
every point and comma to be "functional", so 
there's nothing I. want that more for than for 
this aspect of my crisis — which does, yes, de- 
cidedly, present itself before Gray has again seen 
Hqrton. I seem even to want this aspect, as I 
call it, to be the decisive thing in respect to his 
"decision". I want something to have still de- 
pended for him on the question of how she is, 
what she does, what she makes him see, 'however 
littfe intending it, of her sensibility to the crisis, 
as it were — knowing as I do what I mean by this. 
But what does come up for me, and has to be 
faced, is all the appearance that all this later 
development that I have sketched and am sketch- 
ing, rather directly involves a deviation from 

348 



 

that help by alternations which I originally counted 
on, and which I began by drawing upon in the 
first three or four Books. What becomes after 
the first three or four then of that variation — if 
I make my march between IV and VIII inclusive 
all a matter of what appears to Gray ? Perhaps 
on closer view I can for the "finer amusement" 
escape that frustration — though it would take 
some doing; and the fact remains that I don't 
really want, and can't, any other exhibition than 
Gray's own except in the case of Horton and the 
Young Woman. I should like more variation 
than just that will yield me withal — so at least 
it strikes me; but if I press a bit a possibility 
perhaps will rise. Two things strike me: one of 
these being that instead of making Book 9 Gray's 
"act" I may make it in a manner Cissy's own; 
save that a terrific little question here comes up 
as involved in the very essence of my cherished 
symmetry and "unity". The absolute prime 
compositional idea ruling me is thus the unity of 
each Act, and I get unity with the Girl for IX 
only if I keep it to her and whoever else. To her 
and Horton, yes, to her and Gray (Gray first) 
yes; only how then comes in the "passage" of 
Gray and Horton without her, and which I don't 
want to push over to X. It would be an "aes- 
thetic" ravishment to make Book 10 balance 
with Book 1 as Rosanna's affair; which I glimmer- 
ingly see as interestingly possible if I can wind 

349 



 

up somehow as I want to do between Gray and 
Horton. In connection with which, however, 
something again glimmers — the possibility of 
making Book 9 quand meme Cissy and Horton 
and Gray; twisting out, that is, some admirable 
way of her being participant in, "present at", 
what here happens between them as to their own 
affair. I say these things after all with the sense, 
so founded on past experience, that, in closer 
quarters and the intimacy of composition, pre- 
noted arrangements, proportions and relations, 
do most uncommonly insist on making themselves 
different by shifts and variations, always im- 
proving, which impose themselves as one goes 
and keep the door open always to something 
more right and more related. It is subject to 
that constant possibility, all the while, that one 
does pre-note and tentatively sketch; a fact so 
constantly before one as to make too idle any 
waste of words on it. At the same time I do ab- 
solutely and utterly want to stick, even to the 
very depth, to the general distribution here 
imagined as I have groped on; and I am at least 
now taking a certain Tightness and conclusiveness 
of parts and items for granted until the intimate 
tussle, as I say, happens, if it does happen, to 
dislocate or modify them. Such an assumption 
for instance I find myself quite loving to make 
in presence of the vision quite colouring up for 
me yesterday of Book 9 as given to Gray and 

35° 



 

Horton and Cissy Together, as I may rudely 
express it, and Book 10, to repeat, given, with a 
splendid richness and comprehensiveness, to Ro- 
sanna, as I hope to have shown Book I as so 
given. Variety, variety — I want to go in for 
that for all the possibilities of my case may be 
worth; and I see, I feel, how a sort of fond fancy 
of it is met by the distribution, the little cluster 
of determinations, or, so to speak, for the pleasure 
of putting it, determinatenesses, so noted. It 
gives me the central mass of the thing for my 
hero's own embrace and makes beginning and 
end sort of confront each other over it. 

Is it vain to do anything but say, that is but 
feel, that this situation of the Three in Book 9 
absolutely demands the intimate grip for clear- 
ing itself up, working itself out ? Yes, perfectly 
vain, I reflect, as at all precluding the high urgency 
and decency of my seeing in advance just how 
and where I plant my feet and direct my steps. 
Express absolutely, to this end, the conclusive 
sense, the clear firm function, of Book 9 — out of 
which the rest bristles. I want it, as for that 
matter I want each Book, with the last longing 
and fullest intention, to be what it is "amusing" 
and regaling to think of as "complete in itself"; 
otherwise a thoroughly expressed Occasion, or 
as I have kept calling it Aspect, such as one can 
go at, thanks to the flow of the current in it, in 
the firmest possible little narrative way. The 

3Si 



 

form of the Occasion is the form that I somehow 
see as here very particularly presenting itself and 
contributing its aid to that impression of the 
Three Together which I try to focus. Where, 
exactly, and exactly how, are they thus vividly 
and workably together? — what is the most- 
"amusing" way of making them so ? It is funda- 
mental for me to note that my action represents 
and embraces the sequences of a Year, not going 
beyond this and not falling short of it.' I can't 
get my Unity, can't keep it, on the basis of more 
than a year, and can't get my complexity, don't 
want to, in anything a bit less. I see a Year right, 
in fine, and it brings me round therefore to the 
early summer from the time of my original Ex- 
position. With which it comes to me of course 
that one of the things accruing to Gray under 
his Uncle's Will is the house at Newport, which 
belonged to the old man, and which I have no 
desire to go into any reason whatever for his 
heir's having got rid of. There is the house at 
Newport — as to which it comes over me that I 
kind of see him in it once or twice during the 
progress of the autumn's, the winter's, the spring's 
events. Isn't it also a part of my affair that I 
see the Bradhams with a Newport place, and am 
more or less encouraged herewith to make out 
the Scene of Book 9, the embracing Occasion, of 
the three, as a "staying" of them, in the natural 
way, the inevitable, the illustrative, under some 

352 



 

roof that places them vividly in relation to each 
other. Of course Mrs. Bradham has her great 
characteristic house away from N.Y., where any- 
thing and everything may characteristically find 
their background — the whole case being com- 
patible with that lively shakiness of fortune that 
I have glanced at; only I want to keep the whole 
thing, so far as my poor little "documented" 
state permits, on the lines of absolutely current 
New York practice, as I further reflect I probably 
don't want to move Gray an inch out of N.Y. 
"during the winter", this probably a quite un- 
necessarily bad economy. Having what I have 
of New York isn't the question of using it, and 
it only, as entirely adequate from Book 4 to 8 
inclusive ? To keep everything as like these 
actualities of N.Y. as possible, for the sake of 
my "atmosphere", I must be wary and wise; 
in the sense for instance that said actualities 
don't at all comprise people's being at Newport 
early in the summer. How then, however, came 
the Bradhams to be there at the time noted in 
my Book 1 ? I reflect happily apropos of this 
that my there positing the early summer (in 
Book 1) is a stroke that I needn't at all now take 
account of; it having been but an accident of 
my small vague plan as it glimmered to me from 
the very first go-off". No, definitely, the time- 
scheme must a bit move on, and give help there- 
by to the place-scheme; if I want Gray to arrive 

353 



 

en plein Newport, as I do for immediate control 
of the assault of his impressions, it must be a 
matter of August rather than of June; and noth- 
ing is simpler than to shift. Let me indeed so 
far modify as to conceive that 15 or 16 months 
will be as workable as a Year — practically they 
will count as the period both short enough and 
long enough; and will bring me for Nine and 
Ten round to the Newport or whatever of Au- 
gust, and to the whatever else of some moment 
of beauty and harmony in the American autumn. 
Let me wind up on a kind of strong October or 
perhaps even better still — yes, better still — latish 
November, in other words admirable Indian 
Summer, note. That brings me round and makes 
the circle whole. Well then I don't seem to want 
a repetition of Newport — as if it were, poor old 
dear, the only place known to me in the coun- 
try ! — for the images that this last suggestion 
causes more or less to swarm. By the blessing 
of heaven I am possessed, sufficiently to say so, 
of Lenox, and Lenox for the autumn is much 
more characteristic too. What do I seem to see 
then ? — as I don't at all want, or imagine myself 
wanting at the scratch, to make a local jump 
between Nine and TSn. These things come — I 
see them coming now. Of course it's perfectly 
conceivable, and entirely characteristic, that Mrs. 
Bradham should have a place at Lenox as well 
as at Newport; if it's necessary to posit her for 

354 



 

the previous summer in her own house at the 
latter place. It's perfectly in order that she may 
have taken one there for the summer — and that 
having let the Lenox place at that time may 
figure as a sort of note of the crack in her financial 
aspect that is part, to call it part, of my concern. 
All of which are considerations entirely meetable 
at the short range — save that I do really seem to 
kind of want Book 10 at Lenox and to want Nine 
there by the same stroke. I should like to stick 
Rosanna at the beautiful Dublin, if it weren't 
for the grotesque anomaly of the name; and after 
all what need serve my purpose better than what 
I already have? It's provided for in Book i 
that she and her father had only taken the house 
at Newport for a couple of months or whatever; 
so that is all to the good. Oh yes, all that New 
England mountain-land that I thus get by radi- 
ation, and thus welcome the idea of for values 
surging after a fashion upon Gray, appeals to 
one to "do" a bit, even in a measure beyond 
one's hope of space to do it. Well before me 
surely too the fact that my whole action does, 
can only, take place in the air of the last actuality; 
which supports so, and plays into, its sense and 
its portee. Therefore it's a question of all the 
intensest modernity of every American descrip- 
tion; cars and telephones and facilities and ma- 
chineries and resources of certain sorts not to 
be exaggerated; which I can't not take account 

355 



 

of. Assume then, in fine, the Bradhams this 
second autumn at Lenox, assume Gussie blazing 
away as if at the very sincerest and validest top 
of her push; assume Rosanna as naturally there 
in the "summer home" which has been her and 
her father's only possessional alternative to N.Y. 
I violate verisimilitude in not brushing them all, 
all of the N.Y. "social magnates", off" to Paris 
as soon as Lent sets in, by their prescribed oscilla- 
tion; but who knows but what it will be con- 
venient quite exactly to shift Gussie across for 
the time, as nothing then would be more in the 
line of truth than to have her bustle expensively 
back for her Lenox proceedings of the autumn. 
These things, however, are trifles. All I have 
wanted to thresh out a bit has been the "placing" 
of Nine and Ten; and for this I have more than 
enough provided. 

What it seems to come to then is the "positing" 
of Cissy at Lenox with the Bradhams at the time 
the circumstances of Book Eight have occurred; 
it's coming to me with which that I seem exactly 
to want them to occur in the empty town, the 
New York of a more or less torrid mid-August 
— this I feel so "possessed of"; to which Gray 
has "come back" (say from Newport where he 
has been for a bit alone in his own house there, 
to think, as it were, with concentration); come 
back precisely for the passage with Horton. So 
at any rate for the moment I seem to see that; 

356 



 

my actual point being, however, that Cissy is 
posited at Lenox, that the Book "opens" with 
her, and that it is in the sense I mean "her" 
Book. She is there waiting as it were on what 
Horton does, so far as I allow her intelligence 
of this; and it is there that Gray finds her on 
his going on to Lenox whether under constraint 
(by what has gone before) of a visit to the Brad- 
hams, a stay of some days with them, or under 
the interest of a conceivable stay with Rosanna; 
a sort of thing that I represent, or at any rate 
"posit", as perfectly in the line of Rosanna's 
present freedom and attributes. Would I rather 
have him with Rosanna and "going over" to 
the Bradhams ? would I rather have him with 
the Bradhams and going over to Rosanna ?■ — or 
would I rather have him at neither place and 
staying by himself at an hotel, which seems to 
leave me the right margin? There has been no 
staying up to this point for him with either party, 
and I have as free a hand as could be. With 
which there glimmer upon me advantages — oh 
yes — in placing him in his own independence; 
especially for Book 10: in short it seems to come. 
Don't I see Cissy as having obtained from Gussie 
Bradham that Horton shall be invited — which 
fact in itself I here provisionally throw off as 
giving me perhaps a sort of starting value. 



